North Carolina, session 2025, SB440.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. TITLE AND INTRODUCTION

TITLE OF ACT
SECTION 1.1. This act shall be known as the "Current Operations Appropriations
Act of 2025."

INTRODUCTION
SECTION 1.2. The appropriations made in this act are for maximum amounts
necessary to provide the services and accomplish the purposes described in the budget in
accordance with the State Budget Act. Savings shall be effected where the total amounts
appropriated are not required to perform these services and accomplish these purposes, and the
savings shall revert to the appropriate fund at the end of each fiscal year, except as otherwise
provided by law.

PART II. CURRENT OPERATIONS AND EXPANSION/GENERAL FUND

GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 2.1.(a) Appropriations from the General Fund for the budgets of the State
departments, institutions, and agencies, and for other purposes as enumerated, are made for each
year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, according to the following schedule:

Current Operations – General Fund FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027

EDUCATION
Community College System 1,835,773,238 1,817,233,999

Public Instruction 12,940,561,945 13,312,131,679

Appalachian State University 209,862,595 209,862,595
East Carolina University
*S440-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Academic Affairs 274,127,761 274,127,761
Health Affairs 107,144,915 107,144,915
Elizabeth City State University 48,513,547 48,513,547
Fayetteville State 87,586,990 87,586,990
NC A&T State University 162,728,474 162,743,010
NC Central University 98,572,636 98,572,636
NC State University
Academic Affairs 564,312,136 564,676,069
Agricultural Extension 46,543,237 46,543,237
Agricultural Research 63,465,016 63,465,016
UNC-Asheville 51,101,094 51,101,094
UNC-Chapel Hill
Academic Affairs 385,597,924 385,597,924
Health Affairs 249,399,553 249,399,553
AHEC 57,855,450 57,855,450
UNC-Charlotte 331,584,743 331,584,743
UNC-Greensboro 204,987,083 204,987,083
UNC-Pembroke 95,473,853 95,473,853
UNC-School of the Arts 42,015,189 42,015,189
UNC-Wilmington 217,239,729 217,239,729
Western Carolina University 164,563,738 164,589,450
Winston-Salem State University 68,743,773 68,743,773
General Administration 50,098,094 50,098,094
University Institutional Programs 445,200,342 418,908,192
Related Educational Programs 155,756,139 494,956,139
NC School of Science and Math 47,142,167 46,042,167
Aid to Private Institutions 11,209,300 1,209,300
Total University of North Carolina 4,240,825,478 4,543,037,509

HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Department of Health and Human Services
Aging and Adult Services 52,921,202 52,835,960
Central Management and Support 264,668,458 280,846,739
Child Development and Early Education 382,372,308 402,337,850
Child and Family Well Being 67,730,469 66,899,077
Health Benefits 6,713,749,640 6,915,372,354
Health Services Regulation 28,910,644 27,684,055
Mental Hlth/Dev. Disabl./Subs. Abuse Serv. 872,910,215 861,901,094
Public Health 145,202,462 141,115,801
Services for the Blind, Deaf and Hard of Hearing 10,914,745 10,582,156
Social Services 237,776,745 237,389,031
Vocational Rehabilitation 49,986,020 48,988,234
Total Health and Human Services 8,827,142,908 9,045,952,351

AGRICULTURE, NATURAL, AND ECONOMIC RESOURCES
Agriculture and Consumer Services 212,663,368 187,645,965

Department of Commerce
Commerce 32,609,149 32,416,005
General State Aid 19,655,810 19,655,810
Economic Development 166,248,245 161,248,245
Page 2 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

Environmental Quality 140,680,891 128,482,814

Labor 28,121,857 27,647,075

Department of Natural and Cultural Resources 307,296,564 300,576,669

Wildlife Resources Commission 18,351,461 17,633,011

JUSTICE AND PUBLIC SAFETY
Judicial Department 827,773,076 820,165,360

Judicial Department – Indigent Defense Services 185,962,469 175,026,742

Department of Justice 90,804,406 89,863,913

Department of Public Safety 702,776,742 686,556,053

Department of Adult Correction 2,177,127,587 2,157,937,189

State Bureau of Investigation 75,468,655 64,814,302

GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Department of Administration 74,678,938 74,260,897

Office of Administrative Hearings 8,898,948 8,839,511

State Board of Elections 11,759,995 11,682,822

Office of State Auditor 20,631,544 20,427,667

Office of State Controller 37,735,638 37,484,996

General Assembly 106,202,329 103,830,055

Office of the Governor 12,123,401 12,059,283

Office of State Budget and Management
Office of State Budget and Management 13,505,238 13,404,735
OSBM – Reserve for Special Appropriations 35,300,000 15,300,000

Housing Finance Agency 70,660,000 60,660,000

Office of State Human Resource 13,247,160 15,358,377

Department of Insurance
Insurance 109,006,753 84,282,862
Insurance – Industrial Commission 16,099,148 14,739,941

Office of Lieutenant Governor 1,417,641 1,405,203

Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Department of Military and Veterans Affairs 10,522,771 10,436,405

Department of Revenue 135,835,446 135,281,182

Department of Secretary of State 21,063,124 20,875,289

Department of State Treasurer
Treasurer 622,074 209,074
Treasurer – Retirement System 24,044,657 24,044,657

Information Technology 95,908,367 97,150,367

RESERVES, DEBT, AND OTHER BUDGETS
Statewide Reserves 0 0

Total Net Appropriation 33,649,107,021 34,349,758,014

SECTION 2.1.(b) For purposes of this act, the requirements set forth in this section
represent the total amount of funds, including agency receipts, appropriated to an agency,
department, or institution.

GENERAL FUND AVAILABILITY
SECTION 2.2.(a) The General Fund availability derived from State tax revenue,
nontax revenue, and other adjustments used in developing the budget for each year of the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium is as follows:

FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027

Unappropriated Balance from Prior Fiscal Year 48,073,341 364,074,833
Projected Over Collections FY 2024-25 543,900,000 -
Anticipated Reversions FY 2024-25 300,000,000 -
Total, Current Beginning Unreserved Balance 891,973,341 364,074,833

Statutorily Required Reservations of Revenue
State Capital and Infrastructure Fund (1,120,000,000) (1,159,200,000)
Unfunded Liability Solvency Reserve (38,514,750) (117,406,800)
Subtotal (1,158,514,750) (1,276,606,800)

Investments to Reserves
State Emergency Response and Disaster Relief Fund 500,000,000 0
Subtotal, Investments to Reserves (500,000,000) 0

Tax Revenues
Individual Income 16,980,000,000 16,114,000,000
Sales and Use 11,582,500,000 11,895,200,000
Corporate Income 1,483,600,000 1,340,100,000
Franchise 785,800,000 809,700,000
Insurance 1,503,300,000 1,415,600,000
Alcoholic Beverage 560,000,000 572,700,000
Tobacco Products 245,400,000 240,900,000
Other Tax Revenue 248,200,000 268,900,000
Page 4 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Subtotal, Tax Revenues 33,388,800,000 32,657,100,000

Non-tax Revenues
Judicial Fees 207,400,000 204,600,000
Investment Income 681,900,000 594,100,000
Disproportionate Share 107,700,000 109,000,000
Master Settlement Agreement 105,100,000 102,000,000
Insurance 124,000,000 126,900,000
Other Non-tax Revenues 274,800,000 273,400,000
Subtotal, Non-tax Revenue 1,500,900,000 1,410,000,000

Total, Net Revenues 34,889,700,000 34,067,100,000

Adjustments to Revenues:
Maintain Individual Income Tax at 4.25% 386,300,000 1,801,800,000
Maintain Lowest Corporate Tax Rate at 2.25% 68,400,000 166,200,000
Working Families Tax Credit – 20% of federal
Earned Income Tax Credit (426,800,000) (425,800,000)
Child and Dependent Care Tax Credit (59,000,000) (60,300,000)
Child Deduction to Refundable Child Tax Credit (23,000,000) (23,000,000)
Sales Tax Back-to-School Holiday (29,000,000) (30,000,000)
PHP Gross Tax Revenue Offset (78,035,000) (75,623,000)
Subtotal, Adjustments to Tax Revenue (161,135,000) 1,353,277,000

Adjustments to Availability
Insurance Non-Tax Transfer 51,158,263 25,646,165

Revised Total Net General Fund Availability 34,013,181,854 34,533,491,198

Less General Fund Net Appropriations (33,649,107,021) (34,349,758,014)

Unappropriated Balance Remaining 364,074,833 183,733,184

SECTION 2.2.(b) IT Reserve – The State Controller shall transfer the sum of one
hundred seventeen million eight hundred ninety-five thousand five hundred ninety dollars
($117,895,590) from the unreserved fund balance in the Information Technology Project Reserve
to the Office of State Budget and Management. Funds appropriated from the Information
Technology Project Reserve shall be allocated by the Director of the State Budget in consultation
with the State Chief Information Officer and the head of the department with primary ownership
over the information technology project based on documented project needs. Funds transferred
under this section are appropriated in the year in which they are transferred and shall be used for
the following information technology projects:
(1) The Office of State Budget and Management's replacement for the integrated
budget information system (IBIS).
(2) The Department of Information Technology's cybersecurity tools continuation
of protection offerings, and constituent portal and citizen identity software.
(3) The Department of Adult Correction's rounds tracking software.
(4) The Office of the State Auditor's modernization of audit IT infrastructure.
(5) The Department of Public Instruction's PSU school business system
modernization.
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) The Office of State Human Resources' human capital management (HCM)
vendor integration and HARP data analytics improvements (GDAC).
(7) The Department of Revenue's DataPower end of life replacement, datacenter
hardware replacement, and replacement of OFP and RCA desktop clients.
(8) The State Board of Elections' election modernization.
(9) The State Bureau of Investigation's headquarters data center and investigative
case management system.
(10) The Office of Administrative Hearings' database development system.
(11) The Department of Commerce's new career information system.
(12) The Department of Environmental Quality's completion of the permit
transformation project.
(13) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of State Operated
Health Facilities' electronic health records.
(14) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits'
Medicaid enterprise system and other technology.
(15) The Department of Justice's legal case management system.

SECTION 2.2.(c) SERDRF – The State Controller shall reserve to the State
Emergency Response and Disaster Relief Reserve established in G.S. 166A-19.42 from funds
available in the General Fund the sum of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year. The State Controller shall transfer funds
available in the State Emergency Response and Disaster Relief Reserve the sum of one hundred
fourteen million dollars ($114,000,000) to the Department of Public Safety, Emergency
Management Division, to be used as state matching funds to draw down remaining federal
funding for storms that occurred prior to 2024. The funds are appropriated for the five-year period
ending June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.2.(d) Federal Infrastructure Match Reserve. – The State Controller shall
transfer funds available in the Federal Infrastructure Match Reserve to agencies and departments
as needed to draw down federal funds in accordance with the following schedule, and the funds
transferred are appropriated for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium:
(1) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) to the Department of Agriculture and
Consumer Services for Farmland Preservation Agricultural Military Buffer
Conservation Easements;
(2) Ten million five hundred thousand dollars ($10,500,000) to the Department
of Commerce, Office of Science, Technology, and Innovation, for the NC
Coalition Strategic Support Fund to leverage federal funding and grow the
semiconductor and chip industries in the state; and
(3) Twenty-two million six hundred fourteen thousand one hundred dollars
($22,614,100) to the Department for Environmental Quality for Drinking
Water and Clean Water State Revolving Funds match funds.
SECTION 2.2.(e) Except as otherwise specifically provided, nothing in this section
shall be construed as appropriating funds reserved pursuant to this section. Funds reserved
pursuant to this section do not constitute an "appropriation made by law," as that phrase is used
in Section 7(1) of Article V of the North Carolina Constitution.
SECTION 2.2.(f) The State Controller shall ensure that the transfers required under
this section are completed as soon as practicable but no later than the end of the fiscal year in
which they are directed. In making the transfers required under this section, the State Controller
shall prioritize transfers to Reserves that support expenditures.

PART III. HIGHWAY FUND AND HIGHWAY TRUST FUND

Page 6 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
CURRENT OPERATIONS AND EXPANSION/HIGHWAY FUND
SECTION 3.1. Appropriations from the State Highway Fund for the maintenance
and operation of the Department of Transportation and for other purposes as enumerated are
made for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2027, according to the following schedule:

Current Operations – Highway Fund FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027

Department of Transportation
Administration $143,308,209 $143,308,209
Division of Highways
Administration 38,487,904 38,412,904
Construction 77,543,078 77,543,078
Maintenance 2,231,198,332 2,248,723,293
Governor's Highway Safety Program 601,695 601,695
OSHA Program 358,030 358,030
State Aid to Municipalities 185,875,000 185,875,000
Intermodal Divisions
Ferry 92,551,173 84,147,728
Public Transportation, Bicycle, and Pedestrian 70,570,554 70,570,554
Aviation 158,376,982 159,889,238
Rail 49,367,607 50,367,607
Division of Motor Vehicles 173,788,575 166,853,269
Compensation, Benefits,
Reserves, Transfers, and Other 76,660,123 69,756,123
Capital Improvements 6,712,738 47,793,272
Total Highway Fund Appropriations 3,305,400,000 3,344,200,000

HIGHWAY FUND AVAILABILITY
SECTION 3.2. The Highway Fund availability used in developing the 2025-2027
fiscal biennial budget is shown below:

Highway Fund Availability FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
Motor Fuels Tax $1,853,000,000 $1,878,100,000
Highway Short Term Lease 113,100,000 114,900,000
Licenses and Fees 1,104,500,000 1,123,300,000
Investment Income 50,200,000 37,600,000
Aviation Fuel Tax 13,100,000 13,400,000
Sales Tax 171,500,000 176,900,000
Total Highway Fund Availability $3,305,400,000 $3,344,200,000

HIGHWAY TRUST FUND APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 3.3. Appropriations from the State Highway Trust Fund for the
maintenance and operation of the Department of Transportation and for other purposes as
enumerated are made for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2027, according to the following
schedule:

Current Operations – Highway Trust Fund FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027

Program Administration $44,621,733 $44,621,733
Bonds 121,440,275 121,436,275
Turnpike Authority 49,000,000 49,000,000
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
State Ports Authority 45,000,000 45,000,000
FHWA State Match 6,048,440 6,048,440
Strategic Prioritization Funding Plan for
Transportation Investments 2,222,253,974 2,280,386,974
Transfer to Visitor Center 640,000 640,000
Transfer to Department of Revenue 0 371,000
Uncommitted Trust Fund 495,578 495,578
Total Highway Trust Fund Appropriations $2,489,500,000 $2,548,000,000

HIGHWAY TRUST FUND AVAILABILITY
SECTION 3.4. The Highway Trust Fund availability used in developing the
2025-2027 fiscal biennial budget is shown below:

Highway Trust Fund Availability FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027

Highway Use Tax $1,150,500,000 $1,179,800,000
Motor Fuels Tax 619,500,000 627,900,000
Fees 172,100,000 172,500,000
Sales Tax 514,400,000 530,600,000
Investment Income 33,000,000 37,200,000
Total Highway Trust Fund Availability $2,489,500,000 $2,548,000,000

PART IV. OTHER AVAILABILITY AND APPROPRIATIONS

CASH BALANCES AND OTHER APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 4.1.(a) Cash balances, federal funds, departmental receipts, grants, and
gifts from the General Fund, revenue funds, enterprise funds, and internal service funds are
appropriated for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium as follows:
(1) For all budget codes listed in the Governor's Recommended Budget for the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium, dated March 2025, and in the Budget Support
Document, fund balances and receipts are appropriated up to the amounts
specified, as adjusted by the General Assembly, for the 2025-2026 fiscal year
and the 2026-2027 fiscal year. Funds may be expended only for the programs,
purposes, objects, and line items or as otherwise authorized by the General
Assembly. Expansion budget funds listed in those documents are appropriated
only as otherwise provided in this act.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection:
a. Any receipts that are required to be used to pay debt service
requirements for various outstanding bond issues and certificates of
participation are appropriated up to the actual amounts received for the
2025-2026 fiscal year and the 2026-2027 fiscal year and shall be used
only to pay debt service requirements.
b. Other funds, cash balances, and receipts of funds that meet the
definition issued by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board of
a trust or agency fund are appropriated for and in the amounts required
to meet the legal requirements of the trust agreement for the 2025-2026
fiscal year and the 2026-2027 fiscal year.
SECTION 4.1.(b) Receipts collected in a fiscal year in excess of the amounts
appropriated by this section shall remain unexpended and unencumbered until appropriated by
the General Assembly, unless the expenditure of over-realized receipts in the fiscal year in which
Page 8 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the receipts were collected is authorized by the State Budget Act. Over-realized receipts are
appropriated in the amounts necessary to implement this subsection.
SECTION 4.1.(c) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, there is
appropriated from the Reserve for Reimbursements to Local Governments and Shared Tax
Revenues for each fiscal year an amount equal to the amount of the distributions required by law
to be made from that reserve for that fiscal year.

EDUCATION LOTTERY AND OTHER WAGERING FUNDS/CHANGES TO
REVENUE ALLOCATIONS
SECTION 4.2. The appropriations for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium made from the
Education Lottery Fund equal one billion, eight hundred and four million seven hundred
thousand dollars ($1,804,700,000); and from E-Instant Games equal four hundred fifty-two
million three hundred thousand dollars ($452,300,000) and are as follows:

FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027

Noninstructional Support Personnel $385,914,455 $385,914,455
Prekindergarten Program 105,002,110 111,402,110
NC Pre-K Wrap-Around Summer Child Care 10,000,000 10,000,000
Universal School Breakfast 85,300,000 85,300,000
1-1 Device Refresh 68,250,000 68,250,000
Public School Building Capital Fund 100,000,000 100,000,000
Needs-Based Public School Capital Fund 258,252,612 258,252,612
Public School Repairs and Renovations 50,000,000 50,000,000
Scholarship Reserve Fund for Public Colleges and Universities 41,194,733 41,194,733
LEA Transportation 21,386,090 21,386,090
TOTAL APPROPRIATION $1,125,300,000 $1,131,700,000

INDIAN GAMING EDUCATION REVENUE FUND APPROPRIATION
SECTION 4.3. Notwithstanding G.S. 143C-9-7, the appropriations from the Indian
Gaming Education Revenue Fund to the Department of Public Instruction, Textbooks, and
Digital Resources Allotment, are as follows. These receipts are appropriated in the year in which
they are received.

FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027

Textbooks and Digital Resources Allotment $22,700,000 $13,700,000
Classroom Materials 1,000,000 1,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION $23,700,000 $14,700,000

CIVIL PENALTY AND FORFEITURE FUND
SECTION 4.4. Allocations are made from the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund for
the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2027, as follows:

FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027

School Technology Fund $18,000,000 $18,000,000
Drivers Education 31,493,768 31,493,768
State Public School Fund 166,041,640 166,041,640
1-1 Device Refresh 11,300,000 11,300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION $226,835,408 $226,835,408
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

PART V. GENERAL PROVISIONS

ESTABLISHING OR INCREASING FEES
SECTION 5.1.(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 123.1, an agency is not required to consult
with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations prior to establishing or
increasing a fee to the level authorized or anticipated in this act.
SECTION 5.1.(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 150B-21.1A(a), an agency may adopt an
emergency rule in accordance with G.S. 150B-21.1A to establish or increase a fee as authorized
by this act if the adoption of a rule would otherwise be required under Article 2A of Chapter
150B of the General Statutes.

CAP STATE FUNDED PORTION OF NONPROFIT SALARIES
SECTION 5.2. No more than one hundred forty thousand dollars ($140,000) in State
funds, including any interest earnings accruing from those funds, may be used for the annual
salary of any individual employee of a nonprofit organization.

PART VI. COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM

PROPEL NC FUNDING MODEL ADJUSTMENT
SECTION 6.1.(a) The funds appropriated in this act for Propel NC shall be used to
shift North Carolina Community College System's enrollment formula from the current
tier-based allocation model to a labor-market driven model. This new model shall link courses to
workforce sectors that are ranked and valued by statewide salary job demand data.
SECTION 6.1.(b) The State Board of Community Colleges in consultation with the
Department of Commerce shall identify the workforce sectors aligned with the State's
high-demand, high-salary jobs and allocate the funds appropriated in this act to those workforce
sectors. Appropriated funds may also be used for customized training and Small Business Centers
at the individual colleges.

PROPEL NC ENROLLMENT GROWTH RESERVE
SECTION 6.2. G.S. 115D-31 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115D-31. State financial support of institutions.
…
(e) If receipts for community college tuition and fees exceed the amount certified in
General Fund Codes at the end of a fiscal year, the State Board of Community Colleges shall
transfer retain the amount of receipts and fees above those budgeted to the Enrollment Growth
Reserve. . Funds in the Enrollment Growth Reserve shall not revert to the General Fund and shall
remain available to the State Board until expended. The State Board may allocate these funds in
this reserve to colleges experiencing an enrollment increase greater than five percent (5%) of
budgeted enrollment levels.proportionally to colleges based on actual receipt collections from
the prior fiscal year.
(f) The Enrollment Growth Reserve shall be established as a recurring, nonreverting
reserve under the direction of the State Board of Community Colleges. Funds appropriated by
the North Carolina General Assembly shall be allocated based on actual fall semester FTE. The
method of allocation shall be as follows: at one-half the average FTE value per FTE for the
greater of FTE increases in excess of 5% for each category of instruction, or for increases in total
FTE greater than 325. If enrollment growth exceeds the funds appropriated in a given year, the
value per FTE would be reduced proportionally."

Page 10 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
AUTHORIZE USE OF MOTORCYCLE SAFETY EDUCATION PROGRAM FUNDS
FOR A CAPITAL PROJECT
SECTION 6.3.(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 115D-72, of the funds received for the
North Carolina Motorcycle Safety Education Program (NCMSEP), the State Board of
Community Colleges may award up to five-hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to Lenoir
Community College for use in constructing or renovating a facility used for this program.
SECTION 6.3.(b) This authorization is for the fiscal year ending on June 29, 2026,
and funds transferred under Section (a) above, shall not revert and shall remain available until
expended.

INCREASE CUSTOMIZED TRAINING SUPPORT FOR REGIONAL COMMUNITY
COLLEGE PERSONNEL
SECTION 6.4. G.S. 115D-5.1(f3) reads as rewritten:
"§ 115D-5.1. Workforce Development Programs.
…
(f3) Of the funds appropriated in a fiscal year for the Customized Training Programs, the
State Board of Community Colleges may approve the use of up to eight percent (8%)fifteen
percent (15%) for the training and support of regional community college personnel to deliver
Customized Training Program services to business and industry.
…."

ADD SUCCESS RATE OF SCIENCE COURSES TO PERFORMANCE MEASURES
SECTION 6.5. G.S. 115D-31.3(e) reads as rewritten:
"§ 115D-31.3. Institutional performance accountability.
…
(e) Mandatory Performance Measures. – The State Board of Community Colleges shall
evaluate each college on the following performance measures:
(1) Progress of basic skills students.
(2) Repealed by Session Laws 2016‑94, s. 10.1, effective July 1, 2016.
(3) Performance of students who transfer to a four‑year institution.
(3a) Success rate of students in credit‑bearing English courses.
(3b) Success rate of students in credit‑bearing Math courses.or Science courses.
(4), (5) Repealed by Session Laws 2016‑94, s. 10.1, effective July 1, 2016.
(5a) Progress of first‑year curriculum students.
(6) Repealed by Session Laws 2012‑142, s. 8.5, effective July 1, 2012.
(7) Curriculum student retention and graduation.
(8) Repealed by Session Laws 2012‑142, s. 8.5, effective July 1, 2012.
(9) Attainment of licensure and certifications by students.
The State Board may also evaluate each college on additional performance measures.
…."

PERMIT SYSTEM OFFICE TO RETAIN ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS FROM NC
CAREER COACH PROGRAM
SECTION 6.6. G.S. 115D-21.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115D-21.5. NC Career Coach Program.
…
(e) Administrative Costs. – In alignment with the goals, objectives, and requirements of
the North Carolina Career Coach Program, the Community College System Office may allocate
up to 4% of the program's annual appropriation for administrative costs. Such administrative
costs may include professional development, program management, and evaluation. These funds
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
shall be utilized to enhance the effectiveness and sustainability of the program, ensuring its
continued support for students within the community college system."

FREE COMMUNITY COLLEGE TUITION FOR HIGH DEMAND SKILLS TRAINING
SECTION 6.7. G.S. 115D-5.1A reads as rewritten:
"§ 115D-5.1A. Short-Term Workforce Development Grant Program.
(a) Program Established. – There is established the North Carolina Community College
Short‑Term Workforce Development Grant Program (Program) to be administered by the State
Board of Community Colleges. The State Board shall adopt rules for the disbursement of the
grants pursuant to this section.
(b) Programs of Study. – The State Board of Community Colleges, in collaboration with
the Department of Commerce, shall determine the eligible programs of study for the Program,
according to the occupations that are in the highest demand in the State. The eligible programs
of study shall include programs such as architecture and construction, health sciences,
information technology, electrical line worker, and manufacturing programs and may include
other programs to meet local workforce needs.
(c) Award Amounts. – To the extent funds are made available for the Program, the State
Board of Community Colleges shall award grants in an amount of up to seven hundred fifty
dollars ($750.00) to students pursuing short‑term, noncredit State and industry workforce
credentials. The State Board of Community Colleges shall establish criteria for initial and
continuing eligibility for students. The criteria shall include a requirement that eligible students
be a resident of North Carolina pursuant to G.S. 116-143.1(a)(1). At a minimum, students shall
be required to qualify as a resident for tuition purposes under the criteria set forth in G.S.
116‑143.1 and in accordance with the coordinated and centralized residency determination
process administered by the State Education Assistance Authority.
(d) Report. – The State Board shall submit a report by April 1, 2024, and annually
thereafter,an initial report by April 1, 2024, and annually thereafter by December 1, on the
Program to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research
Division. The report shall contain, for each academic year and by programs of study, the amount
of grant funds disbursed and the number of eligible students receiving funds. (2023‑134, s. 6.5.)"

PART VII. PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

PILOT PROGRAM TO LIMIT STUDENT CELL PHONE USE IN SCHOOLS
SECTION 7.1.(a) Purpose. – The State Board of Education shall establish a grant
program to be administered by the Department of Public instruction to support public school
units' implementation of policies to limit student cell phone use during instructional time.
SECTION 7.1.(b) Application, Criteria and Guidelines. – By August 1, 2025, the
Department of Public Instruction shall develop and publish criteria and guidelines for the
application process. Public school units shall submit applications by September 1, 2025. The
application shall require that submissions include the following information at a minimum:
1. Description of the school or schools included in the proposal, including the
number of students and classrooms by grade level who will be subject to the
policy;
2. Description of the proposed policy;
3. Justification of the proposed policy, including evidence-based research to the
extent possible;
4. Implementation plan;
5. Description of how grant funds will be used;
6. Plans for financial sustainability once grant money is no longer available;
7. A letter of endorsement from the governing board.
Page 12 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 7.1.(c) Grant Awards. – By October 1, 2025, the Department of Public
Instruction shall review the applications and select public school units for grant awards, ensuring
that the following are represented to the extent possible:
1. All eight regions of the state;
2. Urban and rural areas of the state; and
3. Schools from Tier I, II, and III counties.
SECTION 7.1.(d) Qualifying Expenses. – If a public school unit is awarded a grant,
it may request reimbursement for qualifying expenditures for the 2025-26 school year that were
made prior to the October 1 award notification date.
SECTION 7.1.(e) Evaluation and Reporting. – Of the funds appropriated by this act,
the State Board of Education may use up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to contract
with an independent research organization to evaluate the impact of this grant program. The
independent research organization shall report the results of this evaluation to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the Fiscal Research Division of the General
Assembly, and the Office of State Budget and Management by September 1, 2027. The
Department of Public Instruction shall report annually to the same entities listed above on the
implementation of this grant program beginning on March 1, 2026.
SECTION 7.1.(f) Administration. – The Department of Public Instruction may retain
up to two percent (2%) of grant funds to cover administrative costs.
SECTION 7.1.(g) Carryforward. – Funds unspent in the 2025-26 fiscal year shall
not revert and shall be carried forward to FY 2026-27 to implement this section.

ELIMINATE THE CAP FOR FUNDS FOR CHILDREN WITH DISABILITIES
SECTION 7.2. G.S. 115C-111.05 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-111.05. Funding for children with disabilities.
To the extent funds are made available for this purpose, the State Board shall allocate funds
for children with disabilities to each local school administrative unit on a per child basis. Each
local school administrative unit shall receive funds for the lesser of (i) all children who are
identified as children with disabilities or (ii) thirteen percent (13%) of its allocated average daily
membership in the local school administrative unit for the current school year. Each local school
administrative unit shall receive funds for the total number of children who are identified as
children with disabilities in the local school administrative unit."

SCHOOL SAFETY ALLOTMENT FOR MIDDLE AND ELEMENTARY SCHOOLS
SECTION 7.3.(a) G.S. 143B-1209.60 is repealed.
SECTION 7.3.(b) Purpose. – The State Board of Education shall allocate funds to
the School Safety Allotment to provide for the safety of students on school grounds. Elementary
and middle schools across the state can use allotted funds to hire and train School Resource
Officers (SROs).
SECTION 7.3.(c) Allotment. – Of the funds appropriated through this act to the
Department of Public Instruction, the State Board shall allocate funding to each local school
administrative unit for hiring school resource officers. Each local school administrative unit shall
receive allotted dollars for each non-virtual school serving students in elementary and middle
schools with an allotted average daily membership of greater than 300.
SECTION 7.3.(d) Consolidation. –Effective July 1, 2025, G.S. 143B-1209.60 is
repealed and all funds for elementary and middle school SROs shall be administered through the
School Safety Allotment by the Department of Public Instruction. At the discretion of the State
Board of Education, the funds provided for high school SROs through the At Risk Student
Allotment may also be consolidated into this allotment.
SECTION 7.3.(e) Training. – The Center for Safer Schools and the Department of
Public Instruction shall work with the NC Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Commission to establish initial training and continuing education standards for SROs. Those
standards shall include pre-service training and modules on the social and cognitive development
of elementary school and middle school children, behavioral health, and trauma-informed
practices in schools. All SROs must receive training through a community college, a local law
enforcement agency, or the North Carolina Justice Academy prior to placement in a school.

EXPAND LITERACY PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT AND SUPPORT TO
GRADES 6-8
SECTION 7.4.(a) G.S. 115C-83.6A reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-83.6A. Approval of literacy intervention plans.
(a) Each local school administrative unit shall submit to the Department of Public
Instruction a plan for the literacy interventions interventions for kindergarten through eighth
grade it will offer, including reading camps, in the following school year no later than October
1. The plan shall include information about the local school administrative unit's efforts to staff
reading camps with the most qualified teachers possible, including the unit's efforts to attract
teachers associated with high growth in reading based on EVAAS data and teachers who have
earned a reading bonus. The plan shall incorporate any feedback received from the Department
on the previous year's plan. As part of their plans, local school administrative units are
encouraged to partner with other local school administrative units and with community
organizations to enhance literacy interventions."
SECTION 7.4.(b) Allotment. – To the extent funds are made available for this
purpose, the Department of Public Instruction shall use funds appropriated in this act to contract
with Lexia Learning to provide Lexia Aspire® Professional Learning to all English-Language
Arts, Math, Science and Social Studies teachers in sixth, seventh, and eighth grades.

EXPAND USE OF DIAGNOSTIC READING ASSESSMENTS TO GRADES 4-5
SECTION 7.5.(a) G.S. 115C-83.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-83.3. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) "Accelerated reading class" means a class where focused literacy
interventions are provided to increase a student's reading level at least two
grades in one school year.
(2) "Alternative assessment" means a valid and reliable standardized assessment
of reading comprehension, approved by the State Board of Education, that is
not the same test as the State-approved standardized test of reading
comprehension administered to third grade students. The State Board of
Education shall provide the valid and reliable alternative assessment to local
school administrative units public school units upon request and establish
achievement level ranges for the approved alternative assessment. The State
Board of Education shall annually review the alternative assessment to ensure
ongoing relevance, validity, and reliability."
SECTION 7.5.(b) G.S. 115C-83.6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-83.6. Facilitating early grade reading proficiency.
(a) Kindergarten, first, second, and third through fifth grade students shall be assessed
with valid, reliable, formative, and diagnostic reading assessments made available to local school
administrative units public school units by the State Board of Education pursuant to
G.S. 115C-174.11(a). Difficulty with reading development identified through administration of
formative and diagnostic assessments shall be addressed with literacy interventions outlined in
the student's Individual Reading Plan. Parents or guardians of first and second grade students
offered a reading camp as a literacy intervention shall be encouraged to enroll their student in the
reading camp provided by the local school administrative unit. Parents or guardians of a student
Page 14 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
identified as demonstrating reading comprehension below grade level shall make the final
decision regarding a student's reading camp attendance.
…
(a2) The Department of Public Instruction shall provide for EVAAS analysis all formative
and diagnostic assessment data collected pursuant to this section for kindergarten through third
fifth grade. The Department shall use a uniform template for all data collected, and the template
shall be used each time data is provided. The template shall include clear designations for each
data component reported."
SECTION 7.5.(c) G.S. 115C-83.6B reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-83.6B. Individual Reading Plans.
(a) An Individual Reading Plan (IRP) shall be developed for any student in kindergarten
through third eighth grade demonstrating difficulty with reading development based on the
results of either (i) the first diagnostic or formative assessment of the school year or (ii) the first
diagnostic or formative assessment of the second semester of the school year. The IRP shall be
continually adjusted based on multiple data sources as prescribed by the Department of Public
Instruction, indicating that the student is not progressing toward grade-level standards in one or
more major reading areas. Based on the most recently collected data, the IRP shall include the
following information, specific to the identified student:
(1) The specific reading skill deficiencies identified by assessment data.
(2) Goals and benchmarks for growth.
(3) The means by which progress will be monitored and evaluated.
(4) The specific additional literacy interventions the student will receive.
(5) The Science of Reading-based instructional programming the teacher will
implement.
(6) Any additional services the teacher deems appropriate to accelerate the
student's reading skill and development."

SCHOOL PERFORMANCE GRADE REDESIGN
SECTION 7.6.(a) Program Established; Purpose. – There is established the School
Performance Grade Redesign Pilot Program (Program) for the 2025-2027 biennium. The
Program shall be composed of a small group of school units and expanded to all K-12 schools
receiving public funds in the 2027-28 school year. The purpose of the Program is to improve the
school performance grade process to provide more transparent and comprehensive information
about school performance to parents, students, and administrators. School performance grades
will continue to be issued pursuant to G.S. 115C-83.15 during the pilot program.
SECTION 7.6.(b) School Performance Grade Criteria. – The Department of Public
Instruction shall develop and publish criteria to be used for school performance grades in the
Program.
SECTION 7.6.(c) Application for Program. – Public school units interested in
participating in the Program shall notify the Department, and the Department shall establish a
process for selecting schools to participate. The Department shall select one charter school, one
local school administrative unit, and one private school that receives state funds to participate in
the Program from each State Board of Education region, balancing characteristics of the school
units to represent the diversity of the State.
SECTION 7.6.(d) Interim Reporting. – Each school unit participating in the Program
shall report to the Department on the criteria developed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section
by the deadline established by the Department.
SECTION 7.6.(e) Department Reporting. – The Department shall report to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee and the Office of State Budget and Management by November
1, 2026, on the status and progress of the Program. A copy of the report shall be distributed to all
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 15

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
local superintendents and principals in public school units participating in the Program. The
report shall include at least the following:
(1) Any difficulties in collecting data or information required by the Program.
(2) Any recommended changes to the Program.
(1) Any other information the Department deems relevant to the performance of the
Program.
(2) Any other information requested by the committee.
SECTION 7.6.(f) Statewide Expansion of the Program. – Beginning with the
2027-28 school year, the Program shall be expanded to all K-12 schools in the State that receive
public funds. All participating schools shall provide the information required by the Program.
SECTION 7.6.(g) Final Reporting. – Each participating school unit, as part of the
Program, shall report to the Department on the criteria developed pursuant to subsection (a) of
Section 2 of this act by the deadline established by the Department.
SECTION 7.6.(h) Final Department Reporting. – The Department shall submit a
final report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee by June 30, 2027, on the outcomes of
the Program. A copy of the report shall be distributed to local superintendents and principals in
all participating schools. The report shall include at least the following:
(1) Any continued difficulties in collecting data or information required by the
Program.
(2) Any recommended changes to the criteria developed by the Program.
(3) Any other information the Department deems relevant to the performance of the
Program.
(4) The model and scale that the Department would use to assign school performance
grades from the criteria developed for the Program.
(5) Any recommended legislation for implementing the Program permanently to
replace the existing school performance grade system.
(6) Any other information requested by the committee.
SECTION 7.6.(i) Intention of General Assembly. – It is the intention of the General
Assembly that after any statutory changes made pursuant to subsection (h) of this section, school
performance measures be issued that are based on the results of the pilot, that more heavily
weight growth than the current score, and that comply with federal requirements, including those
in the Every Student Succeeds Act.

PART VIIA. COMPENSATION OF PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEES

TEACHER SALARY SCHEDULE
SECTION 7A.1.(a) The following monthly teacher salary schedule shall apply for
the 2025-26 fiscal year to licensed personnel of the public schools who are classified as teachers.
The salary schedule is based on years of teaching experience.
2025-2026 Teacher Monthly Salary Schedule
Years of Experience "A" Teachers
0 4,450
1 4,530
2 4,610
3 4,690
4 4,770
5 4,850
6 4,930
7 5,010
8 5,090
9 5,170
Page 16 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
10 5,250
11 5,330
12 5,410
13 5,490
14 5,570
15-24 5,588
25+ 5,795
SECTION 7A.1.(b) The following monthly teacher salary schedule shall apply for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to licensed personnel of the public schools who are classified as
teachers. The salary schedule is based on years of teaching experience.
2026-2027 Teacher Monthly Salary Schedule
Years of Experience "A" Teachers
0 5,120
1 5,160
2 5,200
3 5,240
4 5,280
5 5,320
6 5,360
7 5,400
8 5,440
9 5,480
10 5,520
11 5,560
12 5,600
13 5,640
14 5,680
15-24 5,720
25+ 5,920
SECTION 7A.1.(c) Salary Supplements for Teachers Paid on This Salary Schedule.
(1) Licensed teachers who have NBPTS certification shall receive a salary
supplement each month of twelve percent (12%) of their monthly salary on
the "A" salary schedule.
(2) Licensed teachers who are classified as "M" teachers shall receive a salary
supplement each month of ten percent (10%) of their monthly salary on the
"A" salary schedule.
(3) Licensed teachers with licensure based on academic preparation at the
six-year degree level shall receive a salary supplement of one hundred
twenty-six dollars ($126.00) per month in addition to the supplement provided
to them as "M" teachers.
(4) Licensed teachers with licensure based on academic preparation at the
doctoral degree level shall receive a salary supplement of two hundred
fifty-three dollars ($253.00) per month in addition to the supplement provided
to them as "M" teachers.
(5) Certified school nurses shall receive a salary supplement each month of ten
percent (10%) of their monthly salary on the "A" salary schedule.
(6) School counselors who are licensed as counselors at the master's degree level
or higher shall receive a salary supplement each month of one hundred dollars
($100.00).
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 17

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 7A.1.(d) For school psychologists, school speech pathologists who are
licensed as speech pathologists at the master's degree level or higher, and school audiologists
who are licensed as audiologists at the master's degree level or higher, the following shall apply:
(1) The first step of the salary schedule shall be equivalent to the sixth step of the
"A" salary schedule.
(2) These employees shall receive the following salary supplements each month:
a. Ten percent (10%) of their monthly salary, excluding the supplement
provided pursuant to sub-subdivision b. of this subdivision.
b. Three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00).
(3) These employees are eligible to receive salary supplements equivalent to those
of teachers for academic preparation at the six-year degree level or the
doctoral degree level.
(4) The twenty-sixth step of the salary schedule shall be seven and one-half
percent (7.5%) higher than the salary received by these same employees on
the twenty-fifth step of the salary schedule.
SECTION 7A.1.(e) Beginning with the 2014-2015 fiscal year, in lieu of providing
annual longevity payments to teachers paid on the teacher salary schedule, the amounts of those
longevity payments are included in the monthly amounts under the teacher salary schedule.
SECTION 7A.1.(f) A teacher compensated in accordance with this salary schedule
for the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school year shall receive an amount equal to the greater of the
following:
(1) The applicable amount on the salary schedule for the applicable school year.
(2) For teachers who were eligible for longevity for the 2013-2014 school year,
the sum of the following:
a. The salary the teacher received in the 2013-2014 school year pursuant
to Section 35.11 of S.L. 2013-360.
b. The longevity that the teacher would have received under the longevity
system in effect for the 2013-2014 school year provided in Section
35.11 of S.L. 2013-360 based on the teacher's current years of service.
c. The annual bonus provided in Section 9.1(e) of S.L. 2014-100.
(3) For teachers who were not eligible for longevity for the 2013-2014 school
year, the sum of the salary and annual bonus the teacher received in the
2014-2015 school year pursuant to Section 9.1 of S.L. 2014-100.
SECTION 7A.1.(g) As used in this section, the term "teacher" shall also include
instructional support personnel.

RESTORE MASTER'S PAY
SECTION 7A.2.(a) The following session laws are repealed:
(1) Section 8.22 of S.L. 2013-360.
(2) Section 8.3 of S.L. 2014-100.
SECTION 7A.2.(b) G.S. 115C-302.10 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-302.10. Qualifications for certain education-based salary supplements.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, only the following teachers and
instructional support personnel shall be paid on the "M" salary schedule or receive a salary
supplement for academic preparation at the six-year degree level or at the doctoral degree level:
(1) Certified school nurses and instructional support personnel in positions for
which a master's degree is required for licensure.
(2) Teachers and instructional support personnel who were paid on the "M" salary
schedule or received that salary supplement prior to the 2014-15 school year.
(3) Teachers and instructional support personnel who (i) complete a degree at the
master's, six-year, or doctoral degree level for which they completed at least
Page 18 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
one course prior to August 1, 2013, and (ii) would have qualified for the salary
supplement pursuant to State Board of Education policy, TCPA006, as it was
in effect on June 30, 2013.
(4) Teachers who do not qualify under subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) of this section
but who spend at least seventy percent (70%) of their time as follows:
a. For teachers, in classroom instruction related to their graduate
academic preparation in their field or subject area within their area of
licensure. Most of the teachers' remaining time shall be spent in one or
more of the following:
1. Mentoring teachers.
2. Performing demonstration lessons for teachers.
3. Writing curricula.
4. Developing and leading staff development programs for
teachers
b. For instructional support personnel, performing work within the
employee's area of graduate academic preparation.
(b) Beginning with the 2025-2026 fiscal year and in subsequent fiscal years, for teachers
who are paid on the "M" salary schedule under subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this act,
determination of whether teachers shall be paid on the "M" salary schedule or receive a salary
supplement for academic preparation shall take place on an annual basis. Teachers may be moved
off the "M" salary schedule or discontinue receiving salary supplements if they are not meeting
the requirements of subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this act in that year.
(c) Unless an individual otherwise qualifies under subdivision (2) or (3) of subsection (a)
of this section, teachers and instructional support personnel who earn an advanced degree in
school administration shall not be paid on the "M" salary schedule or receive a salary supplement
for academic preparation."

CONSOLIDATED TEACHER BONUS PROGRAM
SECTION 7A.3.(a) Establish Consolidated Bonus Program. – The State Board of
Education shall establish a consolidated teacher bonus program for the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium to reward teacher performance and encourage student learning and improvement. To
attain this goal, the Department of Public Instruction shall administer bonus pay to qualifying
teachers whose salaries are supported from State funds in January of 2026 and 2027, based on
data from the 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 school years, respectively, in accordance with this
section.
SECTION 7A.3.(b) Definitions. – For purposes of this section, the following
definitions shall apply:
(1) Eligible advanced course teacher. – A teacher of Advanced Placement
courses, International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme courses, or the
Cambridge Advanced International Certificate of Education (AICE) program
who meets the following criteria:
a. Is employed by, or retired having last held a position at, one or more
of the following:
1. A qualifying public school unit.
2. The North Carolina Virtual Public School program.
b. Taught one or more students who received a score listed in subsection
(c) of this section.
(2) Eligible career and technical education (CTE) teacher. – A teacher who meets
the following criteria:
a. Is employed by, or retired having last held a position at, a qualifying
public school unit.
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 19

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Taught one or more students who attained approved industry
certifications or credentials consistent with G.S. 115C-156.2.
(3) Eligible growth teacher. – A teacher who meets at least one of the following
criteria:
a. Is employed by, or retired having last held a position at, a qualifying
public school unit and meets one of the following criteria:
1. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the State
according to the EVAAS student growth index score for third
grade reading from the previous school year.
2. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the State
according to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth
or fifth grade reading from the previous school year.
3. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the State
according to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth,
fifth, sixth, seventh, or eighth grade mathematics from the
previous school year.
b. Is employed by, or retired having last held a position at, a local school
administrative unit and meets one of the following criteria:
1. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the
teacher's respective local school administrative unit according
to the EVAAS student growth index score for third grade
reading from the previous school year.
2. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the
teacher's respective local school administrative unit according
to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth or fifth
grade reading from the previous school year.
3. Is in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of teachers in the
teacher's respective local school administrative unit according
to the EVAAS student growth index score for fourth, fifth,
sixth, seventh, or eighth grade mathematics from the previous
school year.
c. Was employed by a local school administrative unit that employed in
the previous school year three or fewer total teachers in that teacher's
grade level as long as the teacher has an EVAAS student growth index
score from the previous school year of exceeded expected growth in
one of the following subject areas:
1. Third grade reading.
2. Fourth or fifth grade reading.
3. Fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh, or eighth grade mathematics.
(4) EVAAS. – The Education Value-Added Assessment System.
(5) Qualifying public school unit. – Any of the following:
a. A local school administrative unit.
b. A charter school.
c. A regional school.
d. A school providing elementary or secondary instruction operated by
The University of North Carolina under Article 29A of Chapter 116 of
the General Statutes.
(6) Qualifying teacher. – An eligible teacher who meets one of the following
criteria:
a. Remains employed teaching in the same qualifying public school unit,
or, if an eligible advanced course teacher is only employed by the
Page 20 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
North Carolina Virtual Public School program, remains employed
teaching in that program, at least from the school year the data is
collected until January 1 of the corresponding school year that the
bonus is paid.
b. Retired, between the last day of the school year in which the data is
collected and January 1 of the corresponding school year in which the
bonus is paid, after attaining one of the following:
1. The age of at least 65 with five years of creditable service.
2. The age of at least 60 with 25 years of creditable service.
3. Thirty years of creditable service.
SECTION 7A.3.(c) Advanced Course Bonuses. – A bonus in the amount of fifty
dollars ($50.00) shall be provided to qualifying advanced course teachers for each student taught
in each advanced course who receives the following score:
(1) For Advanced Placement courses, a score of three or higher on the College
Board Advanced Placement Examination.
(2) For International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme courses, a score of four
or higher on the International Baccalaureate course examination.
(3) For the Cambridge AICE program, a score of "E" or higher on the Cambridge
AICE program examinations.
SECTION 7A.3.(d) CTE Bonuses. – For qualifying career and technical education
teachers, bonuses shall be provided in the following amounts:
(1) A bonus in the amount of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each student taught
by a teacher who provided instruction in a course that led to the attainment of
an industry certification or credential with a twenty-five dollar ($25.00) value
ranking as determined under subsection (e) of this section.
(2) A bonus in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each student taught by a
teacher who provided instruction in a course that led to the attainment of an
industry certification or credential with a fifty dollar ($50.00) value ranking
as determined under subsection (e) of this section.
SECTION 7A.3.(e) CTE Course Value Ranking. – The Department of Commerce,
in consultation with the State Board, shall assign a value ranking for each industry certification
and credential based on academic rigor and employment value in accordance with this subsection.
Fifty percent (50%) of the ranking shall be based on academic rigor and the remaining fifty
percent (50%) on employment value. Academic rigor and employment value shall be based on
the following elements:
(1) Academic rigor shall be based on the number of instructional hours, including
work experience or internship hours, required to earn the industry certification
or credential, with extra weight given for coursework that also provides
community college credit.
(2) Employment value shall be based on the entry wage, growth rate in
employment for each occupational category, and average annual openings for
the primary occupation linked with the industry certification or credential.
SECTION 7A.3.(f) Statewide Growth Bonuses. – Of the funds appropriated in this
act for the program, bonuses shall be provided to qualifying teachers who are eligible teachers
under sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section, as follows:
(1) The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be allocated for bonuses to
eligible teachers under sub-sub-subdivision a.1. of subdivision (3) of
subsection (b) of this section. These funds shall be distributed equally among
qualifying teachers.
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 21

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) A bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be awarded to
each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision
a.2. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section.
(3) A bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be awarded to
each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision
a.3. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 7A.3.(g) Local Growth Bonuses. – Of the funds appropriated in this act
for the program, bonuses shall be provided to eligible teachers under sub-subdivisions b. and c.
of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section, as follows:
(1) The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be allocated for bonuses to
eligible EVAAS teachers under sub-sub-subdivisions b.1. and c.1. of
subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section. These funds shall be divided
proportionally based on average daily membership in third grade for each
local school administrative unit and then distributed equally among qualifying
third grade reading teachers in each local school administrative unit.
(2) A bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be awarded to
each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision
b.2. or c.2. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section.
(3) A bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be awarded to
each qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision
b.3. or c.3. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 7A.3.(h) Limitations and Other Criteria. – The following additional
limitations and other criteria shall apply to the program:
(1) Bonus funds awarded to a teacher pursuant to subsection (c), subsection (d),
subdivision (1) of subsection (f), and subdivision (1) of subsection (g) of this
section shall not exceed three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) per
subsection or subdivision in any given school year.
(2) A qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision a.1.,
b.1., or c.1. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section may receive a
bonus under both subdivision (1) of subsection (f) and subdivision (1) of
subsection (g) of this section but shall not receive more than seven thousand
dollars ($7,000) pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (f) and subdivision
(1) of subsection (g) of this section in any given school year.
(3) A qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision a.2.,
b.2., or c.2. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section may receive a
bonus under both subdivision (2) of subsection (f) and subdivision (2) of
subsection (g) of this section but shall not receive more than two bonuses
pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (f) and subdivision (2) of subsection
(g) of this section in any given school year.
(4) A qualifying teacher who is an eligible teacher under sub-sub-subdivision a.3.,
b.3., or c.3. of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section may receive a
bonus under both subdivision (3) of subsection (f) and subdivision (3) of
subsection (g) of this section but shall not receive more than two bonuses
pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection (f) and subdivision (3) of subsection
(g) of this section in any given school year.
SECTION 7A.3.(i) Bonuses Not Compensation. – Bonuses awarded to a teacher
pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any regular wage or other bonus the teacher receives
or is scheduled to receive. Notwithstanding G.S. 135-1(7a), the bonuses awarded under this
section are not compensation under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes, Retirement
System for Teachers and State Employees.
Page 22 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 7A.3.(j) Study and Report. – The State Board of Education shall study
the effect of the program on teacher performance and retention. The State Board shall report the
results of its findings and the amount of bonuses awarded to the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Joint Legislative Education Oversight
Committee, the Office of State Budget and Management, and the Fiscal Research Division by
March 15 of each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. The report shall include, at a minimum,
the following information:
(1) Number of students enrolled and taking examinations in each of the following
categories of courses:
a. Advanced Placement.
b. International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme.
c. Cambridge AICE program.
d. Courses needed for the attainment of an industry certification or
credential.
(2) Number of students receiving outcomes on examinations resulting in the
award of a bonus for a teacher in each category of courses identified in
sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) Number of teachers receiving a bonus in each category of courses identified
in sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(4) The amounts awarded to teachers for each category of courses identified in
sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(5) The type of industry certifications and credentials earned by the students, the
value ranking for each certification and credential, the number of bonuses
earned for each certification or credential, and the total bonus amount awarded
for each certification or credential.
(6) Average bonus amount awarded to each qualifying teacher who is an eligible
teacher under sub-sub-subdivision a.1., b.1., or c.1. of subdivision (3) of
subsection (b) of this section.
(7) The percentage of teachers who received a bonus pursuant to this section and
were eligible to receive a bonus for teaching in the same grade level or course
in January 2024 or January 2025, or both, where applicable, pursuant to one
of the following programs:
a. The Advanced Course and CTE Bonus Program provided in Section
7A.4 of S.L. 2021-180.
b. The Growth-Based Teacher Bonus Program provided in Section 7A.2
of S.L. of 2022-74.
(8) The percentage of teachers who received a bonus pursuant to this section and
received a bonus for teaching in the same grade level or course in either
January 2024 or January 2025 pursuant to one of the programs listed in
subdivision (7) of this subsection.
(9) The percentage of teachers who received a bonus pursuant to this section and
received a bonus for teaching in the same grade level or course in January
2024 or January 2025, or both, where applicable, pursuant to one of the
programs listed subdivision (7) of this subsection.
(10) The statistical relationship between a teacher receiving a bonus in January
2024 or 2025 pursuant to this section and receiving a bonus pursuant to a
predecessor bonus program. For purposes of this subdivision, the following
are predecessor programs:
a. Bonuses awarded pursuant to Section 7A.4(c) of S.L. 2021-180 are
predecessors to bonuses awarded pursuant to subsection (c) of this
section.
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 23

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Bonuses awarded pursuant to Section 7A.4(d) of S.L. 2021-180 are
predecessors to bonuses awarded pursuant to subsection (d) of this
section.
c. Bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (c) and
subdivision (1) of subsection (d) of Section 7A.2 of S.L. 2022-74 are
predecessors to bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivision (1) of
subsection (f) and subdivision (1) of subsection (g) of this section.
d. Bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (c) and
subdivision (2) of subsection (d) of Section 7A.2 of S.L. 2022-74 are
predecessors to bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivision (2) of
subsection (f) and subdivision (2) of subsection (g) of this section.
e. Bonuses awarded pursuant to subdivision (c)(3) and subdivision (d)(3)
of Section 7A.2 of S.L. 2022-74 are predecessors to bonuses awarded
pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection (f) and subdivision (3) of
subsection (g) of this section.
(11) The distribution of statewide and local growth bonuses awarded pursuant to
this section as among qualifying public school units and, where applicable,
schools within those units.

SUPPLEMENTAL FUNDS FOR TEACHER COMPENSATION
SECTION 7A.4.(a) Use of Funds. – For each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium,
except as provided in subsection (f1) of this section, the State Board of Education shall allocate
funds pursuant to this section to eligible local school administrative units to provide salary
supplements to teachers and qualifying school administrators in those units. Allocation of salary
supplements among teachers and qualifying school administrators within each eligible local
school administrative unit, including whether a teacher or qualifying school administrator
receives a salary supplement and the amount of the supplement provided to that person, shall be
determined in the discretion of the local board of education of the eligible unit, except that no
individual salary supplement shall exceed the per teacher funding amount awarded to that unit
pursuant to subdivision (4) of subsection (c) of this section.
SECTION 7A.4.(b) Definitions. – As used in this section, the following definitions
shall apply:
(1) Adjusted market value of taxable real property. – A county's assessed taxable
real property value, using the latest available data published by the
Department of Revenue, divided by the county's sales assessment ratio
determined under G.S. 105-289(h).
(2) Composite value. – For each eligible county, the sum of the following:
a. The taxable real property factor multiplied by sixty-five percent
(65%).
b. The median household income factor multiplied by twenty-five
percent (25%).
c. The effective tax rate factor multiplied by ten percent (10%).
(3) County allocation factor. – For each eligible county, the supplement factor for
that county divided by the sum of all supplement factors for the State.
(4) Effective tax rate. – The actual county tax rate multiplied by the most recent
annual sales assessment ratio for that county.
(5) Effective tax rate factor. – For each eligible county, the effective tax rate for
that county divided by the median effective tax rate in the State.
(6) Eligible county. – A county that has an adjusted market value of taxable real
property of less than fifty billion nine hundred million dollars
($50,900,000,000).
Page 24 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(7) Eligible local school administrative unit. – A local school administrative unit
located in whole or in part in an eligible county.
(8) Eligible school. – A public school that is located in an eligible county and
governed by a local school administrative unit.
(9) Maintenance of effort amount. – For each local school administrative unit in
each fiscal year, the supplant factor multiplied by the total State and non-State
funds expended for salaries for teachers from the fiscal year for which the
most recent salary data are available.
(10) Median household income. – A county's median household income for the
most recent 12 months for which data are available, as that term is used in
G.S. 143B-437.08.
(11) Median household income factor. – For each eligible county, the median
household income in the State divided by the median household income for
that county.
(12) Non-State funds. – Any funds held by a local school administrative unit, other
than nonrecurring federal funds received as a result of legislation enacted by
Congress in response to COVID19, that are not State funds.
(13) Qualifying school administrator. – Any of the following:
a. Assistant principals paid pursuant to G.S. 115C-285(a)(8).
b. Principals paid pursuant to G.S. 115C-285(a)(8a).
(14) Supplant factor. – For each local school administrative unit in each fiscal year
of the fiscal biennium, the total non-State funds expended for salary
supplements for teachers in the 2020-2021 fiscal year divided by the total
State and non-State funds expended for salaries for teachers in the 2020-2021
fiscal year.
(15) Supplement factor. – For each eligible county, the composite value multiplied
by the number of State-funded teachers employed in a school in the county
that is governed by a local school administrative unit.
(16) Taxable real property factor. – For each eligible county, the median adjusted
market value of taxable real property in the State divided by the adjusted
market value of taxable real property for that county.
(17) Teacher. – Teachers and instructional support personnel.
SECTION 7A.4.(c) Allocation of Funds. – The State Board of Education shall
allocate funds for salary supplements to eligible local school administrative units according to
the following procedure:
(1) County allocation. – For each eligible county, the State Board shall determine
a county allocation by multiplying the county allocation factor for that county
by the funding amount appropriated pursuant to this section for the applicable
fiscal year.
(2) Per teacher funding amount. – For each eligible county, the State Board shall
determine a per teacher funding amount by dividing the county allocation
amounts determined pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection by the total
number of State-funded teachers employed in all eligible schools in that
county.
(3) Unit funding amount. – For each eligible local school administrative unit, the
State Board shall determine the funding amount for that unit based on the per
teacher funding amount or amounts for the eligible county or counties where
the unit is located. For each county with an eligible school governed by the
unit, the State Board shall multiply the applicable per teacher funding amount
for that county determined pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection by
the number of State-funded teachers employed in the eligible school in that
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 25

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
county. If the unit is located in multiple eligible counties, the State Board shall
aggregate those amounts.
(4) Allocation and funding cap. – The State Board shall allocate the amount
determined pursuant to subdivision (3) of this subsection to each eligible local
school administrative unit for each applicable fiscal year, up to a maximum of
five thousand dollars ($5,000) per State-funded teacher.
SECTION 7A.4.(d) Charter Schools. – Funds appropriated to the Department of
Public Instruction pursuant to this section shall be subject to the allocation of funds for charter
schools described in G.S. 115C-218.105. The General Assembly encourages charter schools
receiving funds pursuant to this section to provide salary supplements to teachers and qualifying
school administrators in the charter school in accordance with the requirements of this section.
SECTION 7A.4.(e) Formula for Distribution of Supplemental Funding Pursuant to
this Section Only. – The formula in this section is solely a basis for distribution of supplemental
funding to eligible local school administrative units and is not intended to reflect any measure of
the adequacy of the educational program or funding for public schools. The formula is also not
intended to reflect any commitment by the General Assembly to appropriate any additional
supplemental funds for eligible local school administrative units.
SECTION 7A.4.(f) Non-supplant Requirement. – A local school administrative unit
that receives funds under this section shall use those funds to supplement non-State funds
provided for salary supplements for teachers and qualifying school administrators and shall not
use any State funds, including funds received under this section or Section 7A.12 of S.L.
2021-180, to supplant non-State funds provided for salary supplements for teachers and
qualifying school administrators. For purposes of this section, a local school administrative unit
has supplanted non-State funds if the State Board finds that the amount of non-State funds
expended by the unit for salary supplements was less than ninety-five percent (95%) of the
maintenance of effort amount for the local school administrative unit.
SECTION 7A.4.(f1) Non-supplant Enforcement. – If the State Board of Education
determines that a local school administrative unit has supplanted non-State funds in violation of
subsection (f) of this section, the State Board of Education shall not allocate any funds under this
section to the unit.
SECTION 7A.4.(f2) Additional Penalty for Consecutive Supplanting. – It is the
intent of the General Assembly that the State Board of Education will not allocate supplemental
funds for teacher compensation to a local school administrative unit in the 2025-2026 fiscal year
if the State Board of Education determines that the local school administrative unit supplanted
non-State funds provided for salary supplements for teachers and qualifying school
administrators with State funds in the 2021-2022 fiscal year and the 2022-2023 fiscal year. For
the 2021-2022 fiscal year, the State Board shall not deem a local school administrative unit to
have supplanted non-State funds for purposes of this subsection if the State Board determines
that the unit supplanted non-State funds solely with any State funds for which the allowable uses
include salary supplements for teachers or qualifying school administrators.
SECTION 7A.4.(g) Reports. – No later than April 15 of each year of the 2025-2027
fiscal biennium, the State Board of Education shall report the following information for the
applicable fiscal year to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Fiscal
Research Division:
(1) A list of all eligible counties and eligible local school administrative units.
(2) Funds allocated to each eligible local school administrative unit.
(3) The percentage and amount of teachers and qualifying school administrators
in each eligible local school administrative unit receiving salary supplements.
(4) The average salary supplement amount in each eligible local school
administrative unit.
Page 26 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) The range of salary supplement amounts in each eligible local school
administrative unit.
(6) The effect of the salary supplements on the retention of teachers and
qualifying school administrators in eligible local school administrative units.
(7) The identity of any local school administrative unit that the State Board
determines has supplanted funds.

PRINCIPAL SALARY SCHEDULE
SECTION 7A.5.(a) The following annual salary schedule for principals shall apply
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2025.
2025-2026 Principal Annual Salary Schedule
Avg. Daily Membership Base Met Growth Exceeded Growth
0-200 $80,126 $88,137 $96,151
201-400 $84,131 $92,544 $100,958
401-700 $88,137 $96,952 $105,766
701-1,000 $92,145 $101,358 $110,574
1,001-1,600 $96,151 $105,766 $115,381
1,601+ $100,156 $110,172 $120,188
SECTION 7A.5.(b) The following annual salary schedule for principals shall apply
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2026.
2026-2027 Principal Annual Salary Schedule
Avg. Daily Membership Base Met Growth Exceeded Growth
0-200 $84,934 $93,425 $101,920
201-400 $89,179 $98,097 $107,015
401-700 $93,425 $102,769 $112,112
701-1,000 $97,674 $107,439 $117,208
1,001-1,600 $101,920 $112,112 $122,304
1,601+ $106,165 $116,782 $127,399

SECTION 7A.5.(c) A principal's placement on the salary schedule shall be
determined according to the average daily membership of the school supervised by the principal,
as described in subsection (b) of this section, and the school growth scores, calculated pursuant
to G.S. 115C-83.15(c), for each school the principal supervised in at least one of the prior two
school years, as described in subsection (c) of this section, regardless of a break in service, and
provided the principal supervised each school as a principal for at least a majority of the school
year, as follows:
(1) A principal shall be paid according to the Exceeded Growth column of the
schedule if the school growth scores show the school or schools exceeded
expected growth in at least one of the prior two school years.
(2) A principal shall be paid according to the Met Growth column of the schedule
if any of the following apply:
a. The higher school growth score in one of the two prior school years
shows that the school met expected growth.
b. The principal supervised a school in the two prior school years that
was not eligible to receive a school growth score.
(3) A principal shall be paid according to the Base column if either of the
following apply:
a. The school growth scores show the school or schools did not meet
expected growth in either of the two prior years.
b. The principal has not supervised any school as a principal for a
majority of the school year in at least the two prior school years.
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 27

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 7A.5.(d) For purposes of determining the average daily membership of a
principal's school, the following amounts shall be used during the following time periods:
(1) For the 2025-2026 school year, placement on the schedule related to average daily
membership shall be based on the average daily membership for the school from
the 2024-2025 school year. If the school did not have an average daily
membership in the 2024-2025 school year, the projected average daily
membership for the school for the 2025-2026 school year shall be used between
July 1, 2025, and December 31, 2025, and the average daily membership for the
school shall be used between January 1, 2026 and June 30, 2026.
(2) For the 2026-2027 school year, placement on the schedule related to average daily
membership shall be based on the average daily membership for the school from
the 2025-2026 school year. If the school did not have an average daily
membership in the 2025-2026 school year, the projected average daily
membership for the school for the 2026-2027 school year shall be used between
July 1, 2026 and December 31, 2026, and the average daily membership for the
school shall be used between January 1, 2027 and June 30, 2027.
SECTION 7A.5.(e) For purposes of determining the school growth scores for each
school the principal supervised in one or more prior school years, the following school growth
scores shall be used during the following time periods:
(1) For purposes of determining the school growth scores for each principal in the
2025-2026 school year, school growth scores from the two most recent available
school years, up to the 2024-2025 school year, shall be used.
(2) For purposes of determining the school growth scores for each principal in the
2026-2027 school year, school growth scores from the two most recent available
school years, up to the 2025-2026 school year, shall be used.
SECTION 7A.5.(f) Beginning with the 2017-2018 fiscal year, in lieu of providing
annual longevity payments to principals paid on the principal salary schedule, the amounts of
those longevity payments are included in the annual amounts under the principal salary schedule.
SECTION 7A.5.(g) A principal compensated in accordance with this section for the
2025-2026 and 2026-27 fiscal year shall receive an amount equal to the greater of the following:
(1) The applicable amount determined pursuant to subsections (a) through (d) of
this section.
(2) For principals who were eligible for longevity in the 2016-2017 fiscal year,
the sum of the following:
a. The salary the principal received in the 2016-2017 fiscal year pursuant
to Section 9.1 or Section 9.2 of S.L. 2016-94.
b. The longevity that the principal would have received as provided for
State employees under the North Carolina Human Resources Act for
the 2016-2017 fiscal year based on the principal's current years of
service.
(3) For principals who were not eligible for longevity in the 2016-17 fiscal year,
the salary the principal received in the 2016-2017 fiscal year pursuant to
Section 9.1 or Section 9.2 of S.L. 2016-94.

BONUSES FOR PRINCIPALS
SECTION 7A.6.(a) The Department of Public Instruction shall administer a bonus
in the 2025-2026 fiscal year to any principal who supervised a school as a principal for a majority
of the previous school year if that school was in the top fifty percent (50%) of school growth in
the State during the previous school year, calculated by the State Board pursuant to
G.S. 115C-83.15(c), as follows:
2025-2026 Principal Bonus Schedule
Page 28 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Statewide Growth Percentage Bonus
Top 5% $15,000
Top 10% $10,000
Top 15% $5,000
Top 20% $2,500
Top 50% $1,000
A principal shall receive no more than one bonus pursuant to this subsection. The
bonus shall be paid at the highest amount for which the principal qualifies.
SECTION 7A.6.(b) The bonus awarded pursuant to this section shall be in addition
to any regular wage or other bonus the principal receives or is scheduled to receive.
SECTION 7A.6.(c) Notwithstanding G.S. 135-1(7a), the bonuses awarded pursuant
to this section are not compensation under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes,
Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees.
SECTION 7A.6.(d) It is the intent of the General Assembly that funds provided
pursuant to this section will supplement principal compensation and not supplant local funds.
SECTION 7A.6.(e) The bonus provided pursuant to this section shall be paid no
later than October 31, 2025, to qualifying principals employed as of October 1, 2025.

ASSISTANT PRINCIPAL SALARIES
SECTION 7A.7.(a) For the 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 fiscal years, assistant
principals shall receive a monthly salary based on the relevant salary schedule for teachers shown
in Section 7A.1(a) who are classified as "A" teachers plus nineteen percent (19%). An assistant
principal shall be placed on the step on the salary schedule that reflects the total number of years
of experience as a certified employee of the public schools. For purposes of this section, an
administrator with a one-year provisional assistant principal's certificate shall be considered
equivalent to an assistant principal.
SECTION 7A.7.(b) Assistant principals with certification based on academic
preparation at the six-year degree level shall be paid a salary supplement of one hundred
twenty-six dollars ($126.00) per month and at the doctoral degree level shall be paid a salary
supplement of two hundred fifty-three dollars ($253.00) per month.
SECTION 7A.7.(c) Participants in an approved full-time master's in school
administration program shall receive up to a 10-month stipend during the internship period of the
master's program. The stipend shall be at the beginning salary of an assistant principal or, for a
teacher who becomes an intern, at least as much as that person would earn as a teacher on the
teacher salary schedule. The North Carolina Principal Fellows Program or the school of education
where the intern participates in a full-time master's in school administration program shall supply
the Department of Public Instruction with certification of eligible fulltime interns.
SECTION 7A.7.(d) Beginning with the 2017-2018 fiscal year, in lieu of providing
annual longevity payments to assistant principals on the assistant principal salary schedule, the
amounts of those longevity payments are included in the monthly amounts provided to assistant
principals pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 7A.7.(e) An assistant principal compensated in accordance with this
section for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall receive an amount equal to the greater of the
following:
(1) The applicable amount determined pursuant to subsections (a) through (d) of
this section.
(2) For assistant principals who were eligible for longevity in the 2016-2017 fiscal
year, the sum of the following:
a. The salary the assistant principal received in the 2016-2017 fiscal year
pursuant to Section 9.1 or Section 9.2 of S.L. 2016-94.
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 29

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. The longevity that the assistant principal would have received as
provided for State employees under the North Carolina Human
Resources Act for the 2016-2017 fiscal year based on the assistant
principal's current years of service.
(3) For assistant principals who were not eligible for longevity in the 2016-2017
fiscal year, the salary the assistant principal received in the 2016-2017 fiscal
year pursuant to Section 9.1 or Section 9.2 of S.L. 2016-94.

CENTRAL OFFICE SALARIES
SECTION 7A.8.(a) For the 2025-2026 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2025, the
annual salary for superintendents, assistant superintendents, associate superintendents,
directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance officers, whose salaries are supported from State
funds, shall be increased by three percent (3%).
SECTION 7A.8.(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to increase the annual
salary for superintendents, assistant superintendents, associate superintendents,
directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance officers, whose salaries are supported from State
funds, in the 2026-27 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2026, by three percent (3%).
SECTION 7A.8.(c) The monthly salary maximums that follow apply to assistant
superintendents, associate superintendents, directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance
officers for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2025:
2025-2026 Fiscal Year
Maximum
School Administrator I $7,800
School Administrator II $8,265
School Administrator III $8,757
School Administrator IV $9,099
School Administrator V $9,463
School Administrator VI $10,023
School Administrator VII $10,424
The local board of education shall determine the appropriate category and placement
for each assistant superintendent, associate superintendent, director/coordinator, supervisor, or
finance officer within the maximums and within funds appropriated by the General Assembly
for central office administrators and superintendents. The category in which an employee is
placed shall be included in the contract of any employee.
SECTION 7A.8.(d) The monthly salary maximums that follow apply to public
school superintendents for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2025:
2025-2026 Fiscal Year
Maximum
Superintendent I $11,049
Superintendent II $11,707
Superintendent III $12,410
Superintendent IV $13,156
Superintendent V $13,947
The local board of education shall determine the appropriate category and placement
for the superintendent based on the average daily membership of the local school administrative
unit and within funds appropriated by the General Assembly for central office administrators and
superintendents.
SECTION 7A.8.(e) Longevity pay for superintendents, assistant superintendents,
associate superintendents, directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance officers shall be as
provided for State employees under the North Carolina Human Resources Act.
Page 30 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 7A.8.(f) Superintendents, assistant superintendents, associate
superintendents, directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance officers with certification based
on academic preparation at the six-year degree level shall receive a salary supplement of one
hundred twenty-six dollars ($126.00) per month in addition to the compensation provided
pursuant to this section. Superintendents, assistant superintendents, associate superintendents,
directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance officers with certification based on academic
preparation at the doctoral degree level shall receive a salary supplement of two hundred
fifty-three dollars ($253.00) per month in addition to the compensation provided for under this
section.
SECTION 7A.8.(g) The State Board of Education shall not permit local school
administrative units to transfer State funds from other funding categories for salaries for public
school central office administrators.

NON-CERTIFIED PERSONNEL SALARIES
SECTION 7A.9.(a) For the 2025-2026 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2025, the
annual salary for non-certified public school employees whose salaries are supported from State
funds shall be increased as follows:
(1) For permanent, full-time employees on a 12-month contract, by three percent
(3%).
(2) For the following employees, by a prorated and equitable amount based on the
amount specified in subdivision (1) of this subsection:
a. Permanent, full-time employees on a contract for fewer than 12
months.
b. Permanent, part-time employees.
c. Temporary and permanent hourly employees.

PART VIII. THE UNIVERSITY OF NORTH CAROLINA SYSTEM

UNC PERFORMANCE FUNDING
SECTION 8.1.(a) Part 1 of Article 1 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 116‐11.5. Institutional performance accountability.
(a) Implementation of Accountability Measures and Performance Standards. ‐ The UNC
Board of Governors shall adopt and implement a system of accountability measures and
performance standards for the constituent institutions. At least once every three years, the Board
shall review, and revise, as necessary, the accountability measures and performance standards to
ensure that they are appropriate for use in recognition of successful institutional performance.
(b) Recognition of Successful Institutional Performance. ‐ Subject to the availability of
funds, the Board of Governors may allocate funds among constituent institutions based on the
evaluation of each institution's performance, including at least the following components:
(1) Performance change evaluated by determining a college's rate of student
success on each measure as compared to an institution‐specific baseline and
goal.
(2) Institutional impact based on the number of degree completers.
The Board may also allocate funds to specific institutions warranting targeted
support to increase institutional performance or adapt to significant
enrollment changes. Institutions shall use funds allocated to it pursuant to this
subsection to support strategies to improve institutional performance.
(c) Reporting Requirement. – The UNC Board of Governors shall report annually on the
implementation of this section consistent with G.S. 116‐11(9b)."

Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 31

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 8.1.(b) G.S. 116‐11 reads as rewritten:
"§ 116‐11. Powers and duties generally.
(9b) The Board of Governors shall report by February March 1 of each year to the
Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the Senate Appropriations
Committee on Education/Higher Education, the House of Representatives
Appropriations Subcommittee on Education, and the Fiscal Research Division
on the actions and adjustments necessary to its budgetary policies, regulations,
and standards resulting from the Current Operations Appropriations Act for
the administration and operation of The University of North Carolina and the
distribution of State and federal funds to constituent institutions. The report
shall include at least the following information for each constituent institution:
a. Guidelines related to State salaries of University of North Carolina
employees, including range, median, and mean of faculty salaries at the
institution.
b. Budget allocations and reductions, including for operating expenses and
specific programs.
c. Distribution of additional State allocations for enrollment funding.
d. Use of State funds and budget flexibility.
e. Availability of federal funds.
f. Tuition and fees.
g. Composition of the student population at the institution, including
headcount enrollment and full-time student enrollment for both
undergraduate and graduate students, and aggregate data on residency
status, median household income, gender, race, and ethnicity.
h. Student retention and graduation rates.
i. Postsecondary educational attainment rate at the institution, including
comparison to statewide data.
j. A comparison to prior fiscal year expenditures and appropriations.
k. The total amount of mandatory student fee revenue collected by institution
and fee type.
l. Any source of student auxiliary revenue that represents greater than ten
percent (10%) of the overall student auxiliary revenue by institution and
revenue type.
m. Any source of sales revenue that represents greater than ten percent (10%)
of the overall student auxiliary revenue by institution and revenue type.
n. Institutional performance on accountability measures adopted by the
Board of Governors pursuant to G.S. 116-11.5."

COMPLETION ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS
SECTION 8.2.(a) For purposes of this section, the term "eligible constituent
institutions" refers to the following constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina:
(1) Elizabeth City State University
(2) Fayetteville State University
(3) NC Central University
(4) University of North Carolina at Pembroke
(5) Winston-Salem State University
SECTION 8.2.(b) The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina
shall establish a Completion Assistance Program (Program) at each eligible constituent
institution. At a minimum, each Program shall meet the following criteria:
(1) A student enrolled in a Program established by this section may receive up to
one thousand dollars ($1,000) per academic semester under the Program to
Page 32 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
pay for the costs of continuing attendance and earning necessary credit hours
at the eligible constituent institution.
(2) A student shall be eligible to receive funds under a Program if the student
meets at least the following requirements:
a. Needs financial assistance to remain enrolled at the eligible constituent
institution and earn credits necessary to graduate on time.
b. Is a resident for tuition purposes, as provided in G.S. 116‐143.1.
c. Meets satisfactory academic progress, as determined by the Board.
d. Has completed or is on track to complete at least 60 academic credit hours
by the end of the semester in which the funds are provided.
e. Has completed the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) for
the academic year in which the funds are provided.
f. Has an unpaid balance with the eligible constituent institution. This may
include an unpaid balance for tuition, fees, room, board, or other expenses
of attendance.
SECTION 8.2.(c) The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall
report on each Completion Assistance Program established pursuant to this section to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee no later than March 15, 2027. The report shall
include, at a minimum, an analysis of the impact of each Program on the following:
(1) On‐time graduation rates.
(2) Student debt at graduation.
SECTION 8.2.(d) Of the funds appropriated in this act to the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina for Completion Assistance Programs, the Board shall
allocate funds to each eligible constituent institution of The University of North Carolina
proportional to the number of undergraduate students enrolled at each eligible constituent
institution who are residents of North Carolina and recipients of a federal Pell Grant.

EXPAND CHEATHAM‐WHITE SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM
SECTION 8.3.(a) G.S. 116‐290 reads as rewritten:
"§ 116‐290. Cheatham‑White Scholarships; establishment and purpose; benefits.
(a) Scholarships Established; Purpose. – The Cheatham‐White Scholarships are
established as a merit scholarship program at North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State
University, and at North Carolina Central University, and Winston‐Salem State University. The
purpose of the scholarships is to provide an outstanding educational experience for students who
are exceptional scholars, versatile and well‐ rounded individuals with a broad range of interests,
and who are accomplished and proficient in areas of both the arts and the sciences. They must
also demonstrate leadership potential and a strong commitment to service.
(b) Scholarship Benefits. – Each scholarship is a fully funded four‐year scholarship that
covers the cost of all of the following: full tuition, student fees, housing, meals, textbooks, a
laptop, supplies, travel, and personal expenses. Each scholarship also provides four summers of
fully funded enrichment and networking opportunities that may include international travel and
study.
(c) Number of Scholarships Awarded. – Up to 50 150 scholarships, 40 120 for resident
students and 10 30 for nonresident students, may be awarded each academic year to students
admitted to North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University. Up to 50 100
scholarships, 40 80 for resident students and 10 20 for nonresident students, may be awarded each
academic year to students admitted to North Carolina Central University. Up to 50 scholarships,
40 for resident students and 10 for nonresident students, may be awarded each academic year to
students admitted to Winston‐Salem State University."
SECTION 8.3.(b) G.S. 116‐292(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 116‑292. Cheatham‑White Scholarships; eligibility and selection criteria.
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 33

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) Eligibility. – To be eligible to be nominated as a potential candidate for a Cheatham‐
White Scholarship, a person must satisfy all of the following criteria:
(1) Be a competitive applicant for admission as a freshman in the fall semester
into a baccalaureate program at either North Carolina Agricultural and
Technical State University, or North Carolina Central University, or
Winston-Salem State University.
(2) Be a United States citizen or permanent resident.
(3) Be on course to graduate from high school in the spring semester prior to
college admission."
SECTION 8.3.(c) G.S. 116‐294 reads as rewritten:
"§ 116‑294. Cheatham‑White Scholarships; administration of scholarships.
The University of North Carolina System Office shall administer the Cheatham‐White
Scholarships, in consultation and collaboration with North Carolina Agricultural and Technical
State University, and North Carolina Central University, and Winston‐Salem State University,
pursuant to policies adopted by the Board of Trustees of both constituent institutions. As part of
its administrative responsibilities, The University of North Carolina System Office, in
consultation and collaboration with North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University,
and North Carolina Central University, and Winston‐Salem State University, shall do all of the
following:
(1) Design and implement an application and school nomination process to be
used to identify potential scholarship candidates and a process for awarding
the scholarships.
…
(9) Any other function necessary for the successful implementation of the
Cheatham‐White Scholarships program and administration of the Cheatham‐
White Scholarships Fund. (2016‐94, s.11.4(e); 2018‐12, s. 12.)"

NORTH CAROLINA SCHOOL OF SCIENCE AND MATH RECEIPT FLEXIBILITY
SECTION 8.4. G.S. 116-30.3A reads as rewritten:
"§ 116-30.3A. Availability of excess receipts.
Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 143C of the General Statutes, receipts within The
University of North Carolina realized in excess of budgeted levels shall be available, up to a
maximum of ten percent (10%) above budgeted levels, for each Budget Code, in addition to
appropriations to support the operations generating the receipts as approved by the Director of
the Budget. This section shall not apply to the North Carolina School of Science and
Mathematics. The North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics shall be subject to
subsections b1 and b2 of G.S. 143C-6-4."

PART VIIIA. NORTH CAROLINA STATE EDUCATION ASSISTANCE AUTHORITY

GROWING THE HEALTHCARE WORKFORCE
SECTION 8A.1.(a) Establishment of the Fund. – Of the funds appropriated to the
Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina by this act for the 2025-26 fiscal year,
the Board shall use ten million ($10,000,000) to establish the Fund for Growing the Health Care
Workforce (Fund). Any unexpended funds remaining in the Fund at the end of the fiscal year
shall not revert to the General Fund but shall remain available for the purposes set forth in this
section through June 30, 2026. The Fund shall be used to assist independent college and
universities who participate in the State Need Based Grant in starting or expanding programs that
will grow the health care workforce, including through providing greater facility capacity for
trainees; increasing the numbers of health faculty and staff; and providing student support,
equipment and lab space.
Page 34 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 8A.1.(b) Report. – The Board shall submit an initial report to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee by December 1, 2026, and an annual report
thereafter for each year the Board provides funds, on the programs receiving the funds, which
shall include at least the following information:
(1) The institutions that received funds, the amount of funds, and the types of
programs started.
(2) The use of funds by each institution receiving awards, including costs
associated with student instruction, faculty salaries, instructional supplies,
related instructional equipment, and accreditation costs.
(3) Evaluation of the success of the new program receiving funds.

LONGLEAF COMMITMENT COMMUNITY COLLEGE GRANT CONSOLIDATION
SECTION 8A.2.(a) The recurring funds appropriated in S.L. 2023-134 to the Board
of Governors of The University of North Carolina for each year of the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium
to be allocated to the State Education Assistance Authority for the Longleaf Commitment
Community College Grant Program shall from the 2025-2026 fiscal year instead be allocated for
the North Carolina Need-Based Scholarship Program for Public Colleges and Universities for
eligible students enrolled in the North Carolina Community College System.
SECTION 8A.2.(b) G.S. 116-209.85(b) reads as rewritten:
"§ 116-209.85. Scholarship Reserve Fund for Public Colleges and Universities.
…
(b) The Authority shall create two reserves within the Reserve Fund as follows: The
University of North Carolina (UNC Reserve) and the North Carolina Community College System
(CC Reserve) from monies in the Reserve Fund. The funds in the reserves shall be used for
scholarships for the academic year that begins in the fiscal year following the fiscal year in which
the allocations are made to the reserves. Allocations shall be made from the reserves for the
amounts determined for the payment schedules for eligible postsecondary institutions pursuant
to G.S. 116‑209.83.
Beginning with the 2023‑2024 fiscal year and for each subsequent fiscal year, within the
funds available, the Authority shall allocate an amount equal to the amount from the prior fiscal
year for the UNC Reserve and the CC Reserve to each reserve, respectively, unless otherwise
agreed to by the President of The University of North Carolina and the President of the North
Carolina Community College System. Additional funds may be directed to the reserves from a
Current Operations Appropriations Act in a fiscal year. The reserves established for the
2022‑2023 fiscal year shall consist of the following funds:
(1) For the UNC Reserve, the monies shall consist of the following:
a. An amount equal to the amount appropriated to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina for The University of
North Carolina Need‑Based Financial Aid Program for the 2021‑2022
fiscal year.
b. An amount equal to the proportionate share of the appropriation for
the Education Lottery Scholarship Program based on awards of
financial assistance to students enrolled in The University of North
Carolina from the Education Lottery Scholarship Program for the
2017‑2018, 2018‑2019, and 2019‑2020 fiscal years.
(2) For the CC Reserve, the monies shall consist of the following:
a. An amount equal to the amount appropriated to the Community
Colleges System Office for the North Carolina Community College
Grant Program, except for funds set aside for the targeted assistance
program pursuant to G.S. 115D‑40.1, for the 2021‑2022 fiscal year.
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 35

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. An amount equal to the proportionate share of the appropriation for
the Education Lottery Scholarship based on awards of financial
assistance to students enrolled in North Carolina community colleges
from the Education Lottery Scholarship Program for the 2017‑2018,
2018‑2019, and 2019‑2020 fiscal years.
c. Beginning with the 2025-2026 fiscal year and thereafter an amount
equal to the amount appropriated to the Board of Governors of The
University of North Carolina for the Longleaf Commitment
Community College Grant Program for each year of the 2023-2025
fiscal biennium.
…."

OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIPS ACCOUNTABILITY
SECTION 8A.3.(a) G.S. 115C-562.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.1. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
…
(3a) Eligible student. – A student residing in North Carolina who has not yet received a
high school diploma and who meets all of the following requirements:
a. Is eligible to attend a North Carolina public school pursuant to Article 25 of this
Chapter. A child who is the age of 4 on or before April 16 is eligible to attend the
following school year if the principal, or equivalent, of the school in which the
child seeks to enroll finds that the student meets the requirements established by
the Authority pursuant to G.S. 115C562.2(d) and those findings are submitted to
the Authority.
b. Has not been enrolled in a postsecondary institution as a full-time student taking
at least 12 hours of academic credit.
c. Has not been placed in a nonpublic school or facility by a public agency at public
expense.
d. Received a scholarship grant during the previous school year."
SECTION 8A.3.(b) G.S. 115C-562.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.2. Scholarship grants.
(a) The Authority shall make available no later than February 1 annually applications to
eligible students for the award of scholarship grants to attend any nonpublic school on a full or
part-time basis. Information about scholarship grants and the application process shall be made
available on the Authority's Web site. Beginning March 15, the Authority shall begin awarding
scholarship grants to students who have applied by March 1 in the following order: according to
the following criteria:
(1) Eligible students who received a scholarship grant for the school year prior to
the school year for which the students are applying.
(2) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (1) of subsection (b2) of this section.
(3) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (2) of subsection (b2) of this section.
(4) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (3) of subsection (b2) of this section.
(5) All other students.
(b) Repealed by Session Laws 2023-134, s. 8A.6(c), effective July 1, 2023.
(b1) Repealed by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 8A.3(e), effective July 1, 2021.
(b2) Scholarship grants shall be awarded to eligible students as follows:
Page 36 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) For students residing in households with an income level not in excess of the
amount required for the student to qualify for the federal free or reduced-price
lunch program, per year per eligible student, an amount of up to one hundred
percent (100%) of the average State per pupil allocation for average daily
membership in the prior fiscal year.
(2) For students residing in households with an income level between the amount
required for the student to qualify for the federal free or reduced-price lunch
program and not in excess of two hundred percent (200%) of that amount, per
year per eligible student, an amount of up to ninety percent (90%) of the
average State per pupil allocation for average daily membership in the prior
fiscal year.
(3) For students residing in households with an income level of between two
hundred percent (200%) of the amount required for the student to qualify for
the federal free or reducedprice lunch program and not in excess of four
hundred fifty percent (450%) of that amount, per year per eligible student, an
amount of up to sixty percent (60%) of the average State per pupil allocation
for average daily membership in the prior fiscal year.
(4) For all students, per year per eligible student, an amount of up to fortyfive
percent (45%) of the average State per pupil allocation for average daily
membership in the prior fiscal year, unless the student qualifies for a higher
amount under this subsection.
(b3) Tuition and fees for a nonpublic school may include tuition and fees for books,
transportation, equipment, or other items required by the nonpublic school.
(b4) No scholarship grant shall exceed, per year per eligible student, an amount equal to
one hundred percent (100%) of the average State per pupil allocation for average daily
membership in the prior fiscal year, and no scholarship grant shall exceed the required tuition
and fees for the nonpublic school the eligible student will attend.
(b5) In addition to the amount of the scholarship grant, for any student receiving a
scholarship grant in grades three, eight, or 11, the Authority shall provide to the nonpublic school
an amount equal to the cost of the nationally standardized test required to be administered as
provided in G.S. 115C562.5."
SECTION 8A.3.(c) G.S. 115C-562.8(b) reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.8. The Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve.
(b) The General Assembly finds that, due to the critical need in this State to provide
opportunity for school choice for North Carolina students, it is imperative that the State provide
an increase of funds for 15 years to the Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve. Therefore,
there There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Reserve the following amounts for each
fiscal year to be used for the purposes set forth in this section:
Fiscal Year Appropriation
2017-2018 $44,840,000
2018-2019 $54,840,000
2019-2020 $64,840,000
2020-2021 $74,840,000
2021-2022 $84,840,000
2022-2023 $94,840,000
2023-2024 $176,540,000
2024-2025 $191,540,000
2025-2026 $625,000,000
2026-2027 $675,000,000
2027-2028 $700,000,000$194,124,036
2028-2029 $725,000,000$176,276,589
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 37

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
2029-2030 $750,000,000$156,209,738
2030-2031 $775,000,000$135,285,250
2031-2032 $800,000,000$114,800,340
2032-2033 $93,233,393
2033-2034 $70,197,091
2034-2035 $46,300,078
2035-2036 $22,046,485
For the 2032-2033 2036-2037 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, there is appropriated
from the General Fund to the Reserve the sum of eight hundred twenty-five million dollars
($825,000,000) zero dollars ($0) to be used for the purposes set forth in this section. When
developing the base budget, as defined by G.S. 143C-11, for each fiscal year specified in this
subsection, the Director of the Budget shall include the appropriated amount specified in this
subsection for that fiscal year."
SECTION 8A.3.(d) The State Education Assistance Authority shall not award
scholarship funds to new recipients pursuant to Part 2A of Article 39 of Subchapter X of Chapter
115C of the General Statutes after the 2024-2025 academic year.
SECTION 8A.3.(e) G.S. 115C-562.5(a) is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"§ 115C-562.5. Obligations of nonpublic schools accepting eligible students receiving
scholarship grants.
(3a) Academic Assessment. – A nonpublic school that accepts eligible students receiving
scholarship funds shall academically assess students on an annual basis for each school year at
the same grade levels as required by the State Board of Education for students in the public
schools pursuant to G.S. 115C-174.11(c)(1). An eligible student awarded scholarship funds who
is enrolled in a nonpublic school shall participate in the academic assessments to maintain
eligibility for receipt of the scholarship funds.
Assessment data shall be retained by the nonpublic school for a five-year period and shall be
subject to audit by the Authority to ensure compliance with this subsection. Assessment data
shall be provided to the parent or guardian of an eligible student, whose tuition and fees are paid
in whole or in part with scholarship funds, with an annual written explanation of the student's
progress, including the results of the student's academic assessment. Nothing in this subsection
shall be deemed to prohibit a nonpublic school from administering assessments at other grade
levels for its own purposes."
SECTION 8A.3.(f) G.S. 115C-562.7(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"§ 115C-562.7. Reporting requirements.
(6) Information on the compliance with the academic assessment requirement
pursuant to G.S. 115C-562.5(3a)."
SECTION 8A.3.(g) G.S. 115C-562.2 is amended by adding a new subsection to
read:
"§ 115C-562.2. Scholarship grants.
(c1) An eligible student awarded a scholarship grant shall participate in administration of
examinations required by G.S. 115C-562.5 to maintain eligibility for receipt of the scholarship
grant."
SECTION 8A.3.(h) G.S. 115C-562.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.5. Obligations of nonpublic schools accepting eligible students receiving
scholarship grants.
(a) A nonpublic school that accepts eligible students receiving scholarship grants shall
comply with the following:
(1) Provide to the Authority annually documentation for required tuition and fees
charged to the student by the nonpublic school. A nonpublic school that
Page 38 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
accepts eligible students receiving scholarship grants shall not increase tuition
each year by more than the Consumer Price Index as calculated by the United
States Bureau of Labor Statistics and reported on January 1 of the year in
which the school is increasing tuition.
(2) Provide to the Authority a criminal background check conducted for the staff
member with the highest decision-making authority, as defined by the bylaws,
articles of incorporation, or other governing document, to ensure that person
has not been convicted of any crime listed in G.S. 115C332.
(3) Provide to the parent or guardian of an eligible student, whose tuition and fees
are paid in whole or in part with a scholarship grant, an annual written
explanation of the student's progress, including the student's scores on
standardized achievement tests.
(4) Administer, at least once in each school year (or more as required by State or
Federal Requirements), tests as provided in this subdivision. Student-level test
performance data shall be submitted to the Authority by July 15 of each year
and retained by the nonpublic school for a five-year period and shall be subject
to audit by the Authority to ensure compliance with this subdivision.year. Test
Personally identifiable individual test performance data reported to the
Authority or audited or collected for evaluation purposes by the Authority
under this subdivision is not a public record under Chapter 132 of the General
Statutes. Nothing in this subdivision shall be deemed to prohibit a nonpublic
school from administering other standardized tests or tests at other grade
levels for its own purposes. Tests shall be administered to all eligible students
enrolled in grades three and higher whose tuition and fees are paid in whole
or in part with a scholarship grant as follows:
a. The nationally standardized test designated by the Authority in grades
three and eight.
b. The ACT in grade 11.
c. A nationally standardized test or other nationally standardized
equivalent measurement selected by the chief administrative officer of
the nonpublic school in all other grades four and higher. For grades
four through seven, the nationally standardized test or other equivalent
measurement selected must measure achievement in the areas of
English grammar, reading, spelling, and mathematics. For grades nine,
10, and 12, the nationally standardized test or other equivalent
measurement selected must measure either (i) achievement in the areas
of English grammar, reading, spelling, and mathematics or (ii)
competencies in the verbal and quantitative areas.
d. The assessments and tests required by the State Board of Education
for public schools to comply with federal law according to grade level
pursuant to G.S. 115C-174.11(c)(1).
(4b) Pursuant to G.S. 115C-107.6, educate each child with a disability awarded
scholarship funds in accordance with that child's Individualized Education
Plan (IEP) and in compliance with the Individuals with Disabilities Act
(IDEA) and State Board of Education policies.
(5) Provide to the Authority four-year cohort graduation rates of the students
receiving scholarship grants in a manner consistent with requirements of Title
I, Part A of ESEA and 34 C.F.R. § 200.19. nationally recognized standards.
(5b) Provide to the Authority by August 1 of each year attendance records of
students receiving scholarship grants during the previous school year
including the name of any schools attended during that time.
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 39

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Contract with a certified public accountant to perform a financial reviewaudit,
consistent with generally accepted methods of accounting or any other
comprehensive basis of accounting recognized by the American Institute of
Certified Public Accountants (AICPA) a minimum of once every two years
for each school year in which the school enrolls 70 or more students receiving
scholarship grants or scholarship funds awarded by the Authority. students
who collectively receive more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)
in scholarship grants awarded under this Part. If a nonpublic school accepts
students receiving less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in
scholarship grants, the school shall contract with a certified public accountant
to perform a financial audit once every three years. The nonpublic school shall
submit the audit report to the Authority by December 31 of each year an audit
is conducted. The Authority may require a school to be audited annually after
the school has two consecutive financial audits with findings.
The Authority shall ensure that all schools are audited in accordance with this
section.
(7) Maintain a school facility within the State where in-person instruction is
provided. This subdivision does not prohibit a school from offering
remote-only courses of instruction in addition to in-person instruction.
(8) Provide the following information annually to the Division:
a. Name and address of the school, including physical location address.
A school with more than one physical location shall establish a
separate notice of intent for each physical location and shall provide
all information required by this subdivision for each physical location.
b. The name of the owners and chief administrator, as well as their
contact information.
c. Number of students in attendance at the school as of October 1.
d. Total number of students enrolled in the school as of the last day of
the previous school year.
e. Documentation of a completed fire inspection within the previous 365
days.
(9) In coordination with local law enforcement agencies, adopt a School Risk
Management Plan (SRMP) relating to incidents of school violence as detailed
in G.S. 115C-47 (40). In constructing and maintaining these plans, the school
shall utilize the School Risk and Response Management System (SRRMS)
established pursuant to G.S. 115C-105.49A. These plans are not considered a
public record as the term "public record" is defined under G.S. 132-1.
(10) Pursuant to G.S. 115C-105.53, provide schematic diagrams and keys to the
main entrance of school facilities to local law enforcement agencies. These
diagrams are not considered a public record as the term "public record" is
defined under G.S. 132-1.
(11) Pursuant to G.S. 115C-105.49, at least once a year, hold a full school-wide
lockdown exercise with local law enforcement and emergency management
agencies that are part of the qualified nonpublic school's SRMP.
(12) Provide the following: (i) schematic diagrams, including digital schematic
diagrams, and (ii) emergency response information requested by the
Department of Public Safety, Division of Emergency Management for the
SRMP. These diagrams and emergency response information are not
considered a public record as the term "public record" is defined under
G.S. 132-1.
Page 40 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) A nonpublic school that accepts students receiving scholarship grants shall not require
any additional fees based on the status of the student as a scholarship grant recipient.
(c) A nonpublic school enrolling more than 25 students in any grade whose tuition and
fees are paid in whole or in part with a scholarship grant shall provide and retain information on
student test performance in each grade with more than 25 students, as follows:
(1) Report to the Authority on the aggregate standardized test performance of the
individual student standardized test performance of eligible students in grades
three, eight, and 11 under subsection (4) of this section. Aggregate test
performance data reported to the Authority which does not contain personally
identifiable student data shall be a public record under Chapter 132 of the
General Statutes. The Authority shall make these reports of aggregate student
standardized test performance publicly available. Test performance data may
be shared with public or private institutions of higher education located in
North Carolina and shall be provided to an independent research organization
selected by the Authority for research purposes as permitted by the Federal
Education Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g.
(2) Retain standardized test performance data for eligible students in all other
grades and annually certify to the Authority compliance with the requirements
of subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this section.
(c1) A nonpublic school shall not discriminate with respect to the categories listed in 42
U.S.C. § 2000d, as that statute read on January 1, 2014, and with respect to the definitions of an
individual with a disability as defined in the Americans With Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C.
§ 12101 as that statute read on January 1, 2024."
SECTION 8A.3.(i) G.S. 115C-112.7 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(c) The State Education Assistance Authority, in coordination with the Department of
Public Instruction, shall make publicly available by September 30 of each year school
achievement, growth, and performance scores and associated performance grades pursuant to
G.S. 115C-83.15 for nonpublic schools that enroll more than 25 students whose tuition and fees
are paid in whole or in part with a scholarship grant. This section is effective with the 2025-26
school year. The first school achievement, growth, and performance scores and associated
performance grades shall be made publicly available by September 30, 2026."
SECTION 8A.3.(j) Section 8A.6(i) and Section 8A.6(j) of Session Law 2023-134
are repealed.
SECTION 8A.3.(k) This provision is effective when it becomes law and applies
beginning with the 2025-26 school year.

PART IX. HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES

PART IX-A. AGING AND ADULT SERVICES [RESERVED]

PART IX-B. CENTRAL MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT

COMMUNITY HEALTH GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 9B.1.(a) Funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Health and
Human Services, Division of Central Management, Office of Rural Health, for each year of the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium for the Community Health Grant Program shall be used to continue
to administer the Community Health Grant Program as modified by Section 11A.8 of S.L.
2017-57.
SECTION 9B.1.(b) The Office of Rural Health shall make the final decision about
awarding grants under this Program, but no single grant award shall exceed one hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($150,000) during the fiscal year. In awarding grants, the Office of Rural Health
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 41

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
shall consider the availability of other funds for the applicant; the incidence of poverty in the area
served by the applicant or the number of indigent clients served by the applicant; the availability
of, or arrangements for, after-hours care; and collaboration between the applicant and a
community hospital or other safety net organizations.
SECTION 9B.1.(c) Grant recipients shall not use these funds to do any of the
following:
(1) Enhance or increase compensation or other benefits of personnel,
administrators, directors, consultants, or any other persons receiving funds for
program administration; provided, however, funds may be used to hire or
retain health care providers. The use of grant funds for this purpose does not
obligate the Department of Health and Human Services to continue to fund
compensation beyond the grant period.
(2) Supplant existing funds, including federal funds traditionally received by
federally qualified community health centers. However, grant funds may be
used to supplement existing programs that serve the purposes described in
subsection (a) of this section.
(3) Finance or satisfy any existing debt.
SECTION 9B.1.(d) The Office of Rural Health may use up to two hundred thousand
dollars ($200,000) in recurring funds for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for
administrative purposes.
SECTION 9B.1.(e) By September 1 of each year, the Office of Rural Health shall
submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services on
community health grants that includes at least all of the following information:
(1) The identity and a brief description of each grantee and each program or
service offered by the grantee.
(2) The amount of funding awarded to each grantee.
(3) The number of individuals served by each grantee and, for the individuals
served, the types of services provided to each.
(4) Any other information requested by the Office of Rural Health as necessary
for evaluating the success of the Community Health Grant Program.

REPLACEMENT FOR CRITICAL IT SYSTEMS THAT SUPPORT SUBSTANCE USE
DISORDER PREVENTION AND TREATMENT
SECTION 9B.2. The Department of Health and Human Services shall develop and
implement a replacement for outdated data systems supporting substance use prevention and
treatment goals, specifically concerning the Driving While Impaired Services, the Drug
Education School, and the Drug Control Unit programs designed to prevent progression of
misuse of substances through education and regulatory supports. The project shall not proceed
until the business case has been approved by the Office of State Budget and Management and
the State Chief Information Officer in the Enterprise Project Management Office's Touchdown
System. Upon approval, Mixed Use Beverage tax receipts available in Budget Code 14460,
Budget Fund 134603, may be budgeted for transfer to Budget Code 24410 for information
technology projects in an amount not to exceed two million dollars ($2,000,000). Following
project completion, the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance
Use Services may use Mixed Use Beverage Tax receipts to cover operations and maintenance
costs for the new IT system.

USE OF TALC SETTLEMENT FUNDS
SECTION 9B.3.(a) The Ovarian Cancer Mitigation Fund (Fund) is created within
the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Central Management and Support,
as a nonreverting special fund. The Fund shall consist of (i) monies received by the State as a
Page 42 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
beneficiary of the final consent judgment resolving the case, State of North Carolina, ex rel.
Joshua H. Stein, Attorney General v. Johnson & Johnson (J&J Case), and (ii) all interest and
investment earnings received on monies in the Fund. Monies in the Fund shall be expended only
by an act of appropriation by the General Assembly and in accordance with the final consent
judgment resolving the J&J Case.
SECTION 9B.3.(b) There is appropriated from the Ovarian Cancer Mitigation Fund
created in subsection (a) of this section to the Department of Health and Human Services,
Division of Central Management and Support, the sum of four million dollars ($4,000,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2024-2025 fiscal year and the sum of four million dollars ($4,000,000)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated and used as follows:
(1) Up to two million dollars ($2,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for each year of
the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall be used to support a public-private
partnership consisting of community-based organizations, medical providers,
and others to develop, strengthen, and promote improved access to ovarian
cancer educational materials, screenings, and care providers. Funds may be
used to contract with a lead community-based organization with statewide
reach to implement related initiatives, including technical assistance and
subgrants to other community-based organizations for these purposes.
(2) Up to seven hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) in nonrecurring
funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall be used to invest
in data collection and analysis infrastructure to support timely and accurate
cancer surveillance and improved capacity to address emerging threats.
(3) Up to one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,250,000) in
nonrecurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall be
used to design and implement communication and education strategies
designed to raise awareness of ovarian cancer and promote preventive
measures, screening, and treatment.
In addition to these uses, the Department of Health and Human Services may use up
to two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) of funds allocated by this subdivision for each year
of the fiscal biennium for administrative purposes.
SECTION 9B.3.(c) Funds allocated under subsection (b) of this section shall remain
available for expenditure in the amounts and for the purposes specified in subsection (a) of this
section until expended.
SECTION 9B.3.(d) Annually, beginning November 1, 2026, the Department of
Health and Human Services shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health
and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division on the expenditures made from the
Ovarian Cancer Mitigation Fund during the preceding fiscal year.

PART IX-C. CHILD AND FAMILY WELL-BEING [RESERVED]

PART IX-D. CHILD DEVELOPMENT AND EARLY EDUCATION

NC PRE-K PROGRAMS/STANDARDS FOR FOUR AND FIVE-STAR RATED
FACILITIES
SECTION 9D.1.(a) Eligibility. – The Department of Health and Human Services,
Division of Child Development and Early Education, shall continue implementing the
prekindergarten program (NC Pre-K). The NC Pre-K program shall serve children who are 4
years of age on or before August 31 of the program year. In determining eligibility, the Division
shall establish income eligibility requirements for the program not to exceed seventy-five percent
(75%) of the State median income. Up to twenty percent (20%) of children enrolled may have
family incomes in excess of seventy-five percent (75%) of median income if those children have
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 43

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
other designated risk factors. Furthermore, any age-eligible child who is a child of either of the
following shall be eligible for the program: (i) an active duty member of the Armed Forces of the
United States, including the North Carolina National Guard, State military forces, or a reserve
component of the Armed Forces who was ordered to active duty by the proper authority within
the last 18 months or is expected to be ordered within the next 18 months, or (ii) a member of the
Armed Forces of the United States, including the North Carolina National Guard, State military
forces, or a reserve component of the Armed Forces who was injured or killed while serving on
active duty. Eligibility determinations for NC Pre-K participants may continue through local
education agencies and local North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., partnerships.
Other than developmental disabilities or other chronic health issues, the Division shall
not consider the health of a child as a factor in determining eligibility for participation in the NC
Pre-K program.
SECTION 9D.1.(a1) Staff-To-Child Ratio and Class Size. – The classroom shall not
exceed a maximum staff-to-child ratio of one to 10 with a maximum class size of 20 children,
with at least one teacher and one teacher assistant per classroom. A classroom of 10 children or
less shall have at least one teacher. The Child Care Commission shall adopt any rules and the
Division of Child Development and Early Education shall revise any rules or policies necessary
to implement the provisions of this subsection.
SECTION 9D.1.(b) Multi-year Contracts. – The Division of Child Development and
Early Education shall require the NC Pre-K contractor to issue multi-year contracts for licensed
private child care centers providing NC Pre-K classrooms.
SECTION 9D.1.(c) Building Standards. – Notwithstanding G.S. 110-91(4), private
child care facilities and public schools operating NC Pre-K classrooms shall meet the building
standards for preschool students as provided in G.S. 115C-521.1.
SECTION 9D.1.(d) Programmatic Standards. – Except as provided in subsection (c)
of this section, entities operating NC Pre-K classrooms shall adhere to all of the policies
prescribed by the Division of Child Development and Early Education regarding programmatic
standards and classroom requirements.
SECTION 9D.1.(e) NC Pre-K Committees. – Local NC Pre-K committees shall use
the standard decision-making process developed by the Division of Child Development and Early
Education in awarding NC PreK classroom slots and student selection.
SECTION 9D.1.(f) Reporting. – The Division of Child Development and Early
Education shall submit an annual report no later than March 15 of each year to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Office of State Budget and
Management, and the Fiscal Research Division. The report shall include the following:
(1) The number of children participating in the NC Pre-K program by county.
(2) The number of children participating in the NC Pre-K program who have
never been served in other early education programs such as child care, public
or private preschool, Head Start, Early Head Start, or early intervention
programs.
(3) The expected NC Pre-K expenditures for the programs and the source of the
local contributions.
(4) The results of an annual evaluation of the NC Pre-K program.
SECTION 9D.1.(g) Audits. – The administration of the NC Pre-K program by local
partnerships shall be subject to the financial and compliance audits authorized under
G.S. 143B-168.14(b).

CHILD CARE SUBSIDY RATES
SECTION 9D.2.(a) The maximum gross annual income for initial eligibility,
adjusted annually, for subsidized child care services shall be determined based on a percentage
of the federal poverty level as follows:
Page 44 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
AGE INCOME PERCENTAGE LEVEL
0 – 5 200%
6 – 12 133%
The eligibility for any child with special needs, including a child who is 13 years of
age or older, shall be two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level.
SECTION 9D.2.(b) Fees for families who are required to share in the cost of care
are established based on ten percent (10%) of gross family income. When care is received at the
blended rate, the copayment shall be eighty-three percent (83%) of the full-time copayment.
Copayments for part-time care shall be seventy-five percent (75%) of the full-time copayment.
SECTION 9D.2.(c) Payments for the purchase of child care services for low-income
children shall be in accordance with the following requirements:
(1) Religious sponsored child care facilities operating pursuant to G.S. 110-106
and licensed child care centers and homes that meet the minimum licensing
standards that are participating in the subsidized child care program shall be
paid the one-star county market rate or the rate they charge privately paying
parents unless prohibited by subsection (f) of this section.
(2) Licensed child care centers and homes with two or more stars shall receive the
market rate for that rated license level for that age group unless prohibited by
subsection (g) of this section.
(3) No payments shall be made for transportation services charged by child care
facilities.
(4) Payments for subsidized child care services for postsecondary education shall
be limited to a maximum of 20 months of enrollment. This shall not be
determined before a family's annual recertification period.
(5) The Department of Health and Human Services shall implement necessary
rule changes to restructure services, including, but not limited to, targeting
benefits to employment.
SECTION 9D.2.(d) Provisions of payment rates for child care providers in counties
that do not have at least 50 children in each age group for center-based and homebased care are
as follows:
(1) Except as applicable in subdivision (2) of this subsection, payment rates shall
be set at the statewide or regional market rate for licensed child care centers
and homes.
(2) If it can be demonstrated that the application of the statewide or regional
market rate to a county with fewer than 50 children in each age group is lower
than the county market rate and would inhibit the ability of the county to
purchase child care for low-income children, then the county market rate may
be applied.
SECTION 9D.2.(e) A market rate shall be calculated for child care centers and
homes at each rated license level for each county and for each age group or age category of
enrollees and shall be representative of fees charged to parents for each age group of enrollees
within the county. The Division of Child Development and Early Education shall also calculate
a statewide rate and regional market rate for each rated license level for each age category.
SECTION 9D.2.(f) The Division of Child Development and Early Education shall
continue implementing policies that improve the quality of child care for subsidized children,
including a policy in which child care subsidies are paid, to the extent possible, for child care in
the higher quality centers and homes only. The Division shall define higher quality, and subsidy
funds shall not be paid for one or two-star-rated facilities. For those counties with an inadequate
number of four and five-star-rated facilities, the Division shall continue a transition period that
allows the facilities to continue to receive subsidy funds while the facilities work on the increased
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 45

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
star ratings. The Division may allow exemptions in counties where there is an inadequate number
of four and five-star-rated facilities for non-star-rated programs, such as religious programs.
SECTION 9D.2.(g) Facilities licensed pursuant to Article 7 of Chapter 110 of the
General Statutes and facilities operated pursuant to G.S. 110-106 may participate in the program
that provides for the purchase of care in child care facilities for minor children of needy families.
Except as authorized by subsection (f) of this section, no separate licensing requirements shall
be used to select facilities to participate. In addition, child care facilities shall be required to meet
any additional applicable requirements of federal law or regulations. Child care arrangements
exempt from State regulation pursuant to Article 7 of Chapter 110 of the General Statutes shall
meet the requirements established by other State law and by the Social Services Commission.
County departments of social services or other local contracting agencies shall not
use a provider's failure to comply with requirements in addition to those specified in this
subsection as a condition for reducing the provider's subsidized child care rate.
SECTION 9D.2.(h) Payment for subsidized child care services provided with
Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Block Grant funds shall comply with all regulations
and policies issued by the Division of Child Development and Early Education for the subsidized
child care program.
SECTION 9D.2.(i) Non-citizen families who reside in this State legally shall be
eligible for child care subsidies if all other conditions of eligibility are met. If all other conditions
of eligibility are met, non-citizen families who reside in this State illegally shall be eligible for
child care subsidies only if at least one of the following conditions is met:
(1) The child for whom a child care subsidy is sought is receiving child protective
services or foster care services.
(2) The child for whom a child care subsidy is sought is developmentally delayed
or at risk of being developmentally delayed.
(3) The child for whom a child care subsidy is sought is a citizen of the United
States.
SECTION 9D.2.(j) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of
Child Development and Early Education, shall require all county departments of social services
to include on any forms used to determine eligibility for child care subsidy whether the family
waiting for subsidy is receiving assistance through the NC PreK Program or Head Start.
SECTION 9D.2.(k) Department of Defense-certified child care facilities licensed
pursuant to G.S. 110-106.2 may participate in the State-subsidized child care program that
provides for the purchase of care in child care facilities for minor children in needy families,
provided that funds allocated from the State-subsidized child care program to Department of
Defense-certified child care facilities shall supplement and not supplant funds allocated in
accordance with G.S. 143B-168.15(g). Payment rates and fees for military families who choose
Department of Defense-certified child care facilities and who are eligible to receive subsidized
child care shall be as set forth in this section.

CHILD CARE ALLOCATION FORMULA
SECTION 9D.3.(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of
Child Development and Early Education (Division), shall allocate child care subsidy voucher
funds to pay the costs of necessary child care for minor children of needy families. The
mandatory thirty percent (30%) North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., subsidy allocation
under G.S. 143B-168.15(g) shall constitute the base amount for each county's child care subsidy
allocation. The Department of Health and Human Services shall use the following method when
allocating federal and State child care funds, not including the aggregate mandatory thirty percent
(30%) North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., subsidy allocation:
(1) Funds shall be allocated to a county based upon the projected cost of serving
children under age 11 in families with all parents working who earn less than
Page 46 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the applicable federal poverty level percentage set forth in Section 9D.3(a) of
this act.
(2) The Division may withhold up to two percent (2%) of available funds from
the allocation formula for (i) preventing termination of services throughout
the fiscal year and (ii) repayment of any federal funds identified by counties
as overpayments, including overpayments due to fraud. The Division shall
allocate to counties any funds withheld before the end of the fiscal year when
the Division determines the funds are not needed for the purposes described
in this subdivision. The Division shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research
Division, which report shall include each of the following:
a. The amount of funds used for preventing termination of services and
the repayment of any federal funds.
b. The date the remaining funds were distributed to counties.
c. As a result of funds withheld under this subdivision and after funds
have been distributed, any counties that did not receive at least the
amount the counties received the previous year and the amount by
which funds were decreased.
The Division shall submit a report in each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium 30 days after the funds withheld pursuant to this subdivision are
distributed but no later than April 1 of each respective year.
(3) The Division shall set aside four percent (4%) of child care subsidy allocations
for vulnerable populations, which include a child identified as having special
needs and a child whose application for assistance indicates that the child and
the child's family is experiencing homelessness or is in a temporary living
situation. A child identified by this subdivision shall be given priority for
receiving services until such time as set-aside allocations for vulnerable
populations are exhausted.
SECTION 9D.3.(b) The Division may reallocate unused child care subsidy voucher
funds in order to meet the child care needs of low-income families. Any reallocation of funds
shall be based upon the expenditures of all child care subsidy voucher funding, including North
Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., funds within a county. Counties shall manage service
levels within the funds allocated to the counties. A county with a spending coefficient over one
hundred percent (100%) shall submit a plan to the Division for managing the county's allocation
before receiving any reallocated funds.
SECTION 9D.3.(c) When implementing the formula under subsection (a) of this
section, the Division shall include the market rate increase in the formula process rather than
calculate the increases outside of the formula process. Additionally, the Department shall do the
following:
(1) Deem a county's initial allocation as the county's expenditure in the previous
fiscal year or a prorated share of the county's previous fiscal year expenditures
if sufficient funds are not available.
(2) Effective immediately following the next new decennial census data release,
implement (i) one-third of the change in a county's allocation in the year
following the data release, (ii) an additional one-third of the change in a
county's allocation beginning two years after the initial change under this
subdivision, and (iii) the final one-third change in a county's allocation
beginning the following two years thereafter.

SMART START INITIATIVES
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 47

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 9D.4.(a) Policies. – The North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc.,
and its Board shall ensure policies focus on the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc.'s
mission of improving child care quality in North Carolina for children from birth to five years of
age. North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., funded activities shall include assisting child
care facilities with (i) improving quality, including helping one, two, and three-star-rated
facilities increase their star ratings, and (ii) implementing prekindergarten programs. State
funding for local partnerships shall also be used for evidence-based or evidence-informed
programs for children from birth to five years of age that do the following:
(1) Increase children's literacy.
(2) Increase the parents' ability to raise healthy, successful children.
(3) Improve children's health.
(4) Assist four and five-star-rated facilities in improving and maintaining quality.
SECTION 9D.4.(b) Administration. – Administrative costs shall be equivalent to,
on an average statewide basis for all local partnerships, not more than ten percent (10%) of the
total statewide allocation to all local partnerships. For purposes of this subsection, administrative
costs shall include costs associated with partnership oversight, business and financial
management, general accounting, human resources, budgeting, purchasing, contracting, and
information systems management. The North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., shall
continue using a single statewide contract management system that incorporates features of the
required standard fiscal accountability plan described in G.S. 143B-168.12(a)(4). All local
partnerships are required to participate in the contract management system and, directed by the
North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., to collaborate, to the fullest extent possible, with
other local partnerships to increase efficiency and effectiveness.
SECTION 9D.4.(c) Salaries. – The salary schedule developed and implemented by
the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., shall set the maximum amount of State funds
that may be used for the salary of the Executive Director of the North Carolina Partnership for
Children, Inc., and the directors of the local partnerships. The North Carolina Partnership for
Children, Inc., shall base the schedule on the following criteria:
(1) The population of the area serviced by a local partnership.
(2) The amount of State funds administered.
(3) The amount of total funds administered.
(4) The professional experience of the individual to be compensated.
(5) Any other relevant factors pertaining to salary, as determined by the North
Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc.
The salary schedule shall be used only to determine the maximum amount of State
funds that may be used for compensation. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit
a local partnership from using non-State funds to supplement an individual's salary in excess of
the amount set by the salary schedule established under this subsection.
SECTION 9D.4.(d) Match Requirements. – The North Carolina Partnership for
Children, Inc., and all local partnerships shall, in the aggregate, be required to match one hundred
percent (100%) of the total amount budgeted for the program in each fiscal year of the 2025-2027
biennium. Of the funds that the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., and the local
partnerships are required to match, contributions of cash shall be equal to at least thirteen percent
(13%) and in-kind donated resources shall be equal to no more than six percent (6%) for a total
match requirement of nineteen percent (19%) for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.
The North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., may carry forward any amount in excess of
the required match for a fiscal year in order to meet the match requirement of the succeeding
fiscal year. Only in-kind contributions that are quantifiable shall be applied to the in-kind match
requirement. Volunteer services may be treated as an in-kind contribution for the purpose of the
match requirement of this subsection. Volunteer services that qualify as professional services
shall be valued at the fair market value of those services. All other volunteer service hours shall
Page 48 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
be valued at the statewide average wage rate as calculated from data compiled by the Division of
Employment Security of the Department of Commerce in the Employment and Wages in North
Carolina Annual Report for the most recent period for which data are available. Expenses,
including both those paid by cash and in-kind contributions, incurred by other participating
non-State entities contracting with the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., or the local
partnerships also may be considered resources available to meet the required private match. In
order to qualify to meet the required private match, the expenses shall:
(1) Be verifiable from the contractor's records.
(2) If in-kind, other than volunteer services, be quantifiable in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles for nonprofit organizations.
(3) Not include expenses funded by State funds.
(4) Be supplemental to and not supplant preexisting resources for related program
activities.
(5) Be incurred as a direct result of the Early Childhood Initiatives Program and
be necessary and reasonable for the proper and efficient accomplishment of
the Program's objectives.
(6) Be otherwise allowable under federal or State law.
(7) Be required and described in the contractual agreements approved by the
North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., or the local partnership.
(8) Be reported to the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., or the local
partnership by the contractor in the same manner as reimbursable expenses.
Failure to obtain a nineteen percent (19%) match by June 30 of each year of the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall result in a dollar-for-dollar reduction in the appropriation for the
Program for a subsequent fiscal year. The North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., shall be
responsible for compiling information on the private cash and in-kind contributions into a report,
to be included in its annual report as required under G.S. 143B-168.12(d), in a format that allows
verification by the Department of Revenue. The same match requirements shall apply to any
expansion funds appropriated by the General Assembly.
SECTION 9D.4.(e) Bidding. – The North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc.,
and all local partnerships shall use competitive bidding practices in contracting for goods and
services on contract amounts as follows:
(1) For amounts of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or less, the procedures specified
by a written policy as developed by the Board of Directors of the North
Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc.
(2) For amounts greater than five thousand dollars ($5,000) but less than fifteen
thousand dollars ($15,000), three written quotes.
(3) For amounts of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or more but less than forty
thousand dollars ($40,000), a request for proposal process.
(4) For amounts of forty thousand dollars ($40,000) or more, a request for
proposal process and advertising in a major newspaper.
SECTION 9D.4.(f) Allocations. – The North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc.,
shall not reduce the allocation for counties with less than 35,000 in population below the
2012-2013 funding level.
SECTION 9D.4.(g) Performance-Based Evaluation. – The Department of Health
and Human Services shall continue to implement the performance-based evaluation system.
SECTION 9D.4.(h) Expenditure Restrictions. – Except as provided in subsection (i)
of this section, the Department of Health and Human Services and the North Carolina Partnership
for Children, Inc., shall ensure that the allocation of funds for Early Childhood Education and
Development Initiatives for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall be administered and distributed
in the following manner:
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 49

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Capital expenditures are prohibited for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. For the
purposes of this section, "capital expenditures" means expenditures for capital
improvements as defined in G.S. 143C-1-1(d)(5).
(2) Expenditures of State funds for advertising and promotional activities are
prohibited for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium.
For the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, local partnerships shall not spend any State funds
on marketing campaigns, advertising, or any associated materials. Local partnerships may spend
any private funds the local partnerships receive on those activities.
SECTION 9D.4.(i) Notwithstanding subsection (h) of this section, the North
Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., and local partnerships may use up to one percent (1%) of
State funds for fundraising activities. The North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc., shall
include in its annual report required under G.S. 143B-168.12(d) a report on the use of State funds
for fundraising. The report shall include the following:
(1) The amount of funds expended on fundraising.
(2) Any return on fundraising investments.
(3) Any other information deemed relevant.

PART IX-E. HEALTH BENEFITS

CONTINUE MEDICAID ANNUAL REPORT
SECTION 9E.1. The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health
Benefits (DHB), shall continue the publication of the Medicaid Annual Report and
accompanying tables. DHB shall publish the report and tables on its website no later than
December 31 following each State fiscal year.

VOLUME PURCHASE PLANS AND SINGLE SOURCE PROCUREMENT
SECTION 9E.2. The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health
Benefits, may, subject to the approval of a change in the State Medicaid Plan, contract for
services, medical equipment, supplies, and appliances by implementation of volume purchase
plans, single source procurement, or other contracting processes in order to improve cost
containment.

ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS FUNDING
SECTION 9E.3. Of the funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Health
and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, for administrative contracts and interagency
transfers, the Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) shall transfer the sum of one
million dollars ($1,000,000) for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of one million dollars
($1,000,000) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to the Office of Administrative Hearings (OAH).
These funds shall be allocated by OAH for mediation services provided for Medicaid applicant
and recipient appeals and to contract for other services necessary to conduct the appeals process.
OAH shall continue the Memorandum of Agreement (MOA) with DHHS for mediation services
provided for Medicaid recipient appeals and contracted services necessary to conduct the appeals
process. Upon receipt of invoices from OAH for covered services rendered in accordance with
the MOA, DHHS shall transfer the federal share of Medicaid funds drawn down for this purpose.

ACCOUNTING FOR MEDICAID RECEIVABLES AS NONTAX REVENUE
SECTION 9E.4.(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of
Health Benefits (DHB), receivables reserved at the end of the 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 fiscal
years shall, when received, be accounted for as nontax revenue for each of those fiscal years. The
treatment under this section of any revenue derived from federal programs shall be in accordance
with the requirements specified in the Code of Federal Regulations, Title 2, Part 225.
Page 50 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 9E.4.(b) For the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the Department of Health and
Human Services shall deposit from its revenues one hundred seven million seven hundred
thousand dollars ($107,700,000) with the Department of State Treasurer to be accounted for as
nontax revenue. For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the Department of Health and Human Services
shall deposit from its revenues one hundred nine million dollars ($109,000,000) with the
Department of State Treasurer to be accounted for as nontax revenue. These deposits shall
represent the return of advanced General Fund appropriations, nonfederal revenue, fund
balances, or other resources from State-owned and State operated hospitals that are used to
provide indigent and nonindigent care services. The return from State-owned and State operated
hospitals to the Department of Health and Human Services shall be made from nonfederal
resources in the following manner:
(1) The University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill shall make the
following deposits:
a. For the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the amount of thirty-one million three
hundred sixty-five thousand three hundred five dollars ($31,365,305).
b. For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the amount of thirty-one million three
hundred sixty-five thousand three hundred five dollars ($31,365,305).
(2) All State-owned and State operated hospitals, other than the University of
North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill, that specialize in psychiatric care
shall annually deposit an amount equal to the amount of the payments from
DHB for uncompensated care.

LME/MCO INTERGOVERNMENTAL TRANSFERS
SECTION 9E.5.(a) The local management entities/managed care organizations
(LME/MCOs) shall make intergovernmental transfers to the Department of Health and Human
Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), in an aggregate amount of eighteen million
twenty-eight thousand two hundred seventeen dollars ($18,028,217) in the 2025-2026 fiscal year
and in an aggregate amount of eighteen million twenty-eight thousand two hundred seventeen
dollars ($18,028,217) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year. The due date and frequency of the
intergovernmental transfer required by this section shall be determined by DHB. The amount of
the intergovernmental transfer that each individual LME/MCO is required to make in each fiscal
year shall be as follows:
2024-2025 2026-2027
Alliance Behavioral Healthcare $4,508,857 $4,508,857
Partners Health Management $3,544,348 $3,544,348
Trillium Health Resources $6,448,693 $6,448,693
Vaya Health $3,526,319 $3,526,319
SECTION 9E.5.(b) In the event that a county disengages from an LME/MCO and
realigns with another LME/MCO during the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, DHB shall have the
authority to reallocate the amount of the intergovernmental transfer that each affected
LME/MCO is required to make under subsection (a) of this section, taking into consideration the
change in catchment area and covered population, provided that the aggregate amount of the
transfers received from all LME/MCOs in each year of the fiscal biennium is achieved.

CHILDREN AND FAMILIES SPECIALTY PLAN
SECTION 9E.6.(a) Section 9E.22(a) of S.L. 2023-134 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 9E.22.(a) The Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) shall issue
an initial request for proposals (RFP) to procure a single statewide children and families (CAF)
specialty plan contract with services to begin no later than December 1, 2024 December 1, 2025.
The RFP shall be subject to the requirements in G.S. 108D-62, as enacted by subsection (k) of
this section. DHHS shall define the services available under the CAF specialty plan and the
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 51

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Medicaid beneficiaries who are eligible to enroll in the CAF specialty plan, except as otherwise
specified in this act or in law. For the purposes of this section, the CAF specialty plan shall be as
defined under G.S. 108D-1, as amended by subsection (c) of this section."

CONTINUE MEDICAID COVERAGE FOR PREGNANT WOMEN FOR TWELVE
MONTHS POSTPARTUM
SECTION 9E.7.(a) Section 9D.13(c) of S.L. 2021-180 is repealed.
SECTION 9E.7.(b) G.S. 108A-146.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-146.5. Aggregate modernized assessment collection amount.
(a) The aggregate modernized assessment collection amount is an amount of money that
is calculated by subtracting the modernized intergovernmental transfer adjustment component
under G.S. 108A-146.13 from the total modernized nonfederal receipts under subsection (b) of
this section and then adding the positive or negative amount of the modernized IGT actual
receipts adjustment component under G.S. 108A-146.14.
(b) The total modernized nonfederal receipts is the sum of all of the following:
(1) One-fourth of the State's annual Medicaid payment.
(2) The managed care component under G.S. 108A-146.7.
(3) The fee-for-service component under G.S. 108A-146.9.
(3a) The modernized HASP component under G.S. 108A-146.10.
(4) The GME component under G.S. 108A-146.11.
(5) Beginning April 1, 2022, and ending March 31, 2027, the postpartum
coverage component under G.S. 108A-146.12.
(6) Beginning April 1, 2024, the home and community-based services component
under G.S. 108A-146.12A. (2021-61, s. 2; 2021-180, s. 9D.13A(b); 2023-7,
s. 1.7(c).)"

GROSS PREMIUM TAX OFFSET CHANGES
SECTION 9E.8.(a) Article 8B of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 105-228.11. Transfer to Health Advancement Receipts Special Fund.
Each fiscal year, the Secretary of Revenue shall transfer at the beginning of each quarter from
the State insurance tax net collections received by the Department of Revenue under Article 8B
of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes to the State Treasurer for the Health Advancement
Receipts Special Fund, the gross premiums tax offset amount, as defined in G.S. 108A-147.12.
The Office of State Budget and Management shall calculate the amount of the gross premiums
tax offset as defined in G.S. 108A-147.12 and certify the amount for the Secretary of Revenue
that is required to be transferred using data in the North Carolina Financial System."
SECTION 9E.8.(b) G.S. 108A-147.11 reads as rewritten:
"§ 108A-147.11. Health advancement reconciliation adjustment component.
(a) The health advancement reconciliation adjustment component is a positive or
negative dollar amount equal to the actual nonfederal expenditures for the quarter that is two
quarters prior to the current quarter minus the sum of the following specified amounts:
(1) The presumptive service cost component calculated under G.S. 108A-147.5
for the quarter that is two quarters prior to the current quarter.
(2) The positive or negative gross premiums tax offset amount calculated under
G.S. 105-228.11108A-147.12(b) amount transferred during the current
quarter by the Department of Revenue to the State Treasurer for the Health
Advancement Receipts Special Fund under G.S. 105-228.11.
(3) The HASP health advancement component calculated under G.S. 108A-147.6
for the quarter that is two quarters prior to the current quarter.
Page 52 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) The IGT share of the reconciliation adjustment component is a positive or negative
dollar amount that is calculated by multiplying the health advancement reconciliation adjustment
component calculated under subsection (a) of this section by the share of public hospital costs
calculated under subsection (c) of this section.
(c) The share of public hospital costs is calculated by adding total hospital costs for the
UNC Health Care System, total hospital costs for the primary affiliated teaching hospital for the
East Carolina University Brody School of Medicine, and sixty percent (60%) of the total hospital
costs for all public acute care hospitals and dividing that sum by the total hospital costs for all
acute care hospitals except for critical access hospitals and rural emergency hospitals."
SECTION 9E.8.(c) G.S. 143C-9-10 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143C-9-10. Health Advancement Receipts Special Fund.
(a) Creation. – The Health Advancement Receipts Special Fund is established as a
nonreverting special fund in the Department of Health and Human Services.
(b) Source of Funds. – Each State fiscal quarter, the Department of Health and Human
Services shall deposit in the Health Advancement Receipts Special Fund an amount of funds
equal to the total nonfederal receipts for health advancement calculated under
G.S. 108A-147.3(b) for that quarter, minus the State retention component under G.S. 108A-147.8
for that quarter, and plus the positive or negative gross premiums tax offset amount transferred
by the Department of Revenue to the State Treasurer for the Health Advancement Receipts
Special Fund under G.S. 105-228.11 transferred by the Department of Revenue to the State
Treasurer for the Health Advancement Receipts Special Fund under G.S. 105-228.11 calculated
under G.S. 108A-147.12(b) for that quarter.
(c) Use of Funds. – The Department of Health and Human Services shall use funds in the
Health Advancement Receipts Special Fund only for the purposes described in
G.S. 108A-147.13."

AMERICAN RESCUE PLAN ACT TEMPORARY SAVINGS FUND BALANCE
SECTION 9E.9.(a) The unappropriated balance in the ARPA Temporary Savings
Fund after all appropriated transfers have been made shall be transferred to the Division of Health
Benefits Budget Code 14445 to offset funds appropriated for the 2025-2026 fiscal year.

CREATE DESIGNATED STATE HEALTH PROGRAM SAVINGS BUDGET FUND
SECTION 9E.10.(a) Fund created. – The Designated State Health Programs budget
fund is created as a nonreverting budget fund within the Department of Health and Human
Services (DHHS), Division of Health Benefits (DHB) 24445 budget code. The Division of
Central Management Services, Division of Child and Family Well-Being, Division of Mental
Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services, and Division of Public Health
shall transfer and deposit all freed-up state funds that result from additional receipts realized
through Designated State Health Programs authority in the North Carolina Medicaid Reform
Section 1115 Demonstration approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in
December 2024 to this budget fund.
SECTION 9E.10.(b) Funds shall only be re-invested in new Healthy Opportunities
capacity building efforts and services, or Justice Involved Re-Entry Initiative capacity building
and services authorized in the 1115 Demonstration approved in December 2024.
SECTION 9E.10.(c) It is the intent of the Governor to fully fund statewide expansion
of the Healthy Opportunities program when it is financially feasible to do so given recurring
costs. The sum of forty-six million, seventy-four thousand, three hundred and forty-nine dollars
($46,074,349) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of eleven million,
eight hundred and twelve thousand, five hundred and nineteen dollars ($11,812,519) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year from the special fund created in Section
9E.10.(a) may be transferred to DHB for the sole purpose of providing the State share for capacity
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 53

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
building or service provision of the expanded Healthy Opportunities program in the western
region of the state.
SECTION 9E.10.(d) DHB shall work collaboratively with the Office of State
Budget and Management on the implementation of new Healthy Opportunities capacity building
efforts and services to ensure the program stays within budget. DHB shall provide OSBM with
a monthly report of expenditures for Healthy Opportunities for both existing and expanding
programs. The report shall also detail the savings created by the Healthy Opportunities program
and provide a five-year forecast of recurring and nonrecurring needs for the program.
SECTION 9E.10.(e) This section expires December 31, 2031.

PART IX-F. HEALTH SERVICES REGULATION

INCREASE X-RAY FEE CAP
SECTION 9.F.1. G.S. 104E-19 reads as rewritten:
"§ 104E-19. Fees.
(a) An annual fee in the amount set by the Department is imposed on a person who is
required to be registered or licensed under this Chapter. The Department must set the fees at
amounts that provide revenue to offset its costs in performing its duties under this Chapter.
(b) Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 850, s. 13.
(c) The annual fees under subsection (a) of this section shall not exceed the maximum
amounts as follows:
(1) For tanning facilities: two hundred dollars ($200.00) for the first piece of
tanning equipment and thirty dollars ($30.00) for each additional piece of
tanning equipment.
(2) For the following categories of facilities registered to use X-ray tubes or X-ray
equipment: clinics, chiropractors, dentists, educational, government,
podiatrists, industrial, physicians, veterinarians, and other; two hundred
dollars ($200.00) four hundred dollars ($400.00) for the first X-ray tube or
piece of X-ray equipment and thirty dollars ($30.00) sixty dollars ($60.00) for
each additional X-ray tube or piece of X-ray equipment.
(3) For the following categories of facilities registered to use X-ray tubes or X-ray
equipment: industrial medical, health departments, and service; three hundred
dollars ($300.00)six hundred dollars (600.00) for the first X-ray tube or piece
of X-ray equipment and forty dollars ($40.00)eighty dollars (80.00) for each
additional X-ray tube or piece of X-ray equipment.
(4) For the following categories of facilities registered to use X-ray tubes or X-ray
equipment: hospitals and industrial radiography; four hundred dollars
($400.00)eight hundred dollars ($800.00) for the first X-ray tube or piece of
X-ray equipment and fifty dollars ($50.00)one hundred dollars ($100.00) for
each additional X-ray tube or piece of X-ray equipment."

PART IX-G. MENTAL HEALTH/DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES/SUBSTANCE
USE SERVICES

SINGLE STREAM FUNDING FOR DMH/DD/SUS COMMUNITY SERVICES
SECTION 9G.1.(a) For the purpose of mitigating cash flow problems that many
local management entities/managed care organizations (LME/MCOs) experience at the
beginning of each fiscal year relative to single stream funding, the Department of Health and
Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use
Services (DMH/DD/SUS), shall distribute not less than one-twelfth of each LME/MCO's base
budget allocation at the beginning of the fiscal year and subtract the amount of that distribution
Page 54 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
from the LME/MCO's total reimbursements for the fiscal year. For each month of the fiscal year
after July, DMH/DD/SUS shall distribute, on the third working day of the month, one eleventh
of the amount of each LME/MCO's single stream allocation that remains after subtracting the
amount of the distribution that was made to the LME/MCO in July of the fiscal year.
SECTION 9G.1.(b) If, on or after June 1, 2025, the Office of State Budget
Management (OSBM) certifies a Medicaid budget surplus and sufficient cash in Budget Code
14445 to meet total obligations for the 2024-2025 fiscal year, then DHB shall transfer to
DMH/DD/SUS funds not to exceed the amount of the certified surplus or thirty million dollars
($30,000,000), whichever is less, to be used for single stream funding.
SECTION 9G.1.(c) If, on or after June 1, 2026, the Office of State Budget
Management (OSBM) certifies a Medicaid budget surplus and sufficient case in Budget Code
14445 to meet total obligations for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, then DHB shall transfer to
DMH/DD/SUS funds not to exceed the amount of the certified surplus or thirty million dollars
($30,000,000), whichever is less, to be used for single stream funding.
SECTION 9G.1.(d) If, on or after June 1, 2027, the Office of State Budget
Management (OSBM) certifies a Medicaid budget surplus and sufficient case in Budget Code
14445 to meet total obligations for the 2026-2027 fiscal year, then DHB shall transfer to
DMH/DD/SUS funds not to exceed the amount of the certified surplus or thirty million dollars
($30,000,000), whichever is less, to be used for single stream funding.

LOCAL INPATIENT PSYCHIATRIC BEDS OR BED DAYS
SECTION 9G.2.(a) Use of Funds. – Funds appropriated in this act to the Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and
Substance Use Services, shall continue to be used for the purchase of local inpatient psychiatric
beds or bed days. The Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) shall continue to
implement a two-tiered system of payment for purchasing these local inpatient psychiatric beds
or bed days based on acuity level with an enhanced rate of payment for inpatient psychiatric beds
or bed days for individuals with higher acuity levels, as defined by DHHS. The enhanced rate of
payment for inpatient psychiatric beds or bed days for individuals with higher acuity levels shall
not exceed the lowest average cost per patient bed day among the State psychiatric hospitals. In
addition, at the discretion of the Secretary of Health and Human Services, existing funds allocated
to LME/MCOs for community-based mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance
use disorder services may be used to purchase additional local inpatient psychiatric beds or bed
days. DHHS may allocate funding to the LME/MCOs for the purchase of facility-based crisis,
nonhospital detoxification services and peer respite services to support individuals that do not
meet the medical necessity for inpatient treatment and can be diverted from an inpatient hospital
stay.
SECTION 9G.2.(b) Distribution and Management of Beds or Bed Days. DHHS
shall work to ensure that any local inpatient psychiatric beds or bed days purchased in accordance
with this section are utilized solely for individuals who are medically indigent, except that DHHS
may use up to forty percent (40%) of the funds appropriated in this act to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and
Substance Use Services, for the purchase of local inpatient psychiatric beds, bed days to pay for
facility-based crisis services, non-hospital detoxification services, and peer respite services for
individuals in need of these services, regardless of whether the individuals are medically indigent.
For the purposes of this subsection, "medically indigent" shall mean uninsured persons who (i)
are financially unable to obtain private insurance coverage, as determined by DHHS and (ii) are
not eligible for government-funded health coverage such as Medicare or Medicaid.
In addition, DHHS shall work to ensure that any local inpatient psychiatric beds or
bed days purchased in accordance with this section are distributed across the State and according
to need, as determined by DHHS. DHHS shall ensure that beds or bed days for individuals with
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 55

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
higher acuity levels are distributed across the State and according to greatest need based on
hospital bed utilization data. DHHS shall enter into contracts with LME/MCOs and local
hospitals for the purchase and management of the local inpatient psychiatric beds or days and
allocate up to forty percent (40%) of the total funding to the LME/MCO's for the purpose of
facility-based crisis services, nonhospital detoxification services, and peer respite services.
DHHS shall work to ensure that these contracts are awarded equitably around all regions of the
State. LME/MCOs shall manage and control these local inpatient psychiatric beds or bed days,
including the determination of the specific local hospital or State psychiatric hospital to which
an individual should be admitted pursuant to an involuntary commitment order.
SECTION 9G.2.(c) Funds to be Held in Statewide Reserve. Funds appropriated in
this act to DHHS for the purchase of local inpatient psychiatric beds or bed days shall not be
allocated to LME/MCOs but shall be held in a statewide reserve at the Division of Mental Health,
Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services to pay for services authorized by the
LME/MCOs and billed by the hospitals through the LME/MCOs. LME/MCOs shall remit claims
for payment to DHHS within 15 working days after receipt of a clean claim from the hospital
and shall pay the hospital within 30 working days after receipt of payment from DHHS.
SECTION 9G.2.(d) Ineffective LME/MCO Management of Beds or Bed Days. – If
DHHS determines that (i) an LME/MCO is not effectively managing the beds or bed days for
which it has responsibility, as evidenced by beds or bed days in the local hospital not being
utilized while demand for services at the State psychiatric hospitals has not decreased, or (ii) the
LME/MCO has failed to comply with the prompt payment provisions of this section, DHHS may
contract with another LME/MCO to manage the beds or bed days or, notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, may pay the hospital directly.
SECTION 9G.2.(e) Reporting by LME/MCOs. LME/MCOs shall be required to
report to DHHS regarding the utilization of these beds or bed days.
SECTION 9G.2.(f) Reporting by DHHS. By no later than December 1, 2025, and
by no later than December 1, 2026, DHHS shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division on all of the
following:
(1) A uniform system for beds or bed days purchased during the preceding fiscal
year from (i) existing State appropriations and (ii) local funds.
(2) An explanation of the process used by DHHS to ensure that, except as
otherwise provided in subsection (a) of this section, local inpatient psychiatric
beds or bed days purchased in accordance with this section are utilized solely
for individuals who are medically indigent, along with the number of
medically indigent individuals served by the purchase of these beds or bed
days.
(3) The amount of funds used to pay for facility-based crisis services, along with
the number of individuals who received these services and the outcomes for
each individual.
(4) The amount of funds used to pay for nonhospital detoxification services, along
with the number of individuals who received these services and the outcomes
for each individual.
(5) Other DHHS initiatives funded by State appropriations to reduce State
psychiatric hospital use.

USE OF OPIOID SETTLEMENT FUNDS
SECTION 9G.3.(a) The State Controller shall transfer the sum of fifty-seven million
seventy-six thousand seven hundred seventy-three dollars ($60,858,049) for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year and the sum of fourteen million dollars ($13,511,210) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year from
funds available in the Opioid Abatement Reserve in the General Fund to the Opioid Abatement
Page 56 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Fund established under Section 9F.1 of S.L. 2021-180. These funds are appropriated to the
Department of Health and Human Services to be used as set forth in subsection (b) of this section.
In addition to these uses, the Department of Health and Human Services may use up to one
million fifty thousand dollars ($1,050,000) of funds allocated by this subdivision for each year
of the fiscal biennium for administrative purposes to facilitate timely deployment and accounting
of funds, for provision of training and technical assistance to community providers and to conduct
required monitoring and oversight.
SECTION 9G.3.(b) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the funds appropriated
to the Department of Health and Human Service by subsection (a) of this section shall be used to
respond to the negative impacts of the opioid epidemic within the State of North Carolina, as
follows:
(1) To expand employment and transportation supports through innovative pilot
programs in industries in North Carolina that suffered the greatest job losses
as a result of Hurricane Helene and are most relied upon by individuals
recovering from opioid use disorders to reenter the workforce, such as the food
service industry, the hotel and lodging industry, and the entertainment
industry. These funds may be used to support all of the following:
a. Employment support services for individuals in recovery from opioid
use disorder, such as job application support and placement with
partnering employers, with emphasis on supporting innovative pilot
programs to develop a more robust workforce in rural areas of the
State.
b. Training and development funding to encourage a consortium of
public and private employers, workforce development boards, and
vocational services providers to develop workplace recovery friendly
ecosystems.
c. Transportation support services to enable individuals recovering from
opioid use disorder to travel to their places of treatment and their
places of employment.
(2) To support individuals with opioid use disorder who are involved in the
criminal justice system through programs and initiatives designed to
accomplish any one or more of the following:
a. Establishment or expansion of existing prearrest and post-arrest
diversion programs. This includes prearrest diversion, post-arrest
diversion, and court-based diversion through treatment or recovery
courts.
b. Establishment, expansion, or sustainment of medication-assisted
treatment programs that provide to individuals who are incarcerated
any medication approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for opioid use disorder. Programs authorized under
this sub-subdivision that are funded in whole or in part by the Opioid
Abatement Fund shall be made available to individuals who were
already participating in a medication-assisted treatment program prior
to being incarcerated, as well as to individuals who initiate
medication-assisted treatment during their incarceration to address an
opioid use disorder.
c. Creation or expansion of reentry programs to connect individuals
exiting incarceration with harm reduction, treatment, and recovery
supports.
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 57

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) To expand evidence-based treatment supports and to improve connections to
care, especially for individuals hospitalized for overdose who are uninsured
or underinsured, through the following activities or initiatives:
a. Evidence-based addiction treatment, including medication-assisted
treatment provided by inpatient or outpatient opioid treatment
programs.
b. Expanded access to cost-effective, low-cost, or no-cost
medication-assisted treatment in community-based settings.
c. Expanded care management services, including the use of peer support
specialists and care navigators in local health departments, detention
facilities, local departments of social services, and community-based
settings. Any funding provided pursuant to this sub-subdivision shall
be used to provide care management services involving outreach to,
engagement with, and coordination for individuals to assist them with
accessing opioid use disorder treatment.
d. Improve access to medications for opioid use disorder and other
clinical and recovery services through deployment of mobile opioid
treatment program units.
(4) To develop evidence-based supportive housing services, such as Housing
First, that are inclusive of individuals with substance use disorders. Qualifying
services that may be funded under this subdivision include the following:
a. Providing a move-in deposit, rental or utility assistance, or all of these
for individuals with substance use disorders who are in recovery or
transitioning from residential treatment or incarceration.
b. Providing community training sessions on tenancy rights and
responsibilities.
c. Establishing relationships with landlords to encourage the elimination
of preconditions for housing and to reduce potential incidences of
evictions due to substance misuse.
d. Providing other housing-related supports such as tents, sleeping bags,
or other supplies for outdoor living.
e. Funding or otherwise supporting recovery supported housing that
accepts individuals who are utilizing any medication approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of
opioid use disorder.
(5) To expand community based, peer, and collegiate recovery programs
providing recovery support services to individuals who have achieved or are
aiming to achieve recovery from opioid or other substance use disorders.
(6) To reduce opioid overdose deaths and improve overall health through the
following:
a. Increase overdose education and provide equitable access to opioid
overdose reversal medications.
b. Support evidence-based strategies to reduce overdose deaths
through expansion of syringe services programs.
(7) To expand workforce development activities aimed at increasing the number
of practitioners available to treat opioid and other substance use disorders.
These activities include, but are not limited to:
a. Addiction medicine fellowships;
b. Scholarships for students studying addiction and committed to
practicing the treatment of opioid use disorder upon completion of
study; and
Page 58 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. Support for universities, colleges, and healthcare practitioner training
programs to embed addiction training into the general curriculum in
fields of primary care, nursing, healthcare administration, social work,
counseling, psychology, medicine, and other affiliated healthcare
disciplines.
(8) To provide technical assistance to community organizations who have
received grant funding from the Opioid Abatement Fund to develop and
implement community programs and to the LME/MCOs that maximize
funding and achieve the best outcomes in their communities. Technical
assistance will include support in utilizing evidence-based practices,
budgeting, data collection and overall capacity building to ensure ongoing
viability of needed community programs.
(9) To collect data and evaluate programs to inform program planning and quality
improvement, and create data dashboards.

STATUTORILY APPROPRIATE OPIOID SETTLEMENT FUNDS TO THE DIVISION
OF MENTAL HEALTH, DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES AND SUBSTANCE
USE
SECTION 9G.4.(a) Section 9F.1(a) of S.L. 2021-180 is rewritten:
"The Opioid Abatement Reserve (Reserve) is established in the General Fund to maintain
funds Starting in the 2026-27 fiscal year, funds received by the State as a beneficiary of the final
consent judgment resolving the case, State of North Carolina, ex rel. Joshua H. Stein, Plaintiff v.
McKinsey and Company, Inc., in the General Court of Justice, Superior Court Division, Wake
County and County, (ii) any other funds received by the State as a result of a settlement, as
defined in G.S. 114-2.4A, relating to claims regarding the manufacturing, marketing,
distribution, dispensing, or sale of opioids, and (iii) funds received by the State as a beneficiary
of a confirmation order by a bankruptcy court relating to claims regarding the manufacturing,
marketing, distribution, dispensing, or sale of opioids. shall be appropriated directly to the Opioid
Abatement Fund, established in Section 9F.1.(a) of S.L. 2021-180."

PART IX-H. PUBLIC HEALTH

LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENTS/COMPETITIVE GRANT PROCESS TO
IMPROVE MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH
SECTION 9H.1. Section 9H.1(b) of S.L. 2023-134 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 9H.1.(b) The plan for administering the competitive grant process shall include
at least all of the following components:
(1) A request for application (RFA) process to allow local health departments to
apply for and receive State funds on a competitive basis. The Department shall
require local health departments to include in the application a plan to evaluate
the effectiveness, including measurable impact or outcomes, of the activities,
services, and programs for which the funds are being requested.
(2) A requirement that the Secretary prioritize grant awards to those local health
departments that are able to leverage non-State funds in addition to the grant
award.
(3) Ensures that funds received by the Department to implement the plan
supplement and do not supplant existing funds for maternal and child health
initiatives.
(4) Allows grants to be awarded to local health departments for up to twothree
years."

Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 59

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
USE OF JUUL SETTLEMENT FUNDS
SECTION 9H.2.(a) There is appropriated from the Youth Electronic Nicotine
Dependence Abatement Fund created in Section 9G.10(a) of S.L. 2021-180 to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health (DPH), three million two hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($3,250,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum
of two million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($2,750,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated and used as follows:
(1) Up to seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) in nonrecurring funds
for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall be used to support data
monitoring to track tobacco/nicotine use and exposure among youth and
young adults and populations at risk; for independent evaluation of the reach,
effectiveness, and outcomes of the State's evidence based programs designed
to help youth addicted to nicotine through electronic cigarettes and other new
and emerging tobacco and nicotine products quit; and to prepare the report
required by subsection (c) of this section.
(2) The remainder of these allocated funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium shall be used to fund evidence-based electronic cigarette and
nicotine dependence prevention and cessation activities targeting children,
youth, and young adults.
SECTION 9H.3.(b) Funds allocated under subsection (a) of this section shall remain
available for expenditure in the amounts and for the purposes specified in subsection (a) of this
section until expended.
SECTION 9H.4.(c) Annually, beginning November 1, 2025, the Department of
Health and Human Services shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health
and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division on the expenditures made from the Youth
Electronic Nicotine Dependence Abatement Fund during the preceding fiscal year. The report
shall include at least all of the following:
(1) An itemized list of expenditures and for each expenditure, an indication of the
authority under this section for the expenditure.
(2) An evaluation of the reach, effectiveness, and outcomes of each activity
funded pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) of this section.
(3) An evaluation of the reach, effectiveness, and outcomes of each activity
funded by Section 9G.10 of S.L. 2021-180, as amended by Section 9G.3 of
S.L. 2022-74.

LOCAL MEDICAL EXAMINER FEES
SECTION 9H.3. G.S. 130A-387 reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A-387. Fees.
For each investigation and prompt filing of the required report, the medical examiner shall
receive a fee paid by the State. However, if the deceased is a resident of the county in which the
death or fatal injury occurred, that county shall pay the fee. The fee shall be two hundred dollars
($200.00) four hundred dollars ($400.00)."

PART IX-I. SERVICES FOR THE BLIND/DEAF/HARD OF HEARING [RESERVED]

PART IX-J. SOCIAL SERVICES

TANF BENEFIT IMPLEMENTATION
SECTION 9J.1.(a) Beginning October 1, 2025, the General Assembly approves the
plan titled "North Carolina Temporary Assistance for Needy Families State Plan FFY
2026-2028," prepared by the Department of Health and Human Services and presented to the
Page 60 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
General Assembly. The North Carolina Temporary Assistance for Needy Families State Plan
covers the period of October 1, 2025, through September 30, 2028. The Department shall submit
the State Plan, as revised in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, to the United States
Department of Health and Human Services.
SECTION 9J.1.(b) The counties approved as Electing Counties in the North
Carolina Temporary Assistance for Needy Families State Plan FFY 2026-2028, as approved by
this section, are Beaufort, Caldwell, Catawba, Lenoir, Lincoln, Macon, and Wilson.
SECTION 9J.1.(c) Counties that submitted the letter of intent to remain as an
Electing County or to be redesignated as an Electing County and the accompanying county plan
for years 2026 through 2028, pursuant to G.S. 108A-27(e), shall operate under the Electing
County budget requirements effective July 1, 2025. For programmatic purposes, all counties
referred to in this subsection shall remain under their current county designation through
September 30, 2028.
SECTION 9J.1.(d) For each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, Electing
Counties shall be held harmless to their Work First Family Assistance allocations for the
2024-2025 fiscal year, provided that remaining funds allocated for Work First Family Assistance
and Work First Diversion Assistance are sufficient for payments made by the Department on
behalf of Standard Counties pursuant to G.S. 108A27.11(b).
SECTION 9J.1.(e) In the event that departmental projections of Work First Family
Assistance and Work First Diversion Assistance for the 2025-2026 fiscal year or the 2026-2027
fiscal year indicate that remaining funds are insufficient for Work First Family Assistance and
Work First Diversion Assistance payments to be made on behalf of Standard Counties, the
Department is authorized to deallocate funds, of those allocated to Electing Counties for Work
First Family Assistance in excess of the sums set forth in G.S. 108A-27.11, up to the requisite
amount for payments in Standard Counties. Prior to deallocation, the Department shall obtain
approval by the Office of State Budget and Management. If the Department adjusts the allocation
set forth in subsection (d) of this section, then a report shall be made to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division.

INTENSIVE FAMILY PRESERVATION SERVICES FUNDING, PERFORMANCE
ENHANCEMENTS, AND REPORT
SECTION 9J.2.(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 143B-150.6, the
Intensive Family Preservation Services (IFPS) Program shall provide intensive services to
children and families in cases of abuse, neglect, and dependency where a child is at imminent
risk of removal from the home and to children and families in cases of abuse where a child is not
at imminent risk of removal. The Program shall be implemented statewide on a regional basis.
The IFPS shall ensure the application of standardized assessment criteria for determining
imminent risk and clear criteria for determining out-of-home placement.
SECTION 9J.2.(b)The Department of Health and Human Services shall require that
any program or entity that receives State, federal, or other funding for the purpose of IFPS shall
provide information and data that allows for the following:
(1) An established follow-up system with a minimum of six months of follow-up
services.
(2) Detailed information on the specific interventions applied, including
utilization indicators and performance measurement.
(3) Cost-benefit data.
(4) Data on long-term benefits associated with IFPS. This data shall be obtained
by tracking families through the intervention process.
(5) The number of families remaining intact and the associated interventions
while in IFPS and 12 months thereafter.
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 61

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) The number and percentage, by race, of children who received IFPS compared
to the ratio of their distribution in the general population involved with Child
Protective Services.
SECTION 9J.2.(c) The Department shall continue implementing a
performance-based funding protocol and shall only provide funding to those programs and
entities providing the required information specified in subsection (b) of this section. The amount
of funding shall be based on the individual performance of each program.
SECTION 9J.2.(d) The Department shall submit an annual report to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research
Division by December 1 of each year that provides the information and data collected pursuant
to subsection (b) of this section.

CHILD CARING INSTITUTIONS
SECTION 9J.3. Until the Social Services Commission adopts rules setting
standardized rates for child caring institutions as authorized under G.S. 143B-153(8), the
maximum reimbursement for child caring institutions shall not exceed the rate established for the
specific child caring institution by the Department of Health and Human Services, Office of the
Controller. In determining the maximum reimbursement, the State shall include county and IV-E
reimbursements.

USE FOSTER CARE BUDGET FOR GUARDIANSHIP ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
SECTION 9J.4. Of the funds available for the provision of foster care services, the
Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, may continue to provide
for the financial support of children who are deemed to be (i) in a permanent family placement
setting, (ii) eligible for legal guardianship, and (iii) otherwise unlikely to receive permanency.
No additional expenses shall be incurred beyond the funds budgeted for foster care for the
Guardianship Assistance Program (GAP). The Guardianship Assistance Program shall include
provisions for extending guardianship services for individuals and youth who exited foster care
through the Guardianship Assistance Program after 14 years of age or who have attained the age
of 18 years and opt to continue to receive guardianship services until reaching 21 years of age if
the individual is (i) completing secondary education or a program leading to an equivalent
credential, (ii) enrolled in an institution that provides postsecondary or vocational education, (iii)
participating in a program or activity designed to promote, or remove barriers to, employment,
(iv) employed for at least 80 hours per month, or (v) incapable of completing the educational or
employment requirements of this section due to a medical condition or disability. The
Guardianship Assistance Program rates shall reimburse the legal guardian for room and board
and be set at the same rate as the foster care room and board rates in accordance with rates
established under G.S. 108A-49.1.

CHILD WELFARE POSTSECONDARY SUPPORT PROGRAM (NC REACH)
SECTION 9J.5.(a) Funds appropriated in this act from the General Fund to the
Department of Health and Human Services for the child welfare postsecondary support program
shall be used to continue providing assistance with the "cost of attendance" as that term is defined
in 20 U.S.C. § 1087ll for the educational needs of foster youth aging out of the foster care system,
youth who exit foster care to a permanent home through the Guardianship Assistance Program
(GAP), or special needs children adopted from foster care after age 12. These funds shall be
allocated by the State Education Assistance Authority.
SECTION 9J.5.(b) Of the funds appropriated in this act from the General Fund to
the Department of Health and Human Services, the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for
each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall be allocated to the North Carolina State
Education Assistance Authority (SEAA). The SEAA shall use these funds only to perform
Page 62 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
administrative functions necessary to manage and distribute scholarship funds under the child
welfare postsecondary support program.
SECTION 9J.5.(c) Of the funds appropriated in this act from the General Fund to
the Department of Health and Human Services, the sum of three hundred thirty-nine thousand
four hundred ninety-three dollars ($339,493) for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall
be used to contract with an entity to administer the child welfare postsecondary support program
described under subsection (a) of this section, which administration shall include the performance
of case management services.
SECTION 9J.5.(d) Funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Health and
Human Services for the child welfare postsecondary support program shall be used only for
students attending public institutions of higher education in this State.

FEDERAL CHILD SUPPORT INCENTIVE PAYMENTS
SECTION 9J.6.(a) Centralized Services. The North Carolina Child Support
Services Section (NCCSS) of the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social
Services, shall retain up to fifteen percent (15%) of the annual federal incentive payments it
receives from the federal government to enhance centralized child support services. To
accomplish this requirement, NCCSS shall do the following:
(1) In consultation with representatives from county child support services
programs, identify how federal incentive funding could improve centralized
services.
(2) Use federal incentive funds to improve the effectiveness of the State's
centralized child support services by supplementing and not supplanting State
expenditures for those services.
(3) Continue to develop and implement rules that explain the State process for
calculating and distributing federal incentive funding to county child support
services programs.
SECTION 9J.6.(b) County Child Support Services Programs. NCCSS shall allocate
no less than eighty-five percent (85%) of the annual federal incentive payments it receives from
the federal government to county child support services programs to improve effectiveness and
efficiency using the federal performance measures. To that end, NCCSS shall do the following:
(1) In consultation with representatives from county child support services
programs, examine the current methodology for distributing federal incentive
funding to the county programs and determine whether an alternative formula
would be appropriate. NCCSS shall use its current formula for distributing
federal incentive funding until an alternative formula is adopted.
(2) Upon adopting an alternative formula, develop a process to phase in the
alternative formula for distributing federal incentive funding over a four-year
period.
SECTION 9J.6.(c) Reporting by County Child Support Services Programs. –
NCCSS shall continue implementing guidelines that identify appropriate uses for federal
incentive funding. To ensure those guidelines are properly followed, NCCSS shall require county
child support services programs to comply with each of the following:
(1) Submit an annual plan describing how federal incentive funding would
improve program effectiveness and efficiency as a condition of receiving
federal incentive funding.
(2) Report annually on the following: (i) how federal incentive funding has
improved program effectiveness and efficiency and been reinvested into their
programs, (ii) provide documentation that the funds were spent according to
their annual plans, and (iii) explain any deviations from their plans.
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 63

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 9J.6.(d) Reporting by NCCSS. – NCCSS shall submit a report on federal
child support incentive funding to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and
Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division by November 1 of each year. The report shall
describe how federal incentive funds enhanced centralized child support services to benefit
county child support services programs and improved the effectiveness and efficiency of county
child support services programs. The report shall further include any changes to the State process
that NCCSS used in calculating and distributing federal incentive funding to county child support
services programs and any recommendations for further changes.

SUCCESSFUL TRANSITION/FOSTER CARE YOUTH
SECTION 9J.7. The Foster Care Transitional Living Initiative Fund shall continue
to fund and support transitional living services that demonstrate positive outcomes for youth,
attract significant private sector funding, and lead to the development of evidence-based
programs to serve the at-risk population described in this section. The Fund shall continue to
support a demonstration project with services provided by Youth Villages to (i) improve
outcomes for youth ages 17-21 years who transition from foster care through implementation of
outcome-based Transitional Living Services, (ii) identify cost-savings in social services and
juvenile and adult correction services associated with the provision of Transitional Living
Services to youth aging out of foster care, and (iii) take necessary steps to establish an
evidence-based transitional living program available to all youth aging out of foster care. In
continuing to implement these goals, the Foster Care Transitional Living Initiative Fund shall
support the following strategies:
(1) Transitional Living Services, which is an outcome-based program that follows
the Youth Villages Transitional Living Model. Outcomes on more than 7,000
participants have been tracked since the program's inception. The program has
been evaluated through an independent randomized controlled trial. Results
indicate that the Youth Villages Transitional Living Model had positive
impacts in a variety of areas, including housing stability, earnings, economic
hardship, mental health, and intimate partner violence in comparison to the
control population.
(2) Public-Private Partnership, which is a commitment by private-sector funding
partners to match at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the funds appropriated
to the Foster Care Transitional Living Initiative Fund for the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium for the purposes of providing Transitional Living Services through
the Youth Villages Transitional Living Model to youth aging out of foster
care.
(3) Impact Measurement and Evaluation, which are services funded through
private partners to provide independent measurement and evaluation of the
impact the Youth Villages Transitional Living Model has on the youth served,
the foster care system, and on other programs and services provided by the
State which are utilized by former foster care youth.
(4) Advancement of Evidence-Based Process, which is the implementation and
ongoing evaluation of the Youth Villages Transitional Living Model for the
purposes of establishing the first evidence-based transitional living program
in the nation. To establish the evidence-based program, additional randomized
controlled trials may be conducted to advance the model.

PART IX-K. DIVISION OF EMPLOYMENT AND INDEPEDENCE FOR PEOPLE
WITH DISABILITIES [RESERVED]

PART IX-L. DHHS BLOCK GRANTS
Page 64 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

DHHS BLOCK GRANTS
SECTION 9L.1.(a) Except as otherwise provided, appropriations from federal Block
Grant funds are made for each year of the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2027, according to the
following schedule:

TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
FAMILIES (TANF) FUNDS

Local Program Expenditures

Division of Social Services

01. Work First Family Assistance $31,259,794 $31,259,794

02. Work First County Block Grants 80,093,566 80,093,566

03. Work First Electing Counties 2,378,213 2,378,213

04. Adoption Services – Special Children
Adoption Fund 4,001,676 4,001,676

05. Child Protective Services – Child Welfare
Workers for Local DSS 11,387,190 11,387,190

06. Child Welfare Program Improvement Plan 775,176 775,176

07. Child Welfare Collaborative 400,000 400,000

08. Child Welfare Initiatives 2,900,000 2,900,000

Division of Child Development and Early Education

09. Subsidized Child Care Program 45,813,694 45,813,694

10. Swap-Child Care Subsidy 12,600,000 12,600,000

11. NC Pre-K Services 68,300,000 68,300,000

Division of Public Health

12. Teen Pregnancy Prevention Initiatives 3,538,541 3,538,541

DHHS Administration

13. Division of Social Services 2,478,284 2,478,284

14. Division of Child and Family Well Being 3,976 3,976

15. Office of the Secretary 34,042 34,042

Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 65

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
16. Eligibility Systems – Operations and
Maintenance 431,733 431,733

17. NC FAST Implementation 428,239 428,239

18. Division of Social Services – Workforce
Innovation & Opportunity Act (WIOA) 93,216 93,216

19. Division of Social Services TANF Modernization 2,000,000 2,000,000

Transfers to Other Block Grants

Division of Child Development and Early Education

20. Transfer to the Child Care and Development Fund 21,773,001 21,773,001

Division of Social Services

21. Transfer to Social Services Block
Grant for Child Protective Services – Training 285,612 285,612

22. Transfer to Social Services Block
Grant for Child Protective Services 5,040,000 5,040,000

23. Transfer to Social Services Block
Grant for County Departments of
Social Services for Children's Services 13,166,244 13,166,244

24. Transfer to Social Services Block
Grant – Foster Care Services 3,422,219 3,422,219

25. Transfer to Social Services Block 1,582,000 1,582,000
Grant – Child Advocacy Centers

TOTAL TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR
NEEDY FAMILIES (TANF) FUNDS $314,186,416 $314,186,416

TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FAMILIES (TANF)
EMERGENCY CONTINGENCY FUNDS

Local Program Expenditures

Division of Child Development and Early Education

01. Subsidized Child Care $34,337,395 $34,337,395

TOTAL TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR
NEEDY FAMILIES (TANF) EMERGENCY
CONTINGENCY FUNDS $34,337,395 $34,337,395

SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT
Page 66 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

Local Program Expenditures

Divisions of Social Services and Aging and Adult Services

01. County Departments of Social Services $19,837,388 $19,837,388

02. County Departments of Social Services
(Transfer From TANF) 13,166,244 13,166,244

03. EBCI Tribal Public Health and Human Services 244,740 244,740

04. Child Protective Services
(Transfer From TANF) 5,040,000 5,040,000

05. State In-Home Services Fund 1,943,950 1,943,950

06. Adult Protective Services 3,864,547 2,138,404

07. State Adult Day Care Fund 1,994,084 1,994,084

08. Child Protective Services/CPS
Investigative Services – Child Medical
Evaluation Program 901,868 901,868

09. Special Children Adoption Incentive Fund 462,600 462,600

10. Child Protective Services – Child
Welfare Training for Counties
(Transfer From TANF) 285,612 285,612

11. Home and Community Care Block
Grant (HCCBG) 2,696,888 2,696,888

12. Child Advocacy Centers
(Transfer from TANF) 1,582,000 1,582,000

13. Guardianship – Division of Social Services 1,802,671 1,802,671

14. Foster Care Services
(Transfer From TANF) 3,422,219 3,422,219

14A. Big Brothers Big Sisters of the Triangle, Inc. 350,000 350,000

Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services

15. Mental Health Services – Adult and
Child/Developmental Disabilities Program/
Substance Abuse Services – Adult 4,149,595 4,149,595

15A. Autism Society of North Carolina, Inc. 2,541,392 2,541,392
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 67

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

15B. The Arc of North Carolina, Inc. 271,074 271,074

15C. Easterseals UCP North Carolina & Virginia, Inc. 1,612,059 1,612,059

DHHS Program Expenditures

Division of Services for the Blind

16. Independent Living Program & Program Oversight 4,237,849 4,237,849

Division of Health Service Regulation

17. Adult Care Licensure Program 891,520 891,520

18. Mental Health Licensure and
Certification Program 266,158 266,158

Division of Social Services

19. Guardianship 3,825,443 3,825,443

DHHS Administration

20. Division of Aging and Adult Services 188,787 188,787

21. Division of Social Services 1,724,551 1,724,551

22. Office of the Secretary/Controller's Office 673,990 673,990

23. Legislative Increases/Fringe Benefits 293,655 587,310

24. Division of Child Development and
Early Education 13,878 13,878

25. Division of Mental Health, Developmental
Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services 29,966 29,966

26. Division of Health Service Regulation 592,882 592,882

TOTAL SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT $78,907,610 $77,475,122

LOW-INCOME ENERGY ASSISTANCE BLOCK GRANT

Local Program Expenditures

Division of Social Services

01. Low-Income Energy Assistance
Program (LIEAP) $56,369,281 $56,369,281

Page 68 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
02. Crisis Intervention Program (CIP) 44,804,354 44,804,354

Local Administration

Division of Social Services

03. County DSS Administration 8,037,889 8,037,889

DHHS Administration

Division of Central Management and Support

04. Administration 10,000 10,000

05. Energy Portal (FIS Transaction Fees) 25,000 25,000

06. Office of the Secretary/ Division of Information Resource
Management (DIRM) (Accountable Results for
Community Action (AR4CA) Replacement System) 166,750 166,750

07. Office of the Secretary/DIRM 278,954 278,954

08. Office of the Secretary/Controller's Office 18,378 18,378

09. NC FAST Development 627,869 627,869

10. NC FAST Operations and Maintenance 1,330,323 1,330,323

Transfers to Other State Agencies

Department of Environmental Quality

11. Weatherization Program 10,356,943 10,356,943

12. Heating Air Repair and Replacement
Program (HARRP) 5,898,508 5,898,508

13. Local Residential Energy Efficiency Service
Providers – Weatherization 574,945 574,945

14. Local Residential Energy Efficiency Service
Providers – HARRP 319,414 319,414

15. DEQ – Weatherization Administration 628,180 628,180

16. DEQ – HARRP Administration 393,944 393,944

Department of Administration

17. N.C. Commission on Indian Affairs 87,736 87,736

Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 69

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
TOTAL LOW-INCOME ENERGY
ASSISTANCE BLOCK GRANT $129,928,468 $129,928,468

CHILD CARE AND DEVELOPMENT FUND BLOCK GRANT

Local Program Expenditures

Division of Child Development and Early Education

01. Child Care Services $471,880,848 $411,280,848

02. Smart Start Subsidy 7,392,654 7,392,654

03. Transfer from TANF Block Grant
for Child Care Subsidies 21,773,001 21,773,001

04. Quality and Availability Initiatives
(TEACH Program $3,800,000) 85,830,526 66,430,526

DHHS Administration

Division of Child Development and Early Education

05. DCDEE Administrative Expenses 12,710,886 12,710,886

06. Indirect Cost 7,346 7,346

Division of Social Services

07. Direct Deposit for Child Care Payments 5,000 5,000

08. Local Subsidized Child Care
Services Support 18,780,355 18,780,355

Division of Central Management and Support

09. NC FAST Operations and Maintenance 1,450,316 1,450,316

10. DHHS Central Administration – DIRM
Technical Services 1,029,762 1,029,762

11. DHHS Central Administration 118,000 118,000

Division of Child and Family Well-Being

12. Child Care Health Consultation Contracts 62,205 62,205

TOTAL CHILD CARE AND DEVELOPMENT
FUND BLOCK GRANT $621,040,899 $541,040,899

MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES BLOCK GRANT
Page 70 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

Local Program Expenditures

01. Mental Health Services – Child $2,477,666 $2,477,666

02. Mental Health Services – Adult/Child 23,420,169 15,467,497

03. Mental Health Services – First
Psychotic Symptom Treatment 5,416,756 3,000,000

04. Child Behavioral Health (Division of Child
and Family Well-Being) 5,246,350 5,246,350

DHHS Administration

Division of Child and Family Well Being

05. Administration 140,000 140,000

Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services

06. Crisis Services 2,877,047 1,877,047

07. Administration 332,351 332,351

08. Adult/Child Mental Health Services 350,150 350,150

Division of Public Health

09. NC Detect – Behavioral Health ER 35,000 35,000

TOTAL MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES
BLOCK GRANT $40,295,489 $28,926,061

SUBSTANCE ABUSE PREVENTION, TREATMENT, AND RECOVERY SERVICES
BLOCK GRANT

Local Program Expenditures

Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services

01. Substance Abuse – IV Drug $2,000,000 $2,000,000

02. Substance Abuse Prevention 13,351,864 13,351,864

03. Substance Use Services – Treatment for
Children/Adults 40,038,949 40,038,949

04. Crisis Solutions Initiatives – Collegiate
Wellness/Addiction Recovery 1,545,205 1,545,205

Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 71

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
05. Veterans Initiatives 250,000 250,000
DHHS Administration

Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services

06. Administration 2,297,852 2,297,852

07. Controlled Substance Reporting System
Enhancement 675,000 675,000

TOTAL SUBSTANCE ABUSE PREVENTION
AND TREATMENT BLOCK GRANT $60,158,870 $60,158,870

MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH BLOCK GRANT

Local Program Expenditures

Division of Child and Family Well-Being

Children's Health Services $5,453,930 $5,453,930

Division of Public Health

02. Women's and Children's Health Services 11,646,618 11,646,618

03. Oral Health 58,413 58,413

04. Evidence-Based Programs in Counties
With Highest Infant Mortality Rates 1,727,307 1,727,307

DHHS Program Expenditures

05. Children's Health Services 1,287,619 1,287,619

06. Women's Health – Maternal Health 489,568 489,568

07. Women's and Children's Health – Perinatal
Strategic Plan Support Position 81,112 81,112

08. State Center for Health Statistics 158,583 158,583

09. Health Promotion – Injury and
Violence Prevention 87,271 87,271

DHHS Administration

11. Division of Public Health Administration 340,646 340,646

11. Division of Child and Family Well Being
Administration 211,925 211,925

Page 72 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
TOTAL MATERNAL AND CHILD
HEALTH BLOCK GRANT $21,542,992 $21,542,992

PREVENTIVE HEALTH AND HEALTH SERVICES BLOCK GRANT

Local Program Expenditures

01. Physical Activity and Prevention $3,081,442 $3,081,442

DHHS Program Expenditures

Division of Public Health

02. HIV/STD Prevention and
Community Planning 135,063 135,063

03. Oral Health Preventive Services 150,000 150,000

04. Injury and Violence Prevention
(Services to Rape Victims – Set-Aside) 217,935 217,935

05. Performance Improvement and
Accountability 1,384,421 1,199,557

06. State Center for Health Statistics 48,000 48,000

DHHS Administration

Division of Public Health

07. Division of Public Health 65,000 65,000

TOTAL PREVENTIVE HEALTH AND HEALTH
SERVICES BLOCK GRANT $5,081,861 $4,896,997

COMMUNITY SERVICES BLOCK GRANT

01. Community Action Agencies $22,260,015 $21,438,318

02. Limited Purpose Agencies/Discretionary Funding 615,037 549,638

03. Office of Economic Opportunity 1,070,001 1,024,351

04. Office of the Secretary/DIRM (Accountable Results
For Community Action (AR4CA) Replacement
System) 394,964 414,713

05. Office of Economic Opportunity – Workforce
Investment Opportunities Act (WIOA) 60,000 60,000

TOTAL COMMUNITY SERVICES
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 73

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
BLOCK GRANT $24,400,017 $23,487,020

GENERAL PROVISIONS
SECTION 9L.1.(b) Information to be Included in Block Grant Plans. – The
Department of Health and Human Services shall submit a separate plan for each Block Grant
received and administered by the Department, and each plan shall include the following:
(1) A delineation of the proposed allocations by program or activity, including
State and federal match requirements.
(2) A delineation of the proposed State and local administrative expenditures.
(3) An identification of all new positions to be established through the Block
Grant, including permanent, temporary, and time-limited positions.
(4) A comparison of the proposed allocations by program or activity with two
prior years' program and activity budgets and two prior years' actual program
or activity expenditures.
(5) A projection of current year expenditures by program or activity.
(6) A projection of federal Block Grant funds available, including unspent federal
funds from the current and prior fiscal years.
(7) The required amount of maintenance of effort and the amount of funds
qualifying for maintenance of effort in the previous year delineated by
program or activity.
SECTION 9L.1.(c) Changes in Federal Fund Availability. – If the Congress of the
United States increases the federal fund availability for any of the Block Grants or contingency
funds and other grants related to existing Block Grants administered by the Department of Health
and Human Services from the amounts appropriated in this act, the Department shall allocate the
increase proportionally across the program and activity appropriations identified for that Block
Grant in this section. In allocating an increase in federal fund availability, the Office of State
Budget and Management shall not approve funding for new programs or activities not
appropriated in this act.
If the Congress of the United States decreases the federal fund availability for any of
the Block Grants or contingency funds and other grants related to existing Block Grants
administered by the Department of Health and Human Services from the amounts appropriated
in this act, the Department shall develop a plan to adjust the Block Grants based on reduced
federal funding.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, for fiscal years 2025-2026 and
2026-2027, increases in the federal fund availability for the Temporary Assistance to Needy
Families (TANF) Block Grant shall be used only for the North Carolina Child Care Subsidy
program to pay for child care and shall not be used to supplant State funds.
Prior to allocating the change in federal fund availability, the proposed allocation
must be approved by the Office of State Budget and Management. If the Department adjusts the
allocation of any Block Grant due to changes in federal fund availability, then a report shall be
made to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal
Research Division.
SECTION 9L.1.(d) Except as otherwise provided, appropriations from federal
Block Grant funds are made for each year of the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2027, according
to the schedule enacted for State fiscal years 2025-2026 and 2026-2027, or until a new schedule
is enacted by the General Assembly.
SECTION 9L.1.(e) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e1) of this section,
all changes to the budgeted allocations to the Block Grants or contingency funds and other grants
related to existing Block Grants administered by the Department of Health and Human Services
that are not specifically addressed in this section shall be approved by the Office of State Budget
and Management. The Office of State Budget and Management shall not approve. funding for
Page 74 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
new programs or activities not appropriated in this section The Office of State Budget and
Management shall consult with the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human
Services for review prior to implementing any changes. In consulting, the report shall include an
itemized listing of affected programs, including associated changes in budgeted allocations. All
changes to the budgeted allocations to the Block Grants shall be reported immediately to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research
Division. This subsection does not apply to Block Grant changes caused by legislative salary
increases and benefit adjustments.
SECTION 9L.1.(e) The Department of Health and Human Services shall have the
authority to realign appropriated funds under subsection (a) of this section for Item 01 or 02 in
the Maternal and Child Health Block Grant to maintain federal compliance and programmatic
alignment, so long as the realignment does not result in a reduction of funds designated for
subrecipients under subsection (a) of this section. The Department of Health and Human Services
is authorized to realign appropriated funds between the Maternal and Child Health Block Grant
categories as provided in this subsection without prior consultation with the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services or without exceeding the total amount
appropriated for the items.
SECTION 9L.1.(f) Except as otherwise provided, the Department of Health and
Human Services shall have flexibility to transfer funding between the Temporary Assistance for
Needy Families (TANF) Block Grant and the TANF Emergency Contingency Funds Block Grant
so long as the total allocation for the line items within those Block Grants remains the same.

TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FAMILIES (TANF) FUNDS
SECTION 9L.1.(g) The sum of eighty million ninety-three thousand five hundred
sixty-six dollars ($80,093,566) for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium appropriated in
this act in TANF funds to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social
Services, shall be used for Work First County Block Grants. The Division shall certify these
funds in the appropriate State-level services based on prior year actual expenditures. The Division
has the authority to realign the authorized budget for these funds among the State-level services
based on current year actual expenditures. The Division shall also have the authority to realign
appropriated funds from Work First Family Assistance for electing counties to the Work First
County Block Grant for electing counties based on current year expenditures so long as the
electing counties meet Maintenance of Effort requirements.
SECTION 9L.1.(h) The sum of eleven million three hundred eighty-seven thousand
one hundred ninety dollars ($11,387,190) for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium
appropriated in this act to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social
Services, in TANF funds for child welfare improvements shall be allocated to the county
departments of social services for hiring or contracting staff to investigate and provide services
in Child Protective Services cases; to provide foster care and support services; to recruit, train,
license, and support prospective foster and adoptive families; and to provide interstate and
post-adoption services for eligible families.
Counties shall maintain their level of expenditures in local funds for Child Protective
Services workers. Of the Block Grant funds appropriated for Child Protective Services workers,
the total expenditures from State and local funds for the 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 fiscal years
shall not be less than the total expended from State and local funds for the 2012-2013 fiscal year.
SECTION 9L.1.(i) The sum of four million one thousand six hundred seventy-six
dollars ($4,001,676) for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium appropriated in this act in
TANF funds to the Department of Health and Human Services, Special Children Adoption Fund,
shall be used in accordance with G.S. 108A-50.2. The Division of Social Services, in consultation
with the North Carolina Association of County Directors of Social Services and representatives
of licensed private adoption agencies, shall develop guidelines for the awarding of funds to
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 75

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
licensed public and private adoption agencies upon the adoption of children described in
G.S. 108A-50 and in foster care. Payments received from the Special Children Adoption Fund
by participating agencies shall be used exclusively to enhance the adoption services program. No
local match shall be required as a condition for receipt of these funds.
SECTION 9L.1.(j) The sum of two million nine hundred thousand dollars
($2,900,000) appropriated in this act in TANF funds to the Department of Health and Human
Services, Division of Social Services, for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall
be used for child welfare initiatives to (i) enhance the skills of social workers to improve the
outcomes for families and children involved in child welfare and (ii) enhance the provision of
services to families in their homes in the least restrictive setting.

SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT
SECTION 9L.1.(k) The sum of nineteen million eight hundred thirty-seven
thousand three hundred eighty-eight dollars ($19,837,388) for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and the
sum of nineteen million eight hundred thirty-seven thousand three hundred eighty-eight dollars
($19,837,388) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year appropriated in this act in the Social Services Block
Grant to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, and the sum
of thirteen million one hundred sixty-six thousand two hundred forty-four dollars ($13,166,244)
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of thirteen million one hundred sixty-six thousand two
hundred forty-four dollars ($13,166,244) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year transferred from funds
appropriated in the TANF Block Grant shall be used for county Block Grants. The Division shall
certify these funds in the appropriate State-level services based on prior year actual expenditures.
The Division has the authority to realign the authorized budget for these funds, as well as State
Social Services Block Grant funds, among the State-level services based on current year actual
expenditures.
SECTION 9L.1.(l) The sum of two hundred eighty-five thousand six hundred twelve
dollars ($285,612) appropriated in this act in the Social Services Block Grant to the Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027
fiscal biennium shall be used to support the state's child welfare training system. Training is
delivered to county child welfare staff that addresses the knowledge and skills needed to complete
their daily tasks in the areas of child protective services, foster care, on-going child welfare
services, and adoption.
SECTION 9L.1.(m) The Department of Health and Human Services is authorized,
subject to the approval of the Office of State Budget and Management, to transfer Social Services
Block Grant funding allocated for departmental administration between divisions that have
received administrative allocations from the Social Services Block Grant.
SECTION 9L.1.(n) Social Services Block Grant funds appropriated for the Special
Children Adoption Incentive Fund shall require a fifty percent (50%) local match.
SECTION 9L.1.(o) The sum of five million forty thousand dollars ($5,040,000)
appropriated in this act in the Social Services Block Grant for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027
fiscal biennium transferred from funds appropriated in the TANF Block Grant shall be allocated
to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services. The Division shall
allocate these funds to local departments of social services to replace the loss of Child Protective
Services State funds that are currently used by county governments to pay for Child Protective
Services staff at the local level. These funds shall be used to maintain the number of Child
Protective Services workers throughout the State. These Social Services Block Grant funds shall
be used to pay for salaries and related expenses only and are exempt from 10A NCAC 71R
.0201(3) requiring a local match of twenty-five percent (25%).
SECTION 9L.1.(p) The sum of one million five hundred eighty-two thousand
dollars ($1,582,000) appropriated in this act in the Social Services Block Grant for each fiscal
year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division
Page 76 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
of Social Services, shall be used to continue support for the Child Advocacy Centers. These funds
are exempt from the provisions of 10A NCAC 71R .0201(3).
SECTION 9L.1.(q) The sum of three million eight hundred twenty-five thousand
four hundred forty-three dollars ($3,825,443) for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium appropriated in this act in the Social Services Block Grant to the Department of Health
and Human Services, Division of Social Services, shall be used for guardianship services
pursuant to Chapter 35A of the General Statutes. The Department may expend funds allocated in
this section to support existing corporate guardianship contracts during the 2025-2026 and
2026-2027 fiscal years.
SECTION 9L.1.(r) Of the three million eight hundred sixty-four thousand five
hundred forty-seven dollars ($3,864,547) in the 2025-2026 fiscal year and two million one
hundred thirty-eight thousand four hundred four dollars ($2,138,404) for the 2026-2027
fiscal year appropriated in this act in the Social Services Block Grant to the Division of Aging
and Adult Services for Adult Protective Services for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium,
the sum of eight hundred ninety-three thousand forty-one dollars ($893,041) for each year of the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall be used to increase the number of Adult Protective Services
workers where these funds can be the most effective. These funds shall be used to pay for salaries
and related expenses and shall not be used to supplant any other source of funding for staff. These
funds are also exempt from 10A NCAC 71R .0201(3) requiring a local match of twenty-five
percent (25%).
SECTION 9L.1.(s) The following amounts appropriated in this act in the Social
Services Block Grant for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services or Division of Mental Health,
Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services, for the nonprofit organizations
described in this subsection shall be exempt from the provisions of 10A NCAC 71R .0201(3):
(1) The sum of three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) for each fiscal
year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for Big Brothers Big Sisters of the
Triangle, Inc.
(2) The sum of two million five hundred forty-one thousand three hundred
ninety-two dollars ($2,541,392) for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium for Autism Society of North Carolina, Inc.
(3) The sum of two hundred seventy-one thousand seventy-four dollars
($271,074) for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for The Arc
of North Carolina, Inc.
(4) The sum of one million six hundred twelve thousand fifty-nine dollars
($1,612,059) for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for
Easterseals UCP of North Carolina & Virginia, Inc.

LOW-INCOME ENERGY ASSISTANCE BLOCK GRANT
SECTION 9L.1.(t) The Division of Social Services shall have the authority to
realign appropriated funds between the State-level services Low-Income Energy Assistance
Payments and Crisis Assistance Payments without prior consultation with the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services to ensure needs are effectively met without
exceeding the total amount appropriated for these State-level service items. Additional
emergency contingency funds received may be allocated for Energy Assistance Payments or
Crisis Intervention Payments without prior consultation with the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Health and Human Services. Additional funds received shall be reported to the
Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research
Division upon notification of the award. The Department of Health and Human Services shall
not allocate funds for any activities, including increasing administration, other than assistance
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 77

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
payments, without prior consultation with the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health
and Human Services.
SECTION 9L.1.(u) The sum of fifty-six million three hundred sixty-nine thousand
two hundred eighty-one dollars ($56,369,281) for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium
appropriated in this act in the Low-Income Energy Assistance Block Grant to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, shall be used for Energy Assistance
Payments for the households of (i) elderly persons age 60 and above with income up to one
hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal poverty level and (ii) disabled persons eligible for
services funded through the Division of Aging and Adult Services.
County departments of social services shall submit to the Division of Social Services
an outreach plan for targeting households with 60-year-old household members no later than
August 1 of each year. The outreach plan shall comply with the following:
(1) Ensure that eligible households are made aware of the available assistance,
with particular attention paid to the elderly population age 60 and above and
disabled persons receiving services through the Division of Aging and Adult
Services.
(2) Include efforts by the county department of social services to contact other
State and local governmental entities and community-based organizations to
(i) offer the opportunity to provide outreach and (ii) receive applications for
energy assistance.
(3) Be approved by the local board of social services or human services board
prior to submission.

CHILD CARE AND DEVELOPMENT FUND BLOCK GRANT
SECTION 9L.1.(v) Payment for subsidized child care services provided with federal
TANF funds shall comply with all regulations and policies issued by the Division of Child
Development and Early Education for the subsidized child care program.
SECTION 9L.1.(w) If funds appropriated through the Child Care and Development
Fund Block Grant for any program cannot be obligated or spent in that program within the
obligation or liquidation periods allowed by the federal grants, the Department may move funds
to child care subsidies, unless otherwise prohibited by federal requirements of the grant, in order
to use the federal funds fully.

COMMUNITY MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES BLOCK GRANT
SECTION 9L.1.(x) The sum of five million four hundred sixteen thousand seven
hundred fifty-six dollars ($5,416,756) for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and three million dollars
($3,000,000) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year appropriated in this act in the Community Mental
Health Services Block Grant to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of
Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services, is to be used for Mental
Health Services – First Psychotic Symptom Treatment.

MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH BLOCK GRANT
SECTION 9L.1.(y) The sum of one million seven hundred twenty-seven thousand
three hundred seven dollars ($1,727,307) appropriated in this act in the Maternal and Child
Health Block Grant to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health,
for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall be used for evidence-based programs in
counties with the highest infant mortality rates. The Division shall report on (i) the counties
selected to receive the allocation, (ii) the specific evidence-based services provided, (iii) the
number of women served, and (iv) any impact on the counties' infant mortality rate. The Division
shall report its findings to the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Health
Page 78 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, and
the Fiscal Research Division no later than December 31 of each year.
SECTION 9L.1.(z) The sum of eighty-one thousand one hundred twelve dollars
($81,112) allocated in this section in the Maternal and Child Health Block Grant to the
Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, Women and Children's
Health Section, for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium shall not be used to supplant
existing State or federal funds. This allocation shall be used for a Public Health Program
Consultant position assigned full-time to manage the North Carolina Perinatal Health Strategic
Plan and provide staff support for the stakeholder work group.
SECTION 9L.1.(aa) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, shall have the authority
to realign appropriated funds between the Maternal and Child Health Block Grant categories to
maintain federal compliance and programmatic alignment without exceeding the total amount
appropriated for the Maternal and Child Health Block Grant.

PART X. AGRICULTURE AND CONSUMER SERVICES [RESERVED]

PART XI. COMMERCE

PART XI. COMMERCE

COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANTS
SECTION 11.1.(a) Allocations. – Of the funds appropriated in this act for federal
block grant funds, the following allocations are made for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2025,
and June 30, 2026, according to the following schedule:

COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT

01. State Administration $1,488,189

02. Neighborhood Revitalization 25,784,790

03. Economic Development 14,000,000

04. Rural Community Development 5,000,000

TOTAL COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
BLOCK GRANT 2024 Program Year $46,308,393
2025 Program Year $46,272,979
2026 Program Year $46,272,979

SECTION 11.1.(b) Availability Reduction. – If federal funds are reduced below the
amounts specified in this section after the effective date of this act, then every program in each
of these federal block grants shall be reduced by the same percentage as the reduction in federal
funds.
SECTION 11.1.(c) Availability Increase. – Any block grant funds appropriated by
the Congress of the United States in addition to the funds specified in this section shall be
expended as follows: each program category under the Community Development Block Grant
shall be increased by the same percentage as the increase in federal funds.
SECTION 11.1.(d) Reallocation. – The Department of Commerce shall consult with
the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations (Commission) prior to
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 79

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
reallocating Community Development Block Grant Funds. Notwithstanding the provisions of
this subsection, whenever the Director of the Budget finds either of the following conditions
exist:
(1) If a reallocation is required because of an emergency that poses an imminent
threat to public health or public safety, then the Director of the Budget may
authorize the reallocation without consulting the Commission. The
Department of Commerce shall report to the Commission on the reallocation
no later than 30 days after it was authorized and shall identify in the report the
emergency, the type of action taken, and how it was related to the emergency.
(2) If the State will lose federal block grant funds or receive less federal block
grant funds in the next fiscal year unless a reallocation is made, then the
Department of Commerce shall provide a written report to the Commission
on the proposed reallocation and shall identify the reason that failure to take
action will result in the loss of federal funds. If the Commission does not hear
the issue within 30 days of receipt of the report, the Department of Commerce
may take the action without consulting the Commission.
SECTION 11.1.(e) Report. – By October 1, 2025, and September 1, 2026, the
Department of Commerce shall report to the chairs of the House of Representatives
Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources; the chairs of
the Senate Appropriations Committee on Agriculture, Natural, and Economic Resources; the
chairs of the Joint Legislative Economic Development and Global Engagement Oversight
Committee; and the Fiscal Research Division on the use of Community Development Block
Grant Funds appropriated in the prior fiscal year. The report shall include the following:
(1) A discussion of each of the categories of funding, including information on
the statewide need in each category.
(2) Information on the number of applications that were received in each category
and the total dollar amount requested in each category.
(3) A list of grantees, including the grantee's name, county, category under which
the grant was funded, the amount awarded, and a narrative description of the
project.
SECTION 11.1.(f) Neighborhood Revitalization. – Funds allocated to the
Neighborhood Revitalization Category in subsection (a) of this section shall be made available
as grants for eligible activities listed in this subsection. The funds available for grants under this
category may be used for all of the following, subject to the national objectives and eligible
activities allowed under guidance issued by the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development (HUD):
(1) Essential repairs to prevent abandonment and deterioration of housing in
low- and moderate- income neighborhoods.
(2) Demolition and rehabilitation of buildings and improvements.
(3) Public improvements, including parks, streets, sidewalks, and water and sewer
lines.
SECTION 11.1.(g) Economic Development. – Funds allocated to the Economic
Development Category in subsection (a) of this section shall be made available as grants for
eligible activities listed in this subsection. The funds available for grants under this category may
be used for all of the following, subject to the national objectives and eligible activities allowed
under guidance issued by HUD:
(1) Acquisition of real property.
(2) Demolition and rehabilitation of buildings and improvements.
(3) Removal of material and architectural barriers.
(4) Public improvements, including parks, streets, sidewalks, and water and
sewer lines.
Page 80 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) Loans and grants to public or private nonprofit entities for construction and
rehabilitation activities.
(6) Assistance to private, for-profit entities for economic development.
(7) Technical assistance to public or nonprofit entities for neighborhood
revitalization or economic development activities.
(8) Assistance to for-profit and nonprofit entities to facilitate economic
development activities.
SECTION 11.1.(h) Rural Community Development. – Funds allocated for the Rural
Community Development Category in subsection (a) of this section shall be made available as
grants for eligible activities listed in this subsection. These funds shall provide grants that support
community development and comprehensive growth projects to be awarded by the North
Carolina Department of Commerce. The Rural Community Development Category will provide
grants to units of local government in development Tier one and development Tier two areas, as
defined in G.S. 143B-437.08, and in rural census tracts, as defined in G.S. 143B-472.127(a)(2),
in any other area to support projects that promote broad-based community development
activities, increased local investment and economic growth, and stronger and more viable rural
neighborhoods. In awarding grants under this section, preference shall be given to projects in
development tier one areas, as defined in G.S. 143B-437.08. The funds available for grants under
this category may be used for all of the following, subject to the national objectives and eligible
activities allowed under guidance issued by HUD:
(1) Essential repairs to prevent abandonment and deterioration of housing in low
and moderate-income neighborhoods.
(2) Public improvements, including parks, streets, sidewalks, and water and sewer
lines.
(3) Public facilities, including neighborhood and community facilities and
facilities for individuals with special needs.
(4) Public services, including employment, crime prevention, and energy
conservation.
(5) Assistance to private, for-profit entities for economic development.
(6) Technical assistance to public or nonprofit entities for neighborhood
revitalization or economic development activities.
(7) Assistance to for-profit and nonprofit entities to facilitate economic
development activities.
SECTION 11.1.(i) Deobligated Funds. – Throughout each year, deobligated funds
arise in the various funding categories and program years of the Community Development Block
Grant (CDBG) program as a result of (i) projects coming in under budget, (ii) projects being
cancelled, or (iii) projects being required to repay funds. Surplus federal administrative funds in
the CDBG program may vary from year to year based upon the amount of State appropriated
funds allocated and the amount of eligible in-kind funds identified. To allow the Department of
Commerce to quickly deploy deobligated and surplus federal administrative funds as they are
identified throughout the program year, the following shall apply to the use of deobligated CDBG
funds and surplus federal administrative funds:
(1) All surplus federal administrative funds shall be divided proportionally
between the Department of Commerce programs and shall be used as provided
in subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection.
(2) All deobligated funds allocated to the Department of Commerce and any
surplus federal administrative funds, as provided for in subdivision (1) of this
subsection, may be used by the Department for all of the following:
a. To issue grants in the CDBG Economic Development or
Neighborhood Revitalization Program Category.
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 81

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. For providing training and guidance to local governments relative to
the CDBG program, its management, and administrative requirements.
c. For any other purpose consistent with the Department's administration
of the CDBG program if an equal amount of State matching funds is
available.

COMMERCE NONPROFITS/REPORTING REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 11.2.(a) The entities listed in subsection (b) of this section shall do the
following for each year that State funds are expended:
(1) By September 1 of each year, and more frequently as requested, report to the
chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and
Natural and Economic Resources; the chairs of the House of Representatives
Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic
Resources; the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Agriculture,
Natural, and Economic Resources; and the Fiscal Research Division on prior
State fiscal year program activities, objectives, and accomplishments and prior
State fiscal year itemized expenditures and fund sources. If State funds are
used to provide matching funds for competitive grants from the federal
government or a nongovernmental entity, the report should include a list and
description of the grants that are awarded.
(2) Provide to the chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on
Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources; the chairs of the House of
Representatives Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and
Economic Resources; the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on
Agriculture, Natural, and Economic Resources; and the Fiscal Research
Division a copy of the entity's annual audited financial statement within 30
days of issuance of the statement.
SECTION 11.2.(b) The following entities shall comply with the requirements of
subsection (a) of this section:
(1) North Carolina Biotechnology Center.
(2) High Point Market Authority.
(3) RTI International.

NC BIOTECHNOLOGY CENTER
SECTION 11.3.(a) Except for the funds appropriated in subsection (b) of this
section, funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Commerce for the North Carolina
Biotechnology Center (Center) for each fiscal year in the 2023-2025 biennium shall be allocated
for the following purposes in the following proportions:
(1) Twenty-one percent (21%) for job creation, including funding for the
AgBiotech Initiative, economic and industrial development, and related
activities.
(2) Sixty-five percent (65%) for science and commercialization, including
science and technology development, Centers of Innovation, business and
technology development, education and training, and related activities.
(3) Fourteen percent (14%) for Center operations, including administration,
professional and technical assistance and oversight, corporate
communications, human resource management, financial and grant
administration, legal, and accounting.
SECTION 11.3.(b) Of the funds appropriated in this act to the Department of
Commerce for the Center, five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of recurring funds in each
Page 82 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
fiscal year of the biennium shall be used to support funding for early stage loans to North Carolina
agricultural technology companies.
SECTION 11.3.(c) The Center shall not use any of the recurring funds allocated in
subsection (b) of this section for administrative costs and shall report on the expenditure of those
funds each year pursuant to Section 11.2 of this act.
SECTION 11.3.(d) The Center shall prioritize funding and distribution of loans over
funding and distribution of grants.
SECTION 11.3.(e) Up to ten percent (10%) of the sum of each of the allocations in
subsection (a) of this section may be reallocated to subdivision (a)(1) or subdivision (a)(2) of this
section if, in the judgment of Center management, the reallocation will advance the mission of
the Center.

NORTH CAROLINA TECHNOLOGY COALITIONS STRATEGIC SUPPORT FUND
SECTION 11.4.(a) Overview. – The North Carolina Coalitions Strategic Support
Fund (Coalitions Fund) is established as a special fund in the Department of Commerce
(Department), and the Office of Science, Technology and Innovation in the Department shall be
responsible for administering the Coalitions Fund with oversight from the Board of Science,
Technology and Innovation.
SECTION 11.4.(b) Purposes. – Moneys in the Coalitions Fund shall be allocated
pursuant to this subsection. The Department shall award grants from the Coalitions Fund to
encourage regional technology-based economic growth by fostering collaboration throughout a
Technology Coalition and aligning State resource investment to scale critical and secure supply
chains. Moneys in the Coalitions Fund shall be used to provide Coalition Infrastructure support
and Coalition Cost Match, both defined in Section 11.4 (d) Use of Funds.
SECTION 11.4.(c) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Technology Coalition: A regional network of organizations, such as private
sector, academic, nonprofit, and government institutions, in a network of
formal and informal relationships that contribute to technological and
economic development in a technology-based industry sector. Coalitions may
also be referred to as a Hub, Cluster, or Alliance. Example technology areas
supported by the Coalitions Fund may include but not be limited to: Artificial
Intelligence, High-Performance Computing & Semiconductors, Quantum
Science and Technology, Advanced Manufacturing, Disaster Prevention,
Advanced Communications Technology, Cybersecurity, Biotechnology,
Advanced Energy Technology & Efficiency, and Material Science.
(2) Recipient: A North Carolina organization supported by the Coalitions Fund
that represents a Technology Coalition. Recipients may be an industry
alliance, nonprofit organization, local government, academic institution, or
State agency.
(3) Cost-Match: Financial or in-kind resources provided through the Coalitions
Fund to a Recipient, defined by a ratio of funding pursued or granted by
non-State sources to that provided by the Coalitions Fund.
(4) Regional: Area of service by the Technology Coalition and the focus of
economic development metric analysis for a technology-based industry
sector. For the purpose of the Coalitions Fund, a regional area should be
defined within the boundaries of the State.
SECTION 11.4.(d) Eligibility. – To be eligible for a Coalitions Fund grant, a
prospective Recipient must satisfy all of the following conditions:
(1) The Recipient must be North Carolina-based. For the purposes of this section,
a North Carolina-based organization is one that has its principal place of
operation in the State.
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 83

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The Recipient must certify that at least one hundred percent (100%) of
financial resources provided through the Coalition Infrastructure Support and
the Coalition Cost Match programs within the Coalitions Fund will be
conducted in North Carolina and that the Recipient will remain a North
Carolina-based organization for the duration of the funds received.
(3) The Recipient must apply, under oath, to the Office of Science, Technology
and Innovation, for a grant under this section on a form prescribed by the
Office of Science, Technology and Innovation that includes at least all of the
following:
a. name of the business, the form of organization under which it is
operated, and the names and addresses of the principals or
management of the business;
b. description of how Coalitions Fund resources will aid the Technology
Coalition to advance its goals;
c. justifications for the use of Coalitions Fund resources for intended
Regional economic impact; and
d. any other information necessary for the Office of Science, Technology
and Innovation to evaluate the application.
(4) The Recipient shall not receive concurrent funding support from other sources
that duplicate the purpose of the Coalitions Fund resources.
(5) Coalition Cost Match program grant Recipients may not be duplicative in the
use of cost match from other State-funds or resources.
(6) Resources provided by the Coalitions Funds may only be for those activities
for which an application was submitted, and a grant was received under this
section.
SECTION 11.4.(e) Use of Funds. – Funding shall be distributed from the
Department, based on strategic and tactical programmatic needs within the following two
program areas and related administrative expenses:
(1) Coalition Infrastructure Support. Activities include but are not limited to
funding Recipients to provide external support and/or funding to State
agencies or divisions of State agencies to conduct market and economic
analyses; development of workforce training programs; support private,
foundational and federal grant identification and submission; and sponsorship
of Technology Coalition knowledge-sharing events.
(2) Coalition Cost Match. Provide financial or in-kind cost matching to Recipients
in support of non-State funding, including private, foundational, and federal
funding that drives the economic growth and maturation of a regional
technology industry. The Board of Science, Technology and Innovation may
set a cap on the cost match amount, number of awards per recipient, require
applicants to provide matching funds or in-kind support for a grant from the
Coalitions Fund, and provide prioritization in how the Coalitions Fund may
be used by the Recipient.
(3) Administrative Expenses. Of the money appropriated to the Fund, the
Department may use up to the greater of (i) one hundred thousand dollars
($150,000) or (ii) two percent (2%) annually to administer and promote the
Coalitions Fund.
SECTION 11.4.(f) Program Guidelines. – The Department shall develop guidelines
related to the administration of the Coalitions Fund. At least 20 days before the effective date of
any guidelines or nontechnical amendments to guidelines, the Department must publish the
proposed guidelines on the Department's Web site and provide notice to persons who have
requested notice of proposed guidelines. In addition, the Department must accept oral and written
Page 84 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
comments on the proposed guidelines during the 15 business days beginning on the first day that
the Department has completed these notifications. For the purpose of this section, a technical
amendment is either of the following:
(1) An amendment that corrects a spelling or grammatical error.
(2) An amendment that makes a clarification based on public comment and could
have been anticipated by the public notice that immediately preceded the
public comment.

ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES FOR ONE NC SMALL BUSINESS PROGRAM
SECTION 11.5.(a) G.S. 143B-437.71 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-437.71. One North Carolina Fund established as a special revenue fund.
…
(c) [Special Account. –]There is created in the One North Carolina Fund a special account,
the One North Carolina Small Business Account, to be used for the North Carolina
SBIR/STTR Incentive Program and the North Carolina SBIR/STTR Matching Funds
Program, as specified in Part 2I of Article 10 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes. Of
the total moneys in the One North Carolina Small Business Account, the Department may
use up to two percent (2%) annually for costs associated with administration of the North
Carolina SBIR/STTR Incentive Program and the North Carolina SBIR/STTR Matching
Funds Program. (2004-88, s. 1(d); 2005-276, s.13.14(a); 2006-162, s. 19; 2012-142, s.
13.6(b); 2013-360, s. 15.16A; 2021-180, s. 11.8.)"

ENHANCE UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE BENEFITS
SECTION 11.6.(a) G.S. 96-14.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 96-14.2. Weekly benefit amount.
(a) Weekly Benefit Amount. – The weekly benefit amount for an individual who is totally
unemployed is an amount equal to the wages paid to the individual in the last two
completed quarters of the individual's base period divided by 52 and rounded to the next
lower whole dollar. If this amount is less than fifteen dollars ($15.00), the individual is
not eligible for benefits. The weekly benefit amount may not exceed three hundred fifty
dollars ($350.00).four hundred seventy dollars ($470.00), adjusted annually for inflation.
Beginning July 1, 2026, and on each July 1 thereafter, the Division shall adjust the
maximum weekly benefit for claims filed on or after that date by the percentage change
in the annual average Consumer Price Index for All Items for All Urban Consumers
published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics for the preceding calendar year, rounded to
the nearest five dollars ($5.00)."
SECTION 11.6.(b) G.S. 96-14.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 96-14.3. Duration of benefits.
(a) Duration. – The number of weeks an individual is allowed to receive unemployment
benefits depends on the seasonal adjusted statewide unemployment rate that applies to
the six-month base period in which the claim is filed. One six-month base period begins
on January 1 and one six-month base period begins on July 1. For the base period that
begins January 1, the average of the seasonal adjusted unemployment rates for the State
for the preceding months of July, August, and September applies. For the base period that
begins July 1, the average of the seasonal adjusted unemployment rates for the State for
the preceding months of January, February, and March applies. The Division must use
the most recent seasonal adjusted unemployment rate determined by the U.S. Department
of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, and not the rate as revised in the annual benchmark.
Seasonal Adjusted Number
Unemployment Rate of Weeks
Less than or equal to 5.5%4.5% 1216
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 85

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Greater than 5.5%4.5% up to 6%5% 1318
Greater than 6%5% up to 6.5%5.5% 1420
Greater than 6.5%5.5% up to 7%6% 1522
Greater than 7%6% up to 7.5%6.5% 1624
Greater than 7.5% up to 8%6.5% 1726
Greater than 8% up to 8.5% 18
Greater than 8.5% up to 9% 19
Greater than 9% 20
…."
SECTION 11.6.(c) Subsections (a) and (b) apply to claims for benefits filed on or
after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 11.6.(d) G.S. 96-9.2 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(f) 2025 Tax Credit. – An employer is allowed a tax credit for a contribution to the
Unemployment Insurance Fund payable under this section for contributions due for the calendar
year 2025. The amount of the credit is equal to the amount of contributions payable for wages
paid during the fourth quarter of 2024 on the report filed by the employer on or before January
31, 2025. If an employer remitted the contributions payable with the report due on or before
January 31, 2025, the credit will be applied to the contributions payable on the report due on or
before April 30, 2025. An employer must file the report to receive the credit. If the amount of the
credit exceeds the amount of contributions due on the report, the excess credit amount is
considered an overpayment and will be refunded pursuant to G.S. 96-9.15(b)."
SECTION 11.6.(e) Subsection (d) is effective when it becomes law.

PART XII. ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY

ESTABLISH NON-TITLE V FEES IN STATUTE
SECTION 12.1.(a) G.S. 143-215.3(1b) reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-215.3. General powers of Commission and Department; auxiliary powers.
…
(1b) The fee to be charged pursuant to G.S. 143-215.3(a)(1a) for processing an
application for a permit under G.S. 143-215.108 and G.S. 143-215.109 of
Article 21B of this Chapter may not exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00).
The Department shall charge permit fees pursuant to G.S. 143-215.3(a)(1a) to
non-Title V facilities subject to permitting under G.S. 143-215.108 and
G.S. 143-215.109 of Article 21B according to the following schedule:
a. For facilities seeking federally enforceable limits to avoid Title V
permitting, application fees of eight hundred dollars ($800.00) and
annual fees of three thousand seventy dollars ($3,070.00).
b. For facilities with a potential to emit below Title V thresholds, except
for general permits, application fees of one hundred dollars ($100.00)
and annual fees of four hundred dollars ($400.00).
c. The fee for an ownership change shall be fifty dollars ($50).
d. The Department may provide a discount of up to twenty-five percent
on annual fees authorized by subparagraphs (a) and (b) of this
subsection.
The fee to be charged pursuant to G.S. 143-215.3(a)(1a) for processing a
registration under Part 2A of this Article or Article 38 of this Chapter may not
exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) for any single registration. An additional fee of
twenty percent (20%) of the registration processing fee may be assessed for a
late registration under Article 38 of this Chapter. The fee for administering
and compliance monitoring under Article 21, other than Parts 1 and 1A, and
Page 86 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
G.S. 143-215.108 and G.S. 143-215.109 of Article 21B shall be charged on
an annual basis for each year of the permit term and may not exceed one
thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per year. Fees for processing all
permits under Article 21A and all other sections of Article 21B shall not
exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) for any single permit. The total payment
for fees that are set by the Commission under this subsection for all permits
for any single facility shall not exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars
($7,500) per year, which amount shall include all application fees and fees for
administration and compliance monitoring. A single facility is defined to be
any contiguous area under one ownership and in which permitted activities
occur. For all permits issued under these Articles where a fee schedule is not
specified in the statutes, the Commission, or other commission specified by
statute shall adopt a fee schedule in a rule following the procedures established
by the Administrative Procedure Act. Fee schedules shall be established to
reflect the size of the emission or discharge, the potential impact on the
environment, the staff costs involved, relative costs of the issuance of new
permits and the reissuance of existing permits, and shall include adequate
safeguards to prevent unusual fee assessments which would result in serious
economic burden on an individual applicant. A system shall be considered to
allow consolidated annual payments for persons with multiple permits. In its
rulemaking to establish fee schedules, the Commission is also directed to
consider a method of rewarding facilities which achieve full compliance with
administrative and self-monitoring reporting requirements, and to consider, in
those cases where the cost of renewal or amendment of a permit is less than
for the original permit, a lower fee for the renewal or amendment."
SECTION 12.1.(b) G.S. 143B-279.19 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-279.19. Quadriennial adjustment of certain fees and rates.
(a) Adjustment for Legislatively Mandated Salaries and Benefits. – Beginning July 1,
2025, and every four years thereafter, the Department shall adjust the fees and rates imposed
pursuant to the statutes listed in this subsection in accordance with the Consumer Price Index
computed by the Bureau of Labor Statistics during the prior two bienniums. The adjustment for
per transaction rates shall be rounded to the nearest dollar ($1.00):
…
(21) G.S. 143-215.3(1b).
…."

MAKING INUNDATION MAPS PUBLICLY AVAILABLE
SECTION 12.2.(a) G.S. 143-215.31 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-215.31. Supervision over maintenance and operation of dams.
…
(a1) (6) Information included in an Emergency Action Plan that constitutes sensitive
public security information, as provided in G.S. 132-1.7, shall be maintained as confidential
information and shall not be subject to disclosure under the Public Records Act. For purposes of
this section, "sensitive public security information" shall include Critical Energy Infrastructure
Information protected from disclosure under rules adopted by the Federal Energy Regulatory
Commission in 18 C.F.R. § 388.112. § 388.112, but shall not include Emergency Action Plans
or inundation maps for any impoundments or dams not regulated by the Federal Energy
Regulatory Commission.
…."
SECTION 12.2.(b) G.S. 66-58 is amended to read:
"§ 66‑58. Sale of merchandise or services by governmental units.
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 87

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…
(b) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to any of the following:
…
(29) The Department of Environmental Quality in the provision of inundation
maps for the preparation of Emergency Action Plans to owners or operators
of high hazard potential dams."

MODIFY PAYMENT OF BROWNFIELDS PROPERTY REUSE ACT FEES
SECTION 12.3.(a) G.S. 130A-310.39 reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A-310.39. Fees.
(a) The Department shall collect the following fees:
(1) A prospective developer who submits a an application for a proposed
brownfields agreement for review by the Department shall pay an initial fee
of two thousand dollars ($2,000).
(2) A prospective developer who enters into a brownfields agreement with the
Department shall pay, on a schedule determined by the Department, a fee in
an amount equal to the full cost to the Department and the Department of
Justice of all activities related to the brownfields agreement, including but not
limited to negotiation of the brownfields agreement, public notice and
community involvement, and monitoring the implementation of and
compliance with the brownfields agreement and Notice of Brownfields
Property. The procedure by which the amount of this fee is determined shall
be established by agreement between the prospective developer and the
Department and shall be set out as a part of the brownfields agreement. The
fee imposed by this subdivision shall be paid in two installments. The first
installment shall be due at the time the prospective developer and the
Department enter into the brownfields agreement and shall equal all costs that
have been incurred by the Department and the Department of Justice at that
time less the amount of the initial fee paid pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection. The Department shall not enter into the brownfields agreement
unless the first installment is paid in full when due. The second installment
shall be due at the time the prospective developer submits a final report
certifying completion of remediation under the brownfields agreement and
shall include any additional costs that have been incurred by the Department
and the Department of Justice, including all costs of monitoring the
implementation of the brownfields agreement.
(3) Any prospective developer or owner(s) of properties subject to a recorded
notice of brownfields property who are out of compliance with the notice of
brownfields property shall pay a fee to the Department and the Department of
Justice equivalent to the costs to the state to enforce against said
noncompliance or otherwise seek to correct said noncompliance."

SOLID WASTE BENEFICIAL REUSE CLARIFICATION
SECTION 12.4.(a) G.S. 130A-309.05 reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A‑309.05. Regulated wastes; certain exclusions.
(a) Certain Wastes Regulated as Nonhazardous. – Notwithstanding other provisions of
this Article, the following waste shall be regulated pursuant to this Part:
…
(b) Management of Ash Generated From Burning of Solid Waste. – Ash generated by a
solid waste management facility from the burning of solid waste shall be disposed of in a properly
designed solid waste disposal area that complies with standards developed by the Department for
Page 88 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the disposal of the ash. The Department shall work with solid waste management facilities that
burn solid waste to identify and develop methods for recycling and reusing incinerator ash or
treated ash.
(c) Recovered Material. – Recovered material is not subject to regulation as permitting
requirements for solid waste under this Article. In order for a material that would otherwise be
regulated as solid waste to qualify as a recovered material, the The Department may require any
person who owns or has control over the material to demonstrate that the material meets the
requirements of this subsection. In order to protect public health and the environment, the
Commission subsection or may require the person to obtain a beneficial use determination from
the Department in accordance with subsection (d) of this section. The Department may adopt
rules to implement this subsection. Materials that are accumulated speculatively, as that term is
defined under 40 Code of Federal Regulations § 261 (July 1, 2014 Edition), shall not qualify as
a recovered material, and shall be subject to regulation as solid waste. In order to qualify as a
recovered material, thematerial. The material shall be managed as a valuable commodity in a
manner consistent with the desired use or end use, and all of the following conditions shall be
met:
…
(d) Beneficial Use Determination. – For the purposes of preservation of landfill capacity,
economic development, energy savings, and reduction of greenhouse emissions, the Department
may determine whether nonhazardous solid waste may be used or reused for a particular site or
application as an alternative to disposal at a permitted solid waste management facility as set
forth in this subsection.
(1) A person seeking a beneficial use determination shall submit an application to
the Department. The Department, after a review of an application submitted
under this subsection, may take any of the following actions:
a. Authorize management of a specified type of nonhazardous solid
waste at a site other than a permitted solid waste management facility.
b. Issue a beneficial use determination with appropriate conditions for
use of specific types of solid waste in construction, land application,
or other projects and applications.
(2) An applicant for a determination under this subsection shall submit
information on forms prescribed by the Department and any additional
information required by the Department necessary for a determination under
this subsection. In its review of the application and additional information, the
Department shall also consider internal research or information submitted by
any person or entity concerning the potential hazard to public health or the
environment of any type of solid waste.
(3) The Department may require submittal of a demonstration that the solid waste
is being managed in a manner to protect public health or the environment and
may include any of the following as a part of an authorization under
subdivision (1) of this subsection:
a. requirements for periodic testing of solid wastes; and
b. conditions to ensure that the product or by-products of a material
recovered or diverted for beneficial use shall not be discharged,
deposited, injected, dumped, spilled, leaked, or placed into or upon
any land or water so that the products or by-products or any
constituents thereof may enter other lands or be emitted into the air, or
discharged into any waters, including groundwaters, or otherwise enter
the environment or pose a threat to public health and safety.
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 89

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Approvals granted under this subsection are valid for no longer than five
years. Requests for renewal shall be made at least 60 days in advance of the
expiration date of the approval.
(5) The applicant for a determination under this subdivision shall submit to the
Department on an annual basis a report detailing the usage of material under
the approval and certifying compliance with this Article and any applicable
rules adopted under this Article.
(6) The Department may suspend or revoke an authorization and may modify an
authorization if it is determined that the activity is not in compliance with the
requirements of applicable laws or rules or if new information is provided to
the Department that impacts the determination of protection of public health
or the environment.
(7) The Department shall provide notice on its website of approved beneficial use
determinations.
(8) Facilities that manage source-separated materials for the purpose of recycling
as defined in G.S. 130A-290 are not subject to the provisions of this
subsection.
(9) The Department may adopt rules to implement this subsection and establish
application fees for a reuse determination under this subsection. All fees
collected under this subdivision shall be credited to the Solid Waste
Management Account established under G.S. 130A-295.8(a). In determining
the amount of the total application fee in rule, the Department shall have the
authority to establish separate fee amounts for annual fees for each year based
on the length of time for which the approval will be valid as requested by the
applicant."
SECTION 12.4.(b) This section becomes effective January 1, 2026.

UST NEW INSTALL REVIEW FEE
SECTION 12.5.(a) G.S. 143-215.94C reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-215.94C Commercial leaking petroleum underground storage tank cleanup fees.
…
(g) An owner or operator who submits a pre-construction or post-construction application
for installing or replacing an underground storage tank system or an underground storage tank
piping system regulated pursuant to G.S. 143-215.94T to the Department shall pay an application
fee of five hundred twenty dollars ($525.00) to the Department."
SECTION 12.5.(b) G.S. 143B-279.19 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-279.19. Quadriennial adjustment of certain fees and rates.
(a) Adjustment for Legislatively Mandated Salaries and Benefits. – Beginning July 1,
2025, and every four years thereafter, the Department shall adjust the fees and rates imposed
pursuant to the statutes listed in this subsection in accordance with the Consumer Price Index
computed by the Bureau of Labor Statistics during the prior two bienniums. The adjustment for
per transaction rates shall be rounded to the nearest dollar ($1.00):
…
(22) G.S. 143-215. 94C(g).
…."
SECTION 12.5.(c) This section becomes effective January 1, 2026.

EXPAND ELIGIBILITY FOR TARGETED INTEREST RATES
SECTION 12.6.(a) G.S. 159G-20(21) reads as rewritten:
"§ 159G-20. Definitions.
…
Page 90 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(21) Targeted interest rate project. – Either of the following types of projects:
a. A project that is awarded a loan from the Drinking Water Reserve or the
Wastewater Reserve based on affordability.
b. A project that is awarded a loan from the CWSRF or the DWSRF and is
in a category for which federal law or the Department encourages a special
focus."

RAISE LIMITS FOR MRF AND AIA GRANT FUNDING
Section 12.7.(a) G.S. 159G-36(c) is amended to read:
"§ 159G-36. Limits on loans and grants.
…
(c) Certain Reserve Recipient Limit. – The following limits apply to the loan or grant
types made from the Wastewater Reserve or the Drinking Water Reserve to the same local
government unit or nonprofit water corporation:
…
(4) The amount of merger/regionalization feasibility grants awarded for three
consecutive fiscal years for a fiscal year may not exceed fifty thousand dollars
($50,000) seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000).
(5) The amount of asset inventory and assessment grants awarded for three
consecutive fiscal years may not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars
($150,000)two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($225,000)."

PART XIII. LABOR [RESERVED]

PART XIV. NATURAL AND CULTURAL RESOURCES

INCREASE THE ALLOWABLE AMOUNT FOR REPAIR AND RENOVATION FOR
AQUARIUMS SPECIAL FUND
SECTION 14.1. G.S. 143B‑135.188 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-135.188. North Carolina Aquariums; fees; fund.
…
(d) Approval. – The Secretary may approve the use of the North Carolina Aquariums
Fund for repair and renovation projects at the aquariums-related facilities that comply with the
following:
(1) The total project cost is less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
less than or equal to two million dollars ($2,000,000).
(2) The project meets the criteria to be classified as a repair or renovation under
G.S. 143C-8-13(a).
(3) The project is paid for from funds appropriated to the Fund.
(4) The project does not obligate the State to provide increased recurring funding
for operations.
…."

INCREASE THE ALLOWABLE AMOUNT FOR REPAIR AND RENOVATION FOR
ZOO SPECIAL FUND
SECTION 14.2. G.S. 143B‑135.209 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-135.209. North Carolina Zoo Fund.
…
(c) Approval. – The Secretary may approve the use of the North Carolina Zoo Fund for
repair and renovation projects at the North Carolina Zoological Park that comply with the
following:
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 91

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) The total project cost is less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
less than or equal to two million dollars ($2,000,000).
(2) The project meets the criteria to be classified as a repair or renovation under
G.S. 143C-8-13(a).
(3) The project is paid for from funds appropriated to the Fund.
(4) The project does not obligate the State to provide increased recurring funding
for operations.
…."

TECHNICAL CORRECTION REGARDING CHARLOTTE HAWKINS BROWN $1
MILLION APPROPRIATION IN SECTION 9.1(D) OF S.L. 2021-189
SECTION 14.3. Section 40.17(a)(18) of S.L. 2021-180, as enacted by Section 9.1(d)
of S.L. 2021-189 reads as rewritten:
"SCIF GRANT CHANGES
"SECTION 40.17.(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law or the Committee Report
referenced in Section 43.2 of this act to the contrary, the following grants and funds allocated
from the State Capital and Infrastructure Fund are amended as follows:
…
(18) The funds to the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources for Charlotte
Hawkins Brown in the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) for the
2021-2022 fiscal year shall be used for the purchase and development of
approximately 100 acres adjacent to land acquisition for the historic site or,
repair and renovation projects, and capital projects at the Charlotte Hawkins
Brown State Historic Site in Guilford County.
…."

PART XV. WILDLIFE RESOURCES COMMISSION [RESERVED]

PART XVI. ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE OF THE COURTS [RESERVED]

PART XVII. INDIGENT DEFENSE SERVICES [RESERVED]

PART XVIII. JUSTICE [RESERVED]

PART XIX. ADULT CORRECTION

PART XIX-A. DEPARTMENT OF ADULT CORRECTION ADMINISTRATION

STATEWIDE MISDEMEANANT CONFINEMENT PROGRAM FUNDING TRANSFER
SECTION 19A.1. Of the funds appropriated in this act for the Statewide
Misdemeanant Confinement Program:
(1) The sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be transferred each fiscal
year to the North Carolina Sheriffs' Association, Inc., a nonprofit corporation,
to support the Program and for administrative and operating expenses of the
Association and its staff.
(2) The sum of two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($225,000) shall be
allocated each fiscal year to the Department of Adult Correction for its
administrative and operating expenses for the Program.
(3) Up to the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) may be used in
each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to reimburse sheriffs
Page 92 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
utilizing inmate labor pursuant to the provisions of Section 19C.10 of S.L.
2021-180.

INMATE MEDICAL REPORTING
SECTION 19A.2. G.S. 143B-1470 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-1470. Medical costs for inmates.
(c) The Department of Adult Correction shall report quarterly annually by September 1
of each year to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the
chairs of the Justice and Public Safety Appropriations Committees on:
(1) The percentage of the total inmates requiring hospitalization or hospital
services who receive that treatment at each hospital.
…
(10) The reimbursement rate for contracted providers. The Department shall
randomly audit high-volume contracted providers to ensure adherence to
billing at the contracted rate.
Reports submitted on August 1 shall include totals for the previous fiscal year for all the
information requested."

USE OF CAPITAL FUNDS
SECTION 19A.3. Notwithstanding S.L. 2006-66 and S.L. 2015-241, the
Department of Adult Correction may use up to one million six hundred twelve thousand four
hundred eighty-one and fourteen cents ($1,612,481.14) from the projects described in Section
23.12(g) of S.L. 2006-66 and Section 31.22 of S.L. 2015-241 to finance capital facility costs of
HVAC projects at state facilities. No additional special indebtedness may be issued or incurred
to finance these projects. The use of funds authorized by this section shall not require further
approval by the Council of State pursuant to Chapter 142 of the General Statutes.

USE OF AVAILABLE FUNDS FOR REPAIR AND RENOVATION PURPOSES
SECTION 19A.4. G.S. 143C-8-13 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"§ 143C-8-13. Repairs and Renovations.
...
(e) Notwithstanding any provision of G.S. 143C-8-7 to the contrary, the Secretary of the
Department of Adult Correction may pay for projects for repairs and renovations with funds
available to the agency according to the following:
(1) The project meets all of the following requirements:
a. The total project costs do not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).
b. The project is one of the types set forth in subdivisions (1) through
(13) of subsection (a) of this section, regardless of whether the relevant
facilities and related infrastructure are supported from the General
Fund or the State Capital and Infrastructure Fund.
(2) The Department reports on projects undertaken pursuant to this subsection to
the Fiscal Research Division on a quarterly basis. The report shall include all
of the following information for each project:
a. The facility at which the project is being undertaken.
b. The nature and scope of the project."

REIMBURSE COUNTIES FOR HOUSING AND EXTRAORDINARY MEDICAL
EXPENSES
SECTION 19A.5. Notwithstanding G.S. 143C-6-9, the Department of Adult
Correction may use funds available to the Department for the 2025-27 fiscal biennium to
reimburse counties for the cost of housing convicted inmates, parolees, and post-release
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 93

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
supervisees awaiting transfer to the State prison system, as provided in G.S. 148-29. The
reimbursement may not exceed forty dollars ($40.00) per day per prisoner awaiting transfer. The
Department shall report annually by February 1 of each year to the chairs of the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the chairs of the House of Representatives
Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Senate Appropriations
Committee on Justice and Public Safety on the expenditure of funds to reimburse counties for
prisoners awaiting transfer.

PART XIX-B. PRISONS

CENTER FOR COMMUNITY TRANSITIONS/CONTRACT AND REPORT
SECTION 19B.1. The Department of Adult Correction may continue to contract
with The Center for Community Transitions, Inc., a nonprofit corporation, for the purchase of
prison beds for minimum security female inmates during the 2025-27 fiscal biennium. The
Center for Community Transitions, Inc., shall report by February 1 of each year to the chairs of
the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the
Senate Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety on the annual cost per inmate and
the average daily inmate population compared to bed capacity using the same methodology as
that used by the Department of Adult Correction.

NURSE STAFFING AT STATE PRISONS
SECTION 19B.2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department of
Adult Correction may, in its discretion and subject to the approval of the Office of State Budget
and Management, convert funds appropriated for contractual nursing services to permanent
nursing positions when it is determined to promote security, generate cost savings, and improve
health care quality. The Department shall report on any such conversions to the Fiscal Research
Division.

DOT CONTRACT OF INMATE LITTER CREW
SECTION 19B.3.(a) After the issuance of a request for information (RFI) and
receipt of bids by the Department of Transportation for litter pickup on State highways and roads,
the Department of Transportation shall first offer the contract to the Department of Adult
Correction upon the same terms and conditions as the most favorable bid received by the
Department of Transportation from a suitable contractor. The Department of Adult Correction
shall have 30 days to accept or decline the offered contract.
SECTION 19B.3.(b) It is the policy of the General Assembly that the Department
of Transportation shall utilize inmate litter crews for litter pickup on State highways and roads
as often as is necessary and practicable.

PART XIX-C. COMMUNITY SUPERVISION

INTERSTATE COMPACT FEES TO SUPPORT TRAINING PROGRAMS AND
EQUIPMENT PURCHASES SECTIONS
SECTION 19C.1. Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 148-65.7, fees collected
for the Interstate Compact Fund during the 2025-27 fiscal biennium may be used by the
Department of Adult Correction during the 2025-27 fiscal biennium to provide training programs
and equipment purchases for the Division of Community Supervision, but only to the extent
sufficient funds remain available in the Fund to support the mission of the Interstate Compact
Program.

PART XIX-D. REHABILITATION AND REENTRY [RESERVED]
Page 94 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

PART XIX-E. PUBLIC SAFETY [RESERVED]

PART XIX-F. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY ADMINSTRATION [RESERVED]

PART XIX-G. LAW ENFORCEMENT [RESERVED]

PART XIX-H. JUVENILE JUSTICE [RESERVED]

PART XIX-I. EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AND NATIONAL GUARD [RESERVED]

PART XIX-M. STATE BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION

CONTINUED EXEMPTION FROM IT CONSOLIDATION
SECTION 19M.1. G.S. 143B-1325 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-1325. State information technology consolidated under Department of
Information Technology.
…
(c) Participating Agencies. – The State CIO shall prepare detailed plans to transition each
of the participating agencies. As the transition plans are completed, the following participating
agencies shall transfer information technology personnel, operations, projects, assets, and
appropriate funding to the Department of Information Technology:
(1) Department of Natural and Cultural Resources.
…
(13) Department of Public Safety, with the exception of the following:
a. State Bureau of Investigation.
b. State Highway Patrol.
c. Division of Emergency Management.
…."

PART XX. ADMINISTRATION [RESERVED]

PART XXI. ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS [RESERVED]

PART XXII. OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR [RESERVED]

PART XXIII. BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT

STATE FISCAL RECOVERY FUND FLEXIBILITY 2025
SECTION 23.1.(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, and
subject to the conditions set out in part (b) of this section, below, the North Carolina Pandemic
Recovery Office (NCPRO), in consultation with the Director of the Budget, may reallocate State
Fiscal Recovery Funds (SFRF) appropriated by this act or any act of the General Assembly,
including but not limited to:
(a) S.L. 2021-180.
(b) S.L. 2021-189.
(c) S.L. 2022-6.
(d) S.L. 2022-74.
(e) S.L. 2023-134.
(f) S.L. 2024-1.
(g) S.L. 2024-40.
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 95

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(h) S.L. 2024-53.
(i) S.L. 2024-55.
SECTION 23.1.(b) The funds set out in part (a) of this section may be reallocated
only when all of the following conditions are met:
(a) The appropriated funds have not been expended by December 31, 2025.
(b) There is a reasonable expectation that the funds will not be expended before the
deadline established by applicable federal law or guidance.
(c) The reallocation is made to support one or more SFRF related activities authorized
and receiving appropriations under this act or one of the acts listed above in part (a) of this
Section. Reallocated funds shall not be used for any new activity, purpose, or program.
SECTION 23.1.(c) Any funds remain after the reallocation process authorized in
subsection (b) shall be allocated to the State Treasurer up to an amount equal to the remaining
unreimbursed COVID-19 related expenses incurred by the North Carolina State Health Plan for
Teachers and State Employees between March 3, 2021 and December 31, 2024.
SECTION 23.1.(d) To the extent that funds reallocated pursuant to this section are
unappropriated, including interest accrual exceeding that which is anticipated in this act, those
funds are hereby appropriated and available for use pursuant to this section.
SECTION 23.1.(e) Reporting. – Beginning March 31, 2025, the Office of State
Budget and Management (OSBM) shall report to the Fiscal Research Division quarterly on the
reallocations made pursuant to this section.

INTEREST TO SUPPORT NC PANDEMIC RECOVERY EFFORTS
SECTION 23.2. Any interest earned on the following is appropriated to the Office
of State Budget and Management (OSBM) for operations pertaining to pandemic recovery:
(a) Local Fiscal Recovery Fund, Budget Code 63009, Budget Fund 610000;
(b) Homeowner Assistance Fund, Budget Code 23023, Budget Fund 214150, that is
allowed to be retained by the State; and
(c) Economic Development Assistance Strategy and Tourism grant funds, Budget Code
23025, Budget Funds 214250 and 214251, that is allowed to be retained by the State.

INNOVATION & MODERNIZATION FOR PERFORMANCE, ACCOUNTABILITY, &
COST-EFFECTIVE TRANSFORMATION ('IMPACT') CENTER
SECTION 23.3.(a) Of the funds appropriated in this act to the Office of State Budget
and Management (OSBM), the sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) in nonrecurring and
nonreverting funds shall be allocated to the Innovation & Modernization for Performance,
Accountability, & Cost-Effective Transformation ('IMPACT') Center to:
(a) Partner with agencies on projects that substantially improve government operations
through applied research and private sector best practices, including the use of procurement
optimization, agile project management, user-centered (UX) design, data analytics, artificial
intelligence, A/B testing, and performance management.
(b) Target efficiency gains in state programs and policies, aiming to create cost-savings
while maintaining or improving service delivery outcomes.
(c) Hire, on a temporary basis, external contractors, researchers and experts to empower
agencies to identify and implement efficiency transformations.
(d) Develop standardized efficiency improvement models, with associated training
materials, that can be shared across state agencies to empower more widespread replications of
the approach and foster a culture of innovation, constructive challenge, and accountability.
SECTION 23.3.(b) Beginning September 1, 2026, OSBM shall report annually to
the North Carolina General Assembly on progress made by the IMPACT Center during the prior
fiscal year. This report should set out key metrics demonstrating the program's impact, including:
(a) The number of projects under way and completed;
Page 96 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) Reductions in administrative costs achieved;
(c) Improvements in service delivery, speed, and responsiveness;
(d) Improvements in public satisfaction scores with the program;
(e) Identification of programs or policies (or components thereof) that should be
discontinued, and recommendations for the redeployment of taxpayer dollars to more effective
uses.

MITIGATE FEDERAL FUNDING ACTIONS
SECTION 23.4.(a) For the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the Office of State Budget
and Management (OSBM) may use funds available in the Federal Infrastructure Match Reserve
to assist state agencies in mitigating the fiscal impacts of federal spending freezes, federal
government shutdowns, or federal spending reductions. This assistance includes, but is not
limited to, providing legally required personnel-related or contractual expenses resulting from
the discontinuation or delay of federal funds that an agency cannot otherwise support within
existing resources.
SECTION 23.4.(b) Agencies shall submit documentation of the shortfall resulting
from the discontinuation or delay of federal funds to the Director of the Budget. The Office of
State Budget and Management (OSBM) may, at the discretion of the Director, allocate funds
available to the state agency to meet current liabilities. The funds are appropriated from the
Federal Infrastructure Match Reserve for the purposes set out in this section, at the time the
Director deems such a transfer necessary.
SECTION 23.4.(c) To the extent possible, state agencies shall reimburse these funds
to OSBM. OSBM shall revert all reimbursed funds to the Federal Infrastructure Match Reserve
by June 30, 2027.
SECTION 23.4.(d) Not later than September 1, 2026, and September 1, 2027,
OSBM shall submit a written report to the Senate Appropriations Committee on General
Government and Information Technology, the House of Representatives Appropriations
Committee on General Government, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General
Government, the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, and the Fiscal
Research Division which shall include all of the following for each recipient of funds from
OSBM:
(a) The name of any state agency receiving funds pursuant to in subsection (a) of this
section;
(b) The reason for the request for funds, including name of each federal program that was
impacted by a funding spending freeze, a federal government shutdown, or a federal spending
reduction, and a brief description of the impact;
(c) The amount of funds provided from the Federal Infrastructure Match Reserve; and
(d) The amount of funds reimbursed to the Federal Infrastructure Match Reserve.

PART XXIV. BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT – SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
[RESERVED]

PART XXV. OFFICE OF STATE CONTROLLER

OVERPAYMENTS AUDITS
SECTION 25.1. G.S. 147-86.22(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Collection Techniques. – The State Controller, in conjunction with the Office of the
Attorney General, shall establish policies and procedures to govern techniques for collection of
accounts receivable. These techniques may include use of credit reporting bureaus, judicial
remedies authorized by law, and administrative setoff by a reduction of a tax refund pursuant to
the Setoff Debt Collection Act, Chapter 105A of the General Statutes, or a reduction of another
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 97

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
payment, other than payroll, due from the State to a person to reduce or eliminate an account
receivable that the person owes the State.
The State Controller shall negotiate a contract with a third party to perform an audit and
collection process of inadvertent overpayments by State agencies to vendors as a result of pricing
errors, neglected rebates and discounts, miscalculated freight charges, unclaimed refunds,
erroneously paid excise taxes, and related errors. The third party shall be compensated only from
funds recovered as a result of the audit. Of the recovered funds and subject to availability, the
State Controller may use up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) annually to develop and
provide governmental accounting education for state agency fiscal staff. Savings realized in
excess of costs and any funds used by the State Controller for the aforementioned purpose shall
be transferred from the agency to the Office of State Budget and Management and placed in a
special reserve account for future direction by the General Assembly. Any disputed savings shall
be settled by the State Controller. This paragraph does not apply to the purchase of medical
services by State agencies or payments used to reimburse or otherwise pay for health care
services."

ELECTRONIC PAYMENT PROCESSING
SECTION 25.2. G.S. 147-86.22 reads as rewritten:
"§ 147-86.22. Statewide accounts receivable program.
…
(b) Electronic Payment. – Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 147-86.20 and
G.S. 147-86.21, this subsection applies to debts owed a community college, a local school
administrative unit, an area mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse
authority, and the Administrative Office of the Courts, and to debts payable to or through the
office of a clerk of superior court or a magistrate, as well as to debts owed to other State agencies
as defined in G.S. 147-86.20.
The State Controller shall establish policies that allow accounts receivable to be payable
under certain conditions by electronic payment. These policies shall be established with the
concurrence of the State Treasurer. In addition, any policies that apply to debts payable to or
through the office of a clerk of superior court or a magistrate shall be established with the
concurrence of the Administrative Officer of the Courts. The Administrative Officer of the Courts
may also establish policies otherwise authorized by law that apply to these debts as long as those
policies are not inconsistent with the Controller's policies.
A condition of payment by electronic payment is receipt by the appropriate State agency of
the full amount of the account receivable owed to the State agency. A Notwithstanding the
provisions of this section or any other provision of law, a State agency may enter into a contract
with a payment processor that authorizes the processor to retain their fee for providing the
processing service at the time each transaction is made. The terms of any contract executed under
this subsection shall be approved by the State Controller with the concurrence of the State
Treasurer and the Administrative Office of the Courts, as applicable. In the absence of a contract
with a processor to retain service fees, the State agency may charge a debtor who pays by
electronic payment may be required to pay any fee or charge associated with the use of electronic
payment. Fees fees to cover the costs incurred in accepting the payment electronically, but in no
event shall the debtor be required to pay a fee that is greater than four percent (4%) of the
electronic payment. If the State agency does not require the debtor to pay a fee associated with
processing electronic paymentspayments, the fee may be paid out of the General Fund and
Highway Fund if the payment of the fee by the State is economically beneficial to the State and
the payment of the fee by the State has been approved by the State Controller and State Treasurer.
The State Controller and State Treasurer shall consult with the Joint Legislative Commission
on Governmental Operations before establishing policies that allow accounts receivable to be
payable by electronic payment and before authorizing fees associated with electronic payment to
Page 98 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
be paid out of the General Fund and Highway Fund. A payment of an account receivable that is
made by electronic payment and is not honored by the issuer of the card or the financial institution
offering electronic funds transfer does not relieve the debtor of the obligation to pay the account
receivable.
…
(d) Annual Report. – The State Controller shall report annually to the Joint Legislative
Commission on Governmental Operations and the Fiscal Research Division on the revenue
deposited into Special Reserve Account 24172 and the disbursement of that revenue."

PART XXVI. ELECTIONS

USE OF HELP AMERICA VOTE ACT
SECTION 26.1. The State Board of Elections shall use federal Help America Vote
Act (HAVA) funds appropriated in this act for the 2025-2026 fiscal biennium for the following
purposes:
(1) Continued funding for equipment and software for critical IT operations.
(2) Continuing the funding of information technology and regional support
positions, including the IT Security and Compliance Manager.

PART XXVII. GENERAL ASSEMBLY [RESERVED]

PART XXVIII. GOVERNOR [RESERVED]

PART XXIX. HOUSING FINANCE AGENCY [RESERVED]

PART XXIX-A. OFFICE OF STATE HUMAN RESOURCES

MAKE APPLYING FOR STATE JOBS EASIER
SECTION 29A.1.(a) Chapter 126 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a
new section to read:
"§ 126-14.2A. Increasing efficiency of state job application process.
(a) The Office of State Human Resources shall allow applicants to apply for state jobs by
uploading a resume or website profile, then having an electronic tool import text from the resume
or website profile into the format used on the state job application form. The Office shall structure
the job application process to make applying by an imported resume or website profile as easy
and efficient as possible while still providing the information that is reasonably necessary for
merit-based hiring under G.S. 126-14.2 and G.S. 126-14.3. Applicants are responsible for
ensuring that all information required for initial screening is included in the state job application
form after importing resume or website profile.
(b) To the extent that a job application requires references, supplemental questions, or
other information that would not commonly be found on a resume and is not required for initial
screening, state agencies may delay requiring that information until job interviews or until later
in the selection process.
(c) At least once each year, the Office of State Human Resources shall present the state
application form and demonstrate the import process to the State Human Resources Commission
for the Commission's informal feedback."
SECTION 29A.1.(b) G.S. 126-5(c7) reads as rewritten:
"(c7) Except as to the policies, rules, and plans established by the Commission pursuant to
G.S. 126-4(1), 126-4(2), 126-4(3), 126-4(4), 126-4(5), 126-4(6), 126-14.3, and except as to
G.S. 126-14.2, G.S. 126-14.2A, G.S. 126-34.02(b)(1) and (2), and Articles 6 and 7 of this
Chapter, this Chapter does not apply to exempt managerial positions."
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 99

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 29A.1.(c) G.S. 126-5(c17) reads as rewritten:
"(c17) Except as to the policies, rules, and plans established by the Commission pursuant to
G.S. 126-4(1), 126-4(2), 126-4(3), 126-4(4), 126-4(5), 126-4(6), 126-7, 126-14.3, and except as
to the provisions of G.S. 126-14.2, G.S. 126-14.2A, G.S. 126-34.1(a)(2), and Articles 6 and 7 of
this Chapter, the provisions of this Chapter shall not apply to a warden of an adult corrections
facility."
SECTION 29A.1.(d) G.S. 126-5(c18) reads as rewritten:
"(c18) Except as to the policies, rules, and plans established by the Commission pursuant to
G.S. 126-4(1), 126-4(2), 126-4(3), 126-4(4), 126-4(5), 126-4(6), 126-4(7), and 126-14.3, and
except as to the provisions of G.S. 126-14.2, G.S. 126-14.2A, 126-34.02(b)(1) and (2), and
Articles 6 and 7 of this Chapter, this Chapter does not apply to the warden of a State adult
correctional facility. Employees in these positions shall be public servants under
G.S. 138A-3(70) and shall file Statements of Economic Interest under G.S. 138A-22. Employees
in these positions shall receive the protections of former G.S. 126-5(e) if the employees were
hired before the date of its repeal and have the minimum cumulative service to qualify under that
subsection."
SECTION 29A.1.(e) Section 39A.1 shall be effective when it becomes law. OSHR
shall modify the state job application process no later than November 1, 2025, to implement the
authority granted by this section

ALLOW PERMANENTLY HIRING CERTAIN TEMPORARY EMPLOYEES UNDER
SPECIFIC CONDITIONS
SECTION 29A.2. Chapter 126 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 126-14.3A. Temp-to-perm hiring.
The Council of State, the executive branch agencies, the Community College System Office,
and the University of North Carolina may directly hire temporary employees into vacant
positions so long as all of the following conditions are met:
(1) The position to which the temporary employee would be appointed is vacant;
(2) The temporary employee must have been working, for at least six months not
including any mandatory breaks under G.S. 126-6.3, in a role that is
substantially equivalent to the appointed position with satisfactory
performance;
(3) The temporary employee must meet the minimum education and experience
requirements for the position classification and have a salary set within the
classification range; and
(4) The temporary employee must have been hired through the Temporary
Solutions Program of the North Carolina Office of State Human Resources
(OSHR).
The Director of the Office of State Human Resources may grant an exception to requirement
(3).
Except as otherwise provided in this section, the hiring shall be exempt from Chapter 126 of
the General Statutes, including any procedural or substantive requirements such as publicly
posting the position, requiring an application, holding an interview or new reference checks,
selecting the applicants from the pool of the most qualified persons, and following the priorities
for certain types of applicants under State law. The hiring shall not be exempt from G.S. 126-14,
G.S. 126-14.1, G.S. 126-14.5, and Articles 6 and 7 of Chapter 126 of the General Statutes. The
exemption from Chapter 126 of the General Statutes for the hiring process shall not affect
whether the position is subject to Chapter 126 of the General Statutes once the employee is hired."

Page 100 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
MAKE STATE AGENCY HIRING, PAY, AND CLASSIFICATION FLEXIBILITY
PERMANENT
SECTION 29A.3.(a) Chapter 126 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a
new section to read:
"§ 126-3.1. Agency Hiring, Pay, and Classification Flexibility.
Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 126 of the General Statutes to the contrary, the
Council of State, the executive branch agencies, the Community College System Office, and The
University of North Carolina are each authorized to do the following:
(1) Allow an individual the option of having the individual's application
considered for future job postings at the same agency and at other agencies if
the individual has been identified as a qualified applicant within the same or
comparable classification.
(2) Allow agencies to recruit and hire applicants from a job posting that applies
to all vacancies for a particular classification at all state agencies.
(3) Classify or reclassify their positions according to the classification system
established by the State Human Resources Commission (SHRC) as long as
the employee meets the minimum requirements of the classification.
(4) Set salaries for their employees within the salary ranges for the respective
position classification established by the SHRC.
However, nothing in this section shall reduce the authority granted to the Director of the
Office of State Human Resources to implement corrective actions in cases of employer
noncompliance."

MODERNIZE AND SIMPLIFY THE STATE HUMAN RESOURCES ACT
SECTION 29A.4.(a) No later than March 15, 2026, the Office of State Human
Resources (OSHR) shall report to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the
House of Representatives, and the Fiscal Research Division on suggested changes to Chapter 126
of the General Statutes in order to update the North Carolina Human Resources Act to simplify
the Chapter and reflect human resource best practices. At a minimum, the report should address
legislative changes needed to:
(1) Streamline hiring,
(2) Enhance recruitment and make state employment more attractive,
(3) Develop and maintain a high-quality, well-trained state workforce, and
(4) Improve employee retention.
OSHR shall work with state agencies, local governments, and other relevant
stakeholders in developing these recommended changes.

EXTEND TEMPORARY REMOVAL OF BARRIERS TO ALLOW RETIREES OF THE
TEACHERS' AND STATE EMPLOYEES' RETIREMENT SYSTEM AND THE
LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL EMPLOYEES' RETIREMENT SYSTEM TO RETURN
TO WORK ON A PART-TIME, TEMPORARY, OR INTERIM BASIS
SECTION 29A.5. Section 12.1(a) of S.L. 2024-51 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 12.1.(a) For individuals who retired under the Teachers' and State Employees'
Retirement System (TSERS) on or after April 1, 2024, but before October 1, 2024,March 1, 2025,
the six-month separation from service from an employer required under G.S. 135-1(20) in order
for a retirement to become effective shall not apply and instead a one-month separation shall be
required, provided that the position to which the individual returns is needed due to the state of
emergency related to Hurricane Helene or associated Hurricane Helene recovery efforts, as
certified to the Retirement Systems Division of the Department of State Treasurer by the
employing agency."
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 101

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"SECTION 12.1.(b) Upon the expiration of subsection (a) of this section, all of the
following shall apply:
(1) The six-month separation from an employer required under G.S. 135-1(20)
shall again be applicable to individuals who retired under TSERS on or after
April 1, 2024, but before October 1, 2024. March 1, 2025.
(2) In order for a member's retirement under TSERS on or after April 1, 2024, but
before October 1, 2024, March 1, 2025, to become effective in any month, the
member must perform no work for an employer, including part-time,
temporary, substitute, or contractor work, at any time between the expiration
of subsection (a) of this section and the end of the six months immediately
following the effective date of retirement, provided the expiration of the
six-month period of separation did not occur while subsection (a) of this
section was in effect.
"SECTION 12.1.(c) For individuals who retired under TSERS on or after April 1, 2024, but
before October 1, 2024,March 1, 2025, any time worked between September 25, 2024, and the
time subsection (a) of this section expires shall not be considered work for the purposes of the
six-month separation required under G.S. 135-1(20) or for the purposes of G.S. 135-3(d),
provided the position held by the individual is needed due to the state of emergency related to
Hurricane Helene or associated Hurricane Helene recovery efforts, as certified to the Retirement
Systems Division of the Department of State Treasurer by the employing agency.
"SECTION 12.1.(d) For individuals who retired prior to October 1, 2024,March 1, 2025,
any earnings received between September 25, 2024, and the time that subsection (a) of this
section expires shall not be treated as earned by a TSERS beneficiary under the provisions of
G.S. 135-3(a)(8)c., provided those earnings are related to a position needed due to the state of
emergency related to Hurricane Helene or associated Hurricane Helene recovery efforts, as
certified to the Retirement Systems Division of the Department of State Treasurer by the
employing agency.
"SECTION 12.1.(e) For individuals who retired prior to October 1, 2024,March 1, 2025,
any earnings received between September 25, 2024, and the time that subsection (a) of this
section expires shall not be treated as earned by a beneficiary of the Local Governmental
Employees Retirement System (LGERS) under the provisions of G.S. 128-24(5)c., provided
those earnings are related to a position needed due to the state of emergency related to Hurricane
Helene or associated Hurricane Helene recovery efforts, as certified to the Retirement Systems
Division of the Department of State Treasurer by the employing unit.
…
"SECTION 12.1.(g) Subsection (a) of this section expires June 30, 2026 and is applicable
to any activity on or before that date.when the statewide declaration of emergency issued by the
Governor in Executive Order No. 315, concurred to by the Council of State and as extended
pursuant to this act and any other enactment of a general law, expires."

PART XXX. INSURANCE

DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE LEASE EXPENSES
SECTION 30.1. Section 7.(a) of S.L. 2023-114 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 7.(a) The General Assembly authorizes the Department of Insurance to fund,
with receipts or from other non-General Fund and non-State Capital and Infrastructure Fund
sources available to the Department, a sum not to exceed eighteen million dollars
($18,000,000)twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) to enter into a lease agreement for the
temporary relocation of the Department's offices and a sum not to exceed one million
($1,000,000) for costs associated with the temporary relocation. The lease agreement funded by
the sum authorized in this subsection shall be for a term not to exceed five years and shall not be
Page 102 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
renewed without prior approval from the General Assemblyfive years, with the option to renew
for two additional five year consecutive periods. The Department shall complete the relocation
process no later than October 15, 2023."

PART XXXI. INSURANCE – INDUSTRIAL COMMISSION [RESERVED]

PART XXXII. LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR [RESERVED]

PART XXXIII. MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS

CEMETERY TRUST FUND
SECTION 33.1. Article 14 of Chapter 14B of the General Statute is amended by
adding a new Section to read:
"§ 143B-1219. North Carolina Veterans Cemeteries Trust Fund.
(a) There is established the North Carolina Veterans Cemetery Trust Fund (hereinafter
"Fund"), a special fund within the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs. The Fund shall
be maintained as a special fund and shall be administered by the Department to carry out the
provisions of this section for the operations and maintenance of State veterans' cemeteries. Fund
resources may also be used to cover the projected cashflow needs of cemetery expansion projects
funded by grants from the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs. Interest accruing from the
monies in the Fund shall be credited to the Fund. The Fund shall consist of the following sources
of funding:
(1) All interest and investment earnings received on monies in the Fund.
(2) Funds or monies received by the Department, the receipt of which does not
exclude any other source of revenue, from the United States, any federal
agency or institution, or individual reimbursement, for the support of veterans
cemeteries.
(3) Any other funds, as directed by the General Assembly.
(b) The Department is authorized to use up to four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000)
of the interest earned on the Fund to create up to four positions to maintain and operate the
existing state veteran cemeteries. The amount allowed to the Department for costs under this
section may be increased as needed to reflect legislatively mandated salary or benefit increases.
…."

AUTHORIZE FUNDING TO CONSTRUCT A STATE VETERANS HOME IN WAKE
COUNTY
SECTION 33.2. Notwithstanding Section 36.7(d) of S.L. 2018-5, as enacted by
Section 9.1(a) of S.L. 2019-97, the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs may Utilize
funds in an amount not exceeding twenty nine million nine hundred ninety five thousand dollars
($29,995,000) funds appropriated in this act the total cost of the project from the North Carolina
Veterans Home Trust Fund established under G.S. 143B-1293 to provide the required State
match for federal funding for the construction of a new State veterans nursing facility in Wake
County. Any federal funds received for this purpose are hereby appropriated.

CLARIFICATION OF VETERANS DEFINITIONS
SECTION 33.3. G.S. 143B-1213 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-1213. Definitions.
Except where provided otherwise, the following definitions apply in this Chapter:
(1) Department. – The Department of Military and Veterans Affairs.
(2) Secretary. – The Secretary of Military and Veterans Affairs.
(3) Veteran. – One of the following, as applicable.
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 103

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. For qualifying as a voting member of the State Board of Veterans
served honorably during a period of war as defined in Title 38, United
States Code.
b. For entitlement to the services of the Department of Military and
Veterans Affairs, a person who may be entitled to any benefits or rights
under the laws of the United States by reason of service in the Armed
Forces of the United States under the U.S. Department of Defense
(Army, Marine Corps, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, National Guard)
and the U.S. Department of Homeland Security (Coast Guard), and the
reserve components thereof.
c. For this Chapter, unless otherwise stated "Armed Forces of the United
States" means the Armed Forces of the United States under the United
States Department of Defense (Army, Marine Corps, Navy, Air Force,
Space Force, National Guard) and the United States Department of
Homeland Security (Coast Guard), the reserve components thereof.
…."

PART XXXIV. REVENUE

SCRAP TIRE DISPOSAL TAX
SECTION 34.1. G.S. 105-187.19(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-187.19. Use of tax proceeds.
(a) The Secretary shall distribute the taxes collected under this Article, less the allowance
to the Department of Revenue for administrative expenses, in accordance with this
section. The Secretary may retain the cost of collection by the Department, not to
exceed four hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($425,000)six hundred
seventy-five thousand dollars ($675,000) a year as reimbursed to the Department.
…."

WHITE GOODS DISPOSAL TAX
SECTION 34.2. G.S. 105-187.24 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-187.24. Use of tax proceeds.
The Secretary shall distribute the taxes collected under this Article, less the Department of
Revenue's allowance for administrative expenses, in accordance with this section. The Secretary
may retain the Department's cost of collection, not to exceed four hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars ($425,000)six hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($675,000) a year, as reimbursement
to the Department.
…."

PART XXXV. SECRETARY OF STATE [RESERVED]

PART XXXVI. TREASURER [RESERVED]

PART XXXVII. GENERAL GOVERNMENT – MISCELLANEOUS [RESERVED]

PART XXXVIII. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY [RESERVED]

PART XXXIX. SALARIES AND BENEFITS

ELIGIBLE STATE-FUNDED EMPLOYEES AWARDED COST-OF-LIVING
ADJUSTMENT/ LEGISLATIVE SALARY INCREASES
Page 104 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 39.1.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, except as provided by subsection (b) of
this section, a person (i) whose salary is set by this Part, pursuant to the North Carolina Human
Resources Act or as otherwise authorized in this act and (ii) who is employed in a State-funded
position on June 30, 2025, is awarded a compensation adjustment as follows:
(1) Two percent (2%) effective July 1, 2025.
(2) As otherwise allowed or provided by law.
SECTION 39.1.(b) For the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the following persons are
not eligible to receive the legislative salary increases provided by subsection (a) of this section:
(1) Employees of local boards of education.
(2) Local community college employees.
(3) Employees of The University of North Carolina
(4) Clerks of superior court compensated under G.S. 7A-101.
(5) Correctional employees to which Section 39.18 of this Part applies.
(6) Law enforcement officers to which Section 39.19.(a) of this Part applies.
(7) Probation and parole officers to which Section 39.20.(a) of this Part applies.
(8) Employees of schools operated by the Department of Health and Human
Services, the Department of Public Safety, and the State Board of Education
who are paid based on the Teacher Salary Schedule.
SECTION 39.1.(c) Permanent part-time employees shall receive the increase
authorized by this section on a prorated and equitable basis.
SECTION 39.1.(d) No eligible State-funded employee shall be prohibited from
receiving the full salary increase provided in this section solely because the employee's salary
after applying the legislative increase is above the maximum of the salary range prescribed by
the State Human Resources Commission.

LABOR MARKET ADJUSTMENT RESERVE
SECTION 39.2.(a) Of the Labor Market Adjustment Reserve funds appropriated in
this Act, agencies shall award salary adjustments to identified employees pursuant to the
following requirements:
(1) Any increase provided to an employee shall not exceed the greater of fifteen
thousand dollars ($15,000) or fifteen percent (15%) of their current base
salary.
(2) Any increase provided to an employee may not result in the employee's salary
exceeding the maximum salary of the salary range associated with the
position.
(3) If an agency has 500 or more employees, no more than twenty-five percent
(25%) of the agency's permanent employees may receive a salary increase
from the funds appropriated for this purpose. If an agency has fewer than 500
employees, no more than 50% of the agency's permanent employees may
receive a salary increase.
(4) Funds may not be awarded to employees in positions with salaries set in law
or paid based on an experience-based salary schedule that is eligible to receive
funding from the Pay Plan Reserve.
SECTION 39.2.(b) The Director of the Budget may adjust a State agency's budgeted
receipts to provide an equivalent two percent (2%) Labor Market Adjustment Reserve for the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium subject to the requirements in subsection (a) of this section, provided
that sufficient receipts are available. Agency receipts needed to implement this section are
appropriated for the 2025-26 fiscal year and the 2026-27 fiscal year.
SECTION 39.2.(c) The Office of State Human Resources (OSHR) shall compile a
single report detailing how these funds were distributed by each agency. OSHR shall develop a
uniform reporting mechanism for agencies that displays the salary increases made for each
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 105

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
position classification, the average increase provided to employees in each position classification,
and the market-based justification for the awarded salary increases. Agencies receiving Labor
Market Adjustment Reserve appropriations shall report to OSHR by January 30, 2026. By
February 30, 2026, OSHR shall submit the report containing the agency responses to the Fiscal
Research Division.

STATE EMPLOYEE BONUS
SECTION 39.3.(a) Any person (i) whose salary is set by Section 7A.(5), Section
7A.(8), Section 7A.(9) or by this Part, pursuant to the North Carolina Human Resources Act,
who is employed on September 30th, 2025, shall be awarded a bonus for the 2025-26 fiscal year
in the amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), payable during the month of October 2025.
SECTION 39.3.(b) Notwithstanding Subsection (d) of Section 39.33, any funds
appropriated for bonuses in excess of the amounts required to implement the bonuses shall revert
and not be credited to the Pay Plan Reserve.
SECTION 39.3.(c) Notwithstanding G.S. 135-1(7a), the compensation bonuses
awarded by this section is not compensation under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General
Statutes, the Teachers' and State Employees' Retirement System.
SECTION 39.3.(d) The compensation bonuses awarded by this section are not part
of annual salary and shall be paid out separately. The compensation bonus shall be awarded to
eligible permanent employees without regard to an employee's placement within the salary range,
including employees at the top of the salary range. The compensation bonus shall be adjusted pro
rata for permanent part-time employees.

ADDITIONAL VACATION DAYS FOR STATE EMPLOYEES
SECTION 39.4. The number of annual vacation leave credits provided to employees
subject to the State Human Resources Act who are full-time or over half-time and have a
permanent, trainee, time-limited or probationary appointment and who are in pay status for
one-half of the regularly scheduled workdays and holidays in a pay period shall be increased to
the following amounts:
Years of Total Service Days Granted Each Year
Less than 1 year 15
1 but less than 5 years 17
5 but less than 10 years 20
10 but less than 15 years 22
15 but less than 20 years 24
20 or more years 27

GOVERNOR AND COUNCIL OF STATE
SECTION 39.5.(a) The salary of the Governor, as provided by G.S. 147-11(a), shall
remain unchanged.
SECTION 39.5.(b) The annual salaries for members of the Council of State, payable
monthly, for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium are as follows:

Council of State FY 2025-26 FY 2026-27
Lieutenant Governor $171,752 $171,752
Attorney General 171,752 171,752
Secretary of State 171,752 171,752
State Treasurer 171,752 171,752
State Auditor 171,752 171,752
Superintendent of Public Instruction 171,752 171,752
Agriculture Commissioner 171,752 171,752
Page 106 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Insurance Commissioner 171,752 171,752
Labor Commissioner 171,752 171,752

CERTAIN EXECUTIVE BRANCH OFFICIALS
SECTION 39.6. The annual salaries, payable monthly, for the following executive
branch officials for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium are as follows:

Executive Branch Officials FY 2025-26 FY 2026-27
Chairman, Alcoholic Beverage
Control Commission $143,661 $143,661
State Controller 200,041 200,041
Commissioner of Banks 161,238 161,238
Chair, Board of Review, Division
of Employment Security 158,156 158,156
Members, Board of Review,
Division of Employment Security 156,223 156,223
Chairman, Parole Commission 158,156 158,156
Full-Time Members of the Parole Commission 146,231 146,231
Chairman, Utilities Commission 179,280 179,280
Members of the Utilities Commission 161,238 161,238
Executive Director, North Carolina
Agricultural Finance Authority 139,904 139,904
State Fire Marshall 141,831 141,831

JUDICIAL BRANCH
SECTION 39.7.(a) The annual salaries, payable monthly, for the following judicial
branch officials for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium are as follows:

Judicial Branch Officials FY 2025-26 FY 2026-27
Chief Justice, Supreme Court $209,165 $209,165
Associate Justice, Supreme Court 203,736 203,736
Chief Judge, Court of Appeals 200,514 200,514
Judge, Court of Appeals 195,310 195,310
Judge, Senior Regular Resident Superior Court 179,478 179,478
Judge, Superior Court 174,199 174,199
Chief Judge, District Court 172,574 172,574
Judge, District Court 167,499 167,499
Chief Administrative Law Judge 149,078 149,078
District Attorney 172,357 172,357
Assistant Administrative Officer of the Courts 156,369 156,369
Public Defender 172,357 172,357
Director of Indigent Defense Services 173,622 173,622
SECTION 39.7.(b) The district attorney or public defender of a judicial district, with
the approval of the Administrative Officer of the Courts or the Commission on Indigent Defense
Services, respectively, shall set the salaries of assistant district attorneys or assistant public
defenders, respectively, in that district such that the average salaries of assistant district attorneys
or assistant public defenders in that district, for the 2025-2027 biennium, do not exceed one
hundred and four thousand three hundred thirty-eight dollars ($104,338) and the minimum salary
of any assistant district attorney or assistant public defender is at least fifty-six thousand
twenty-one dollars ($56,021), effective July 1, 2025.

Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 107

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
CLERKS OF SUPERIOR COURT
SECTION 39.8. Effective July 1, 2025, G.S. 7A-101(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The clerk of superior court is a full-time employee of the State and shall receive an
annual salary, payable in equal monthly installments, based on the number of State-funded
assistant and deputy clerks of court as determined by the Administrative Office of Court's
workload formula, according to the following schedule:
Assistants and Deputies Annual Salary
0-19 $111,726$115,078
20-29 123,488127,193
30-49 135,248139,305
50-99 147,010151,420
100+ 149,949154,447."

ASSISTANT AND DEPUTY CLERKS OF SUPERIOR COURT
SECTION 39.9. Effective July 1, 2025, G.S. 7A-102(c1) reads as rewritten:
"(c1) A full-time assistant clerk or a full-time deputy clerk, and up to one full-time deputy
clerk serving as head bookkeeper per county, shall be paid an annual salary subject to the
following minimum and maximum rates:
Assistant Clerks and Annual Salary
Head Bookkeeper
Minimum $40,482$41,696
Maximum 74,79277,036

Deputy Clerks Annual Salary
Minimum $35,257$37,404
Maximum 57,02960,502."

MAGISTRATES
SECTION 39.10. Effective July 1, 2025, G.S. 7A-171.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7A-171.1. Duty hours, salary, and travel expenses within county.
(a) The Administrative Officer of the Courts, after consultation with the chief district
judge and pursuant to the following provisions, shall set an annual salary for each magistrate:
(1) A full-time magistrate shall be paid the annual salary indicated in the table set
out in this subdivision. A full-time magistrate is a magistrate who is assigned
to work an average of not less than 40 hours a week during the term of office.
The Administrative Officer of the Courts shall designate whether a magistrate
is full-time. Initial appointment shall be at the entry rate. A magistrate's salary
shall increase to the next step every two years on the anniversary of the date
the magistrate was originally appointed for increases to Steps 1 through 3, and
every four years on the anniversary of the date the magistrate was originally
appointed for increases to Steps 4 through 6.
Table of Salaries of Full-Time Magistrates
Step Level Annual Salary
Entry Rate $47,228$48,645
Step 1 50,71452,235
Step 2 54,47556,109
Step 3 58,45760,211
Step 4 63,22865,125
Step 5 68,97371,042
Step 6 75,41577,677."

Page 108 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
LEGISLATIVE EMPLOYEES
SECTION 39.11.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, the annual salaries of the Legislative
Services Officer and of nonelected employees of the General Assembly in effect on June 30,
2025, shall be legislatively increased by two percent (2%).
SECTION 39.11.(b) Nothing in this act limits any of the provisions of G.S. 120-32.

GENERAL ASSEMBLY PRINCIPAL CLERKS
SECTION 39.12. Effective July 1, 2025, G.S. 120-37(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) The principal clerks shall be full-time officers. Each principal clerk shall be entitled
to other benefits available to permanent legislative employees and shall be paid an annual salary
of one hundred thirty-three thousand nine hundred thirty-six dollars ($133,936), one hundred
thirty-six thousand six hundred fifteen dollars ($136,615), payable monthly. Each principal clerk
shall also receive such additional compensation as approved by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives or the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, respectively, for additional
employment duties beyond those provided by the rules of their House. The Legislative Services
Commission shall review the salary of the principal clerks prior to submission of the proposed
operating budget of the General Assembly to the Governor and shall make appropriate
recommendations for changes in those salaries. Any changes enacted by the General Assembly
shall be by amendment to this paragraph."

SERGEANTS-AT-ARMS AND READING CLERKS
SECTION 39.13. Effective July 1, 2025, G.S. 120-37(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The sergeant-at-arms and the reading clerk in each house shall be paid a salary of five
hundred twenty-eight dollars ($528) five hundred thirty nine dollars ($539) per week plus
subsistence at the same daily rate provided for members of the General Assembly, plus mileage
at the rate provided for members of the General Assembly for one round trip only from their
homes to Raleigh and return. The sergeants-at-arms shall serve during sessions of the General
Assembly and at such time prior to the convening of, and subsequent to adjournment or recess
of, sessions as may be authorized by the Legislative Services Commission. The reading clerks
shall serve during sessions only."

COMMUNITY COLLEGES
SECTION 39.14.(a) Community college personnel shall receive the following
cost-of-living adjustments:
(1) Effective July 1, 2025, the State Board of Community Colleges shall provide
community college faculty and non-faculty personnel with an
across-the-board salary increase in the amount of two percent (2%).
SECTION 39.14.(b) The minimum salaries for nine-month, full-time curriculum
community college faculty for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium are as follows:
Education Level FY 2025-26 FY 2026-27
Vocational Diploma/Certificate or Less $43,982 $43,982
Associate Degree or Equivalent 44,594 44,594
Bachelor's Degree 47,247 47,247
Master's Degree or Education Specialist 49,602 49,602
Doctoral Degree 52,995 52,995
SECTION 39.14.(c) No full-time faculty member shall earn less than the minimum
salary for his or her education level. The pro rata hourly rate of the minimum salary for each
education level shall be used to determine the minimum salary for part-time faculty members.

UNIVERSITY OF NORTH CAROLINA SYSTEM
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 109

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 39.15.(a) Effective for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the annual salaries
of University of North Carolina SHRA employees shall be increased as provided by Section 39.1
of this act.
SECTION 39.15.(b) For the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the Board of Governors of
The University of North Carolina may provide EHRA employees a salary increase pursuant to
the policies adopted by the Board. Funds for EHRA compensation increases may be used for any
one or more of the following purposes: (i) merit pay, (ii) across the board increases, (iii)
recruitment bonuses, (iv) retention increases, and (v) any other compensation increase pursuant
to those policies.
SECTION 39.15.(c) The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina
shall make a report on the use of compensation increase and bonus funds to the General Assembly
by no later than March 1 of each year of the biennium.

CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS/YOUTH COUNSELOR TECHNICIANS/YOUTH
SERVICES BEHAVIORAL SPECIALISTS/YOUTH COUNSELORS – SALARY
SCHEDULE
SECTION 39.16.(a) State employees serving as correctional officers in the
Department of Adult Correction shall be compensated at a specific pay rate on the basis of a
salary schedule determined according to the duration of the employee's correctional officer work
experience.
SECTION 39.16.(a1) State employees serving in the Department of Public Safety,
Division of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, shall be compensated at a specific pay
rate set on the basis of a salary schedule determined according to the duration of the employee's
work experience, as follows:
(1) Youth Counselor Technicians shall be paid under the Correctional Officer I
salary schedule.
(2) Youth Behavioral Specialists shall be paid under the Correctional Officer II
salary schedule.
(3) Youth Counselors shall be paid under the Correctional Officer III salary
schedule.
SECTION 39.16.(b) The following annual salary schedule applies under subsections
(a) and (a1) of this section for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, effective for on July 1, 2025:

FY 2025-26 FY 2026-27
Experience COI COII COIII COI COII COIII
0 $40,066 $41,385 $44,259 $40,066 $41,385 $44,259
1 $42,869 $44,281 $47,358 $42,869 $44,281 $47,358
2 $45,444 $46,985 $50,201 $45,444 $46,985 $50,201
3 $47,715 $49,285 $52,711 $47,715 $49,285 $52,711
4 $49,623 $51,256 $54,819 $49,623 $51,256 $54,819
5 $51,113 $52,793 $56,463 $51,113 $52,793 $56,463
6+ $52,135 $53,850 $57,593 $52,135 $53,850 $57,593

STATE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER SALARY SCHEDULE
SECTION 39.17.(a) Law enforcement officers of the State Bureau of Investigation,
Alcohol Law Enforcement, and State Capitol Police shall be compensated pursuant to an
experience-based salary schedule and shall be compensated based on the officer's respective
work experience pursuant to the salary schedule in subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 39.17.(b) The following annual salary schedule applies under subsection
(a) of this section for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, effective July 1, 2025, and July 1, 2026, for
each respective fiscal year:
Page 110 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

Years of Experience FY 2025-26 FY 2026-27
0 55,081 55,081
1 58,663 58,663
2 62,476 62,476
3 66,537 66,537
4 70,862 70,862
5 75,468 75,468
6+ 80,374 80,374

STATE HIGHWAY PATROL SALARY SCHEDULE
SECTION 39.18.(a) Law enforcement officers of the State Highway Patrol
compensated pursuant to an experience-based salary schedule and shall be compensated based
on the officer's respective work experience pursuant to the salary schedule in subsection (b) of
this section.
SECTION 39.18.(b) The following annual salary schedule applies under subsection
(a) of this section for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, effective July 1, 2025, and July 1, 2026, for
each respective fiscal year:

Years of Experience FY 2025-26 FY 2026-27
0 56,650 56,650
1 60,332 60,332
2 64,253 64,253
3 68,430 68,430
4 72,878 72,878
5 77,615 77,615
6+ 82,660 82,660

PROBATION AND PAROLE OFFICERS/JUVENILE COURT COUNSELORS –
SALARY SCHEDULE
SECTION 39.19.(a) Probation and parole officers shall be compensated pursuant to
the experience-based salary schedule based on the officer's respective work experience, as
established in subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 39.19.(a1) State employees serving in the Department of Public Safety,
Division of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, as Juvenile Court Counselors shall be
compensated under the probation and parole officer salary schedule.
SECTION 39.19.(b) The following annual salary schedule applies under subsection
(a) of this section for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, effective July 1, 2025, and July 1, 2026, for
each respective fiscal year:

Years of Experience FY 2025-26 FY 2026-27
0 46,785 46,785
1 49,825 49,825
2 53,066 53,066
3 56,514 56,514
4 60,188 60,188
5 64,100 64,100
6+ 68,266 68,266

STATE AGENCY TEACHERS
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 111

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 39.20.(a) Employees of schools operated by the Department of Health
and Human Services, the Department of Public Safety, and the State Board of Education who are
paid on the Teacher Salary Schedule shall be paid as authorized by Section 8.1 of this act.
SECTION 39.20.(b) Employees of the School of Science and Mathematics of The
University of North Carolina who are paid pursuant to a salary schedule adopted by the North
Carolina School of Science and Math Board of Trustees shall be paid in accordance with the
schedule adopted by the Board.

ALL STATE-SUPPORTED PERSONNEL/FLEXIBLE ADMINISTRATION OF
COST-OF-LIVING ADJUSTMENTS
SECTION 39.21.(a) The cost-of-living adjustments authorized by this act for the
2025-2026 fiscal year shall be paid effective on July 1, 2025, and do not apply to persons
separated from service due to resignation, dismissal, reduction in force, death, or retirement or
whose last workday is prior to June 30, 2025.
SECTION 39.21.(b) The Director of the Budget is granted flexibility to administer
the compensation increases enacted by this act. The State employer contribution rates enacted by
this act for retirement and related benefits may be deemed by the Director of the Budget for
administrative purposes to become effective after July 1 of the applicable fiscal year to provide
flexibility in the collection and reconciliation of salary-related contributions as required by law,
provided the estimated amount contributed to any affected employee benefit trust equals the
amount that would have been contributed to the employee benefit trust if the enacted employer
contribution rates had been effective on July 1 of the applicable fiscal year.
SECTION 39.21.(c) This section applies to all employees paid from State funds,
whether or not subject to or exempt from the North Carolina Human Resources Act, including
employees of public schools, community colleges, and The University of North Carolina.

MOST STATE EMPLOYEES
SECTION 39.22. Unless otherwise expressly provided by this part, the annual
salaries in effect for the following persons on June 30, 2025, shall be legislatively increased as
provided by Section 39.1 of this act:
(1) Permanent, full-time State officials and persons whose salaries are set in
accordance with the State Human Resources Act.
(2) Permanent, full-time State officials and persons in positions exempt from the
State Human Resources Act.
(3) Permanent, part-time State employees.
(4) Temporary and permanent hourly State employees.

USE OF FUNDS APPROPRIATED FOR COST-OF-LIVING ADJUSTMENT/BENEFIT
INCREASES
SECTION 39.23.(a) The Office of State Budget and Management shall ensure that
the appropriations made in this act for cost-of-living adjustments and employee benefits are used
only for these purposes.
SECTION 39.23.(b) If the Director of the Budget determines that funds appropriated
to a State agency for mandated salary increases and employee benefits exceed the amount
required by that agency for those purposes, the Director may reallocate those funds to other State
agencies that received insufficient funds for required cost-of-living and benefit increases.
SECTION 39.23.(c) Funds appropriated for cost-of-living adjustments and
employee benefit increases may not be used to adjust the budgeted salaries of vacant positions,
or to provide salary increases in excess of those required by the General Assembly except to
increase the budgeted salary of any position to the minimum of the position's salary range.
Page 112 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 39.23.(d) Any funds appropriated for cost-of-living adjustment and
employee benefit increases or minimum of salary range adjustments in excess of the amounts
required to implement the increases shall be credited to the Pay Plan Reserve.
SECTION 39.23.(e) No later than March 1 of each year of the biennium, the Office
of State Budget and Management shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on
Governmental Operations on the expenditure of funds for legislatively mandated salary increases
and employee benefits. This report shall include at least the following information for each State
agency:
(1) The total amount of funds that the agency received for legislatively mandated
salary increases and employee benefits.
(2) The total amount of funds transferred from the agency to other State agencies
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. This section of the report shall
identify the amounts transferred to each recipient State agency.
(3) The total amount of funds used by the agency for legislatively mandated salary
increases and employee benefits.
(4) The amount of funds used pursuant so subsection (c) of this section.

MITIGATE BONUS LEAVE
SECTION 39.24. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, State agencies,
departments, institutions, the North Carolina Community College System, and The University of
North Carolina may offer State employees the opportunity to use or to cash in special bonus leave
benefits that have accrued pursuant to Section 28.3A of S.L. 2002-126, Section 30.12B(a) of S.L.
2003-284, Section 29.14A of S.L. 2005-276, and Section 35.10A of S.L. 2014-100, but only if
all of the following requirements are met:
(1) Employee participation in the program must be voluntary.
(2) Special leave that is liquidated for cash payment to an employee must be
valued at the amount based on the employee's current annual salary rate.
(3) By September 1, 2026, and September 1, 2027, a report on the use of this
provision shall be submitted to the respective agency head or employing
agency and to the Fiscal Research Division.

SALARY-RELATED CONTRIBUTIONS
SECTION 39.25.(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 135-8(d)(3a), effective July 1, 2025, the
State's employer contribution rates budgeted for retirement and related benefits as a percentage
of covered salaries for the 2025-2026 fiscal year for teachers and State employees, State law
enforcement officers (LEOs), the University and Community Colleges Optional Retirement
Programs (ORPs), the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System (CJRS), and the Legislative
Retirement System (LRS) are as set forth below:
Teachers
and State State
Employees LEOs ORPs CJRS LRS
Retirement 17.39% 17.39% 6.84% 38.95% 20.34%
Disability 0.07% 0.07% 0.07% 0.00% 0.00%
Death 0.13% 0.13% 0.00% 0.00% 0.00%
Retiree Health 7.27% 7.27% 7.27% 7.27% 7.27%
NC 401(k) 0.00% 5.00% 0.00% 0.00% 0.00%

Total Contribution
Rate 24.86% 29.86% 14.18% 46.22% 27.61%
The rate for teachers and State employees and State law enforcement officers includes
one one-hundredth percent (0.01%) for the Qualified Excess Benefit Arrangement.
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 113

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 39.25.(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 135-8(d)(3a), effective July 1, 2026, the
State's employer contribution rates budgeted for retirement and related benefits as a percentage
of covered salaries for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for teachers and State employees, State law
enforcement officers (LEOs), the University and Community Colleges Optional Retirement
Programs (ORPs), the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System (CJRS), and the Legislative
Retirement System (LRS) are as set forth below:
Teachers
and State State
Employees LEOs ORPs CJRS LRS
Retirement 16.79% 16.79% 6.84% 37.73% 19.32%
Disability 0.07% 0.07% 0.07% 0.00% 0.00%
Death 0.13% 0.13% 0.00% 0.00% 0.00%
Retiree Health 7.56% 7.56% 7.56% 7.56% 7.56%
NC 401(k) 0.00% 5.00% 0.00% 0.00% 0.00%

Total Contribution
Rate 24.55% 29.55% 14.47% 45.29% 26.88%
The rate for teachers and State employees and State law enforcement officers includes
one one-hundredth percent (0.01%) for the Qualified Excess Benefit Arrangement.
SECTION 39.25.(c) Effective July 1, 2025, the maximum annual employer
contributions, payable monthly, by the State to the North Carolina State Health Plan for Teachers
and State Employees for each covered employee and the average covered retiree are as follows:
(1) For employees, eight thousand five hundred dollars ($8,500).
(2) For retirees, five thousand six hundred seventy-five dollars ($5,675). In
applying this subdivision, the annual employer contribution for the average
retiree shall be calculated assuming the retiree enrollment counts remain at the
April 2025 level throughout the 2025-2026 fiscal year.
SECTION 39.25.(d) Effective July 1, 2026, the maximum annual employer
contributions, payable monthly, by the State to the North Carolina State Health Plan for Teachers
and State Employees for each covered employee and the average covered retiree are as follows:
(1) For employees, eight thousand nine hundred twenty-five dollars ($8,925).
(2) For retirees, five thousand nine hundred fifty-nine dollars ($5,959). In
applying this subdivision, the annual employer contribution for the average
retiree shall be calculated assuming the retiree enrollment counts remain at the
April 2026 level throughout the 2026-2027 fiscal year.

PROVIDE COST-OF-LIVING ADJUSTMENT FOR RETIREES OF THE TEACHERS'
AND STATE EMPLOYEES' RETIREMENT SYSTEM, THE CONSOLIDATED
JUDICIAL RETIREMENT SYSTEM, AND THE LEGISLATIVE RETIREMENT
SYSTEM
SECTION 39.26.(a) G.S. 135-5 is amended by adding new subsections to read:
"(aaaa) After September 1, 2025, but on or before October 31, 2025, a onetime cost of living
supplement payment shall be made to or on account of beneficiaries who are living as of
September 1, 2025, and whose retirement commenced on or before September 1, 2025. The
payment shall be two percent (2%) of the beneficiary's annual retirement allowance payable as
of September 1, 2025, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the
beneficiary dies before the payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the member's
legal representative. No beneficiary shall be deemed to have acquired a vested right to any future
supplemental payments. "
SECTION 39.26.(b) G.S. 135-65 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
Page 114 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(ll) After September 1, 2025, but on or before October 31, 2025, a onetime cost of living
supplement payment shall be made to or on account of beneficiaries who are living as of
September 1, 2025, and whose retirement commenced on or before September 1, 2025. The
payment shall be two percent (2%) of the beneficiary's annual retirement allowance payable as
of September 1, 2025, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the
beneficiary dies before the payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the member's
legal representative. No beneficiary shall be deemed to have acquired a vested right to any future
supplemental payments."
SECTION 39.26.(c) G.S. 120-4.22A is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(ff) In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, after September 1, 2025, but on or
before October 31, 2025, a onetime cost of living supplement payment shall be made to or on
account of beneficiaries who are living as of September 1, 2025, and whose retirement
commenced on or before September 1, 2025. The payment shall be two percent (2%) of the
beneficiary's annual retirement allowance payable as of September 1, 2025, and shall not be
prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the beneficiary dies before the payment is
made, then the payment shall be payable to the member's legal representative. No beneficiary
shall be deemed to have acquired a vested right to any future supplemental payments."

PART XL. CAPITAL

GENERAL FUND CAPITAL APPROPRIATIONS/INTRODUCTION
SECTION 40.1. The appropriations made by the 2025 General Assembly for capital
improvements are for constructing, repairing, or renovating State buildings, utilities, and other
capital facilities, for acquiring sites for them where necessary, and for acquiring buildings and
land for State government purposes.

CAPITAL APPROPRIATIONS/STATE CAPITAL AND INFRASTRUCTURE FUND
SECTION 40.2. This subsection authorizes the capital projects listed in the
Committee Report, and appropriates funding from the State Capital and Infrastructure Fund to
the Office of State Budget and Management for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium based upon
projected cash flow needs for the authorized projects. The amounts authorized in this subsection
represent the maximum amounts of funding from the State Capital and Infrastructure Fund that
may be expended on each project. An additional action by the General Assembly is required to
increase the maximum authorization for any of the projects listed.

CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT & REPAIRS AND RENOVATIONS APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 40.3. Section 40.1 of S.L. 2023-134 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 40.1.(a) The following agency capital improvement projects have been assigned
a project code for reference to allocations in this Part, past allocations, and for intended project
support by the General Assembly for future fiscal years:
Agency Capital Improvement Project Project Code
Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services
Tidewater Research Station–Swine Unit Replacements DACS21-2
NCFS–Region 1 Headquarters DACS21-4
Troxler Science Building–Overflow Parking DACS23-1
Western NC Farmers Market DACS23-2
Raleigh State Farmers Market–Improvements DACS23-3
Pesticide Storage, Loading, & Cleaning Facilities DACS23-4
Cherry Research Station–Administrative Office DACS23-5
Griffith Forest Center–Central Warehouse & Office DACS23-6
D-6 HQ (Cumberland Co.)–Maintenance Shop Replacement DACS23-7
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 115

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Research Stations–New Maintenance Shop Facilities DACS23-8
Piedmont Research Station–Bridge DACS23-9
Research Stations–Multipurpose Facilities DACS23-10
NCFS–New County Offices, Region 3 DACS23-11
Tuttle Educational State Forest–Office & Education Center DACS23-12
D-12–New Headquarters & Shop DACS23-13
NCFS–Property Purchase DACS23-14
New Cherokee County NC Forest Service Office DACS25-15
State Fair Midway Center Expansion DACS25-16
Western NC Agricultural Center Expansion DACS25-17
Charlotte Farmer's Market DACS25-18
Western NC Farmer's Market DACS25-19

Department of Environmental Quality
Reedy Creek Laboratory DEQ21-1
Reedy Creek Laboratory Campus Expansion DEQ25-2
Water Resource Development Grant – Tar-Pamlico Flood Mitigation DEQ25-3
Water Resource Development Grant – Carolina Beach Storm Mitigation DEQ25-4
Water Resource Development Grant – Kure Beach Storm Mitigation DEQ25-5
Water Resource Development Grant – Wrightsville Beach Storm Mitigation DEQ25-6
Water Resource Development Grant – Ocean Isle Storm Mitigation DEQ25-7
Water Resource Development Grant – B. Everette Jordan Reservoir DEQ25-8
Water Resource Development Grant – Holden Beach Storm Mitigation DEQ25-9
Water Resource Development Grant – Oak Island Storm Mitigation DEQ25-10

Department of Health and Human Services
Walter B. Jones–New Medical Office Bldg. DHHS23-1
Broughton Hospital–New Maintenance & Warehouse Facility DHHS23-2
Cherry Hospital–New Maintenance Bldg. DHHS23-3
South Piedmont Medical Examiner DHHS23-4
O'Berry Neuro-Medical Treatment Center DHHS25-5
Julian Keith Alcohol & Drug Abuse Treatment Center DHHS25-6
Raleigh Medical Examiners Office Expansion DHHS25-7

Department of Natural and Cultural Resources
Fort Fisher Aquarium–Aquarium Expansion DNCR21-5
NC Museum of History–Expansion DNCR21-13
Zoo–New Aviary DNCR23-1
NC Museum of Art at Winston-Salem/SECCA DNCR23-2
Stone Mountain State Park–Parking Lot DNCR23-4
North Carolina Maritime Museum at Beaufort DNCR23-5
Town Creek Indian Mound State Historic Site–
Visitor Center & Exhibit Improvements DNCR23-6
State Historic Sites–Three New Visitor Centers DNCR23-7
Thomas Day House–Site Development DNCR23-8
Lake Waccamaw State Park–New Campground DNCR23-12
Lumber River State Park–Wire Pasture Access Development DNCR23-13
NC Maritime Museum at Southport DNCR23-14
NC Transportation Museum DNCR23-15
Fort Fisher Historic Site DNCR23-16
Fort Fisher Aquarium Expansion & Renovations DNCR25-17
Page 116 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Stone Mountain State Park – New Visitor Center DNCR25-18
State Historic Sites – Maintenance and Services Facilities DNCR25-19
NC Museum of Art at Winston-Salem Expansion DNCR25-20
NC Zoo Modular Staff Offices DNCR25-21
African American Monument at the State Capitol DNCR25-22
State Parks – Chimney Rock DNCR25-23
NC Zoo Park Security & Safety DNCR25-24

Department of Administration
State Government Executive Headquarters DOA22-1
Department of Instruction Building Renovation DOA22-3
Service Campus DOA23-1
State Agency Lease DOA23-2
Archdale Building Demolition DOA23-3
Caswell Square Demolition DOA23-4
Parking Deck–Wilmington Street DOA23-5
Albemarle Building Facility Improvements DOA23-6
Secure Records and Technology Center DOA25-7
Bicentennial Mall Replacement DOA25-8
State Government Child Care Centers DOA25-9
Replacement Administration Building DOA25-10

Department of Commerce
Wanchese Marine Industrial Park–Covered Workspace COMM23-1

Department of Adult Correction
Stun Fencing DAC23-1
DARTCenter–Exterior Envelope Repairs DAC23-2
Sampson CC–Gatehouse DAC23-3
Gaston CC–Modular Medical Office DAC23-4
Storage Buildings DAC23-6
Institution Roof Systems DAC25-7
Institution Perimeter Security DAC25-8
Institution Interior Life Safety Fire Alarm Systems DAC25-9
HVAC Enhancements DAC25-10

Department of Public Safety
Samarcand Training Academy for Safer Schools Supplemental DPS25-1
State Highway Patrol–
Viper Building DPS21-6
Auditorium DPS23-3
Training Academy Facilities Enhancement–Phases 3-6 DPS23-4
Training Center Cadet Dorm & Training Bldg. DPS23-7
State Bureau of Investigation–
Headquarters & Building 12 Renovation DPS21-9
Logistics Building–Phase 1 DPS23-11
Juvenile Justice–
Richmond YDC DPS21-1
New Youth Detention Center DPS23-1
Cabarrus YDC–Perimeter Fence Modifications DPS23-5
Cabarrus–New Modular Office DPS23-6
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 117

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Richmond Juvenile Detention Center DPS25-7
Emergency Management–
Badin Logistics Support Center Shed DPS23-8
Badin Warehouse Expansion DPS23-9
Badin Lot Acquisition DPS23-10
National Guard–
NCNG Matching Fund NG23-1
Ballentine Building/NCNG Museum NG23-2
Constable Building NG23-3
Rocky Mount Complex/MILCON NG23-4
Special Forces Complex NG23-5
Winston Salem Storage Buildings NG23-6
Louisburg Readiness Center NG23-9
National Guard Matching Fund NG25-10
Western Region RSOI Site – Morganton NC25-11

State Bureau of Investigation
Headquarters & Building 12 Renovation DPS21-9
Logistics Building – Phase 1 DPS23-11
Logistics Building – Phase 2 SBI25-1
State Highway Patrol Maintenance Building SBI25-2

Department of Public Instruction
Center for the Advancement of Teaching DPI21-1

Department of Insurance
Office of State Fire Marshal–
Land Development & Training Center DOI21-1
Statewide Building Evaluations DOI25-2

Department of Transportation
North Carolina Global TransPark Authority–
Aircraft Maintenance Repair & Overhaul Facility TRAN23-1
DOT– New County Buildings TRAN23-2

General Assembly
Education Campus Project NCGA21-3
Education Campus Parking Deck NCGA23-1
Education Campus Demolition NCGA23-2
Education Campus Supplemental NCGA25-4

Department of Military and Veterans Affairs
Fayetteville Veterans Home DMVA25-1

The University of North Carolina
Appalachian State University–
Peacock Hall/Business UNC/ASU21-1
Hickory Campus UNC/ASU22-1
Walker Hall–Interior Renovation UNC/ASU23-1
University of North Carolina at Charlotte–
Smith Hall–Comprehensive Renovation UNC/CLT23-1
Page 118 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Colvard Hall–Comprehensive Renovation UNC/CLT23-2
Esports UNC/CLT23-3
Stadium Upgrades UNC/CLT23-4
University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill–
Business School UNC/CH20-1
Nursing School Renovation UNC/CH20-2
Gardner Hall–Comprehensive Renovation UNC/CH23-1
Wilson Library – Comprehensive Renovation UNC/CH25-3
Carolina North Infrastructure UNC/CH25-4
Elizabeth City State University–
Flight School UNC/ECS21-4
Infrastructure Repairs–Phase 3 UNC/ECS23-1
Jenkins Hall/Dixon Hall–Labs/Classroom/Bldg. Renovation UNC/ECS23-2
Sky Bridge Increase UNC/ECS25-5
East Carolina University–
Brody School of Medicine UNC/ECU21-1
Howell Science Building North–Comprehensive Renovation UNC/ECU23-1
Leo Jenkins Building/Health Sciences–Comprehensive Renovation UNC/ECU23-2
Medical Examiner Office UNC/ECU23-3
Regional Children's Behavioral Health Facility UNC/ECU23-4
Dental School Planning UNC/ECU23-5
Brody School of Medicine Expansion UNC/ECU25-6
UNC Coastal Studies Institute Housing UNC/ECU25-7
Fayetteville State University–
College of Education UNC/FSU21-2
Butler Targeted Renovation UNC/FSU23-1
H.L. Cook Building–Renovation & Addition UNC/FSU23-2
North Carolina Agricultural & Technical State University–
Marteena Hall–Renovation, Phase 2 UNC/A&T23-1
Health and Human Sciences Bldg. UNC/A&T23-2
North Carolina Central University–
Dent Building–Comprehensive Renovation UNC/NCC23-1
Edmonds Classroom Building–Comprehensive Renovation UNC/NCC23-2
University Theater Renovation UNC/NCC23-3
North Carolina State University–
S.T.E.M. Building UNC/NCS20-1
Mann Hall–Renovation, Phase 2 UNC/NCS23-1
Dabney Hall–Renovation, Phase 2 UNC/NCS23-2
Polk Hall–Renovation, Phase 2 UNC/NCS23-3
Veterinary School–Large Animal Hospital UNC/NCS23-4
Engineering Classroom Building UNC/NCS23-5
Nuclear Study UNC/NCS23-6
Business School UNC/NCS23-7
Poe Hall UNC/NCS25-8
North Carolina School of Science and Math–
Morganton Campus
Wellness Center UNC/SSM23-1
Durham Campus
Renovation of Residence Halls UNC/SSM23-2
Academic Commons Addition UNC/SSM23-4
University of North Carolina at Asheville–
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 119

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Lipinsky Hall–Comp. Modernization/Addition UNC/AVL23-1
Sherrill Center UNC/AVL23-2
Gateway Signage UNC/AVL23-3
Repairs & Renovations UNC/AVL23-4
University of North Carolina at Greensboro–
Moore Building–Renovation UNC/GBO23-1
University of North Carolina at Pembroke–
Health Sciences Center UNC/PEM21-1
Givens Performing Arts Center–Renovation UNC/PEM23-1
University of North Carolina School of the Arts–
Stevens Center–Renovation, Phase 2 UNC/SA23-1
New High School Residence Hall UNC/SA23-2
University of North Carolina at Wilmington–
Cameron Hall–Comprehensive Renovation/Expansion UNC/WIL23-1
Kenan Auditorium–Comprehensive Renovation/Expansion UNC/WIL23-2
DeLoach Hall–Modernization UNC/WIL23-3
Health Education Bldg. UNC/WIL23-4
Western Carolina University–
Replacement Engineering Building UNC/WCU23-1
Winston-Salem State University–
K.R. Williams Auditorium UNC/WSS21-1
Eller Hall–Renovation & Elevator Addition UNC/WSS23-1
Pegram Hall–Renovation & Elevator Addition UNC/WSS23-2
Campus Police Improvements UNC/WSS23-3
New Dining Hall UNC/WSS25-4
West Campus Regional Heating Plant UNC/WSS25-5
New Parking Deck UNC/WSS25-6
UNC Board of Governors–
UNC Lease Funds UNC/BOG21-1
NC Care Health Clinics UNC/BOG23-1
NC Care Hospital Investment UNC/BOG23-2
Children's Hospital UNC/BOG23-3
PBS North Carolina UNC/PBS23-1

Repairs and Renovations–The University of North Carolina UNC/R&R21
Repairs and Renovations–State Agencies (non-UNC) R&R21
SCIF-Related Personnel PERS21
OSBM Flexibility Funds FLEX21
Debt Payoff DST23-1
Wildlife Resources Commission–Setzer Hatchery Revision WRC23-1
SECTION 40.1.(b) This subsection authorizes the following capital projects in the
2023-2025 fiscal biennium based upon projected cash flow needs for the authorized projects. The
authorizations provided in this subsection represent the maximum amount of funding from the
State Capital and Infrastructure Fund that may be expended on each project and do not reflect
authorizations from other non-State Capital and Infrastructure Fund sources. An additional action
by the General Assembly is required to increase the maximum authorization for any of the
projects listed:
Capital Improvements–
State Capital and Previous New/Updated
Infrastructure Fund Project Authorization Project Authorization
DACS21-2 $3,518,000 $7,018,000
Page 120 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
DACS21-4 4,000,000 8,100,000
DACS23-1 N/A 2,500,000
DACS23-2 N/A 200,000
DACS23-3 N/A 13,000,000
DACS23-4 N/A 1,750,000
DACS23-5 N/A 749,000
DACS23-6 N/A 750,000
DACS23-7 N/A 4,000,000
DACS23-8 N/A 5,000,000
DACS23-9 N/A 750,000
DACS23-10 N/A 6,200,000
DACS23-11 N/A 3,000,000
DACS23-12 N/A 4,000,000
DACS23-13 N/A 5,000,000
DACS23-14 N/A 12,000,000
DACS25-15 N/A 1,500,000
DACS25-16 N/A 2,000,000
DACS25-17 N/A 2,250,000
DACS25-18 N/A 10,000,000
DACS25-19 N/A 3,500,000
DEQ21-1 55,000,000 68,300,000
DEQ25-2 N/A 48,000,000
DEQ25-3 N/A 8,000,000
DEQ25-4 N/A 3,070,250
DEQ25-5 N/A 2,878,615
DEQ25-6 N/A 1,889,462
DEQ25-7 N/A 1,976,154
DEQ25-8 N/A 437,994
DEQ25-9 N/A 125,000
DEQ25-10 N/A 400,000
DHHS23-1 N/A 1,352,000
DHHS23-2 N/A 5,983,000
DHHS23-3 N/A 5,405,000
DHHS23-4 N/A 20,000,000
DHHS25-5 N/A 21,303,730
DHHS25-6 N/A 4,668,701
DHHS25-7 N/A 35,260,920
DNCR21-5 15,000,000 45,000,000
DNCR21-13 60,000,000 180,000,000
DNCR23-1 N/A 60,000,000
DNCR23-2 N/A 15,000,000
DNCR23-4 N/A 620,000
DNCR23-5 N/A 10,000,000
DNCR23-6 N/A 5,500,000
DNCR23-7 N/A 16,721,240
DNCR23-8 N/A 4,000,000
DNCR23-12 N/A 3,000,000
DNCR23-13 N/A 2,500,000
DNCR23-14 N/A 2,000,000
DNCR23-15 N/A 5,000,000
DNCR23-16 N/A 2,800,000
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 121

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
DNCR25-17 N/A 20,000,000
DNCR25-18 N/A 10,662,000
DNCR25-19 N/A 9,150,000
DNCR25-20 N/A 4,400,000
DNCR25-21 N/A 5,800,000
DNCR25-22 N/A 5,000,000
DNCR25-23 N/A 2,630,000
DNCR25-24 N/A 7,600,000
DOA22-1 88,000,000 88,000,000
DOA22-3 15,000,000 60,000,000
DOA23-1 N/A 33,744,000
DOA23-2 N/A 4,500,000
DOA23-3 N/A 11,000,000
DOA23-4 N/A 15,000,000
DOA23-5 N/A 45,000,000
DOA23-6 N/A 5,000,000
DOA25-7 N/A 102,172,000
DOA25-8 N/A 8,746,960
DOA25-9 N/A 1,000,000
DOA25-10 N/A 1,400,000
COMM231 N/A 250,000
DAC23-1 N/A 23,992,000
DAC23-2 N/A 2,960,212
DAC23-3 N/A 1,521,000
DAC23-4 N/A 1,078,000
DAC236 N/A 3,488,000
DAC25-7 N/A 97,376,135
DAC25-8 N/A 80,000,000
DAC25-9 N/A 50,000,000
DAC25-10 N/A 12,480,000
DPS21-1 10,702,952 14,702,952
DPS21-6 7,139,374 10,634,998
DPS23-1 N/A 40,450,000
DPS23-3 N/A 35,000,000
DPS23-4 N/A 194,000,000
DPS23-5 N/A 886,000
DPS23-6 N/A 690,000
DPS23-7 N/A 43,336,785
DPS23-8 N/A 527,000
DPS23-9 N/A 5,048,828
DPS23-10 N/A 4,198,414
DPS23-11 N/A 13,883,000
DPS25-1 N/A 36,200,000
DPS25-7 N/A 2,802,000
NG23-2 N/A 12,500,000
NG23-3 N/A 16,428,582
NG23-4 N/A 8,500,000
NG23-5 N/A 8,000,000
NG23-6 N/A 550,000
NG23-9 N/A 3,666,667
NG25-10 N/A 10,000,000
Page 122 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
NC25-11 N/A 6,600,000
SBI25-1 N/A 24,048,000
SBI25-2 N/A 7,039,000
DPI21-1 23,416,952 30,416,952
DOI21-1 3,500,000 58,500,000
DOI25-2 N/A 7,500,000
TRAN23-1 N/A 350,000,000
TRAN23-2 N/A 3,400,000
NCGA21-3 269,000,000 320,000,000
NCGA23-1 N/A 65,000,000
NCGA23-2 N/A 10,000,000
NCGA25-4 N/A 11,300,000
DMVA25-1 N/A 10,000,000
UNC/ASU21-1 25,000,000 40,000,000
UNC/ASU22-1 9,000,000 50,000,000
UNC/ASU23-1 N/A 18,000,000
UNC/CLT23-1 N/A 36,000,000
UNC/CLT23-2 N/A 45,000,000
UNC/CLT23-3 N/A 1,500,000
UNC/CLE23-4 N/A 25,000,000
UNC/CH20-1 75,000,000 89,250,000
UNC/CH20-2 65,200,000 87,900,000
UNC/CH23-1 N/A 25,000,000
UNC/CH25-3 N/A 150,000,000
UNC/CH25-4 N/A 80,000,000
UNC/ECS21-4 34,000,000 54,000,000
UNC/ECS23-1 N/A 20,000,000
UNC/ECS23-2 N/A 12,500,000
UNC/ECS25-5 N/A 5,000,000
UNC/ECU21-1 215,000,000 265,000,000
UNC/ECU23-1 N/A 46,000,000
UNC/ECU23-2 N/A 18,900,000
UNC/ECU23-3 N/A 35,000,000
UNC/ECU23-4 N/A 50,000,000
UNC/ECU23-5 N/A 1,000,000
UNC/ECU25-6 N/A 10,000,000
UNC/ECU25-7 N/A 15,000,000
UNC/FSU23-1 N/A 20,750,000
UNC/FSU23-2 N/A 10,000,000
UNC/A&T23-1 N/A 9,700,000
UNC/A&T23-2 N/A 125,500,000
UNC/NCC23-1 N/A 12,073,798
UNC/NCC23-2 N/A 12,999,424
UNC/NCC23-3 N/A 8,500,000
UNC/NCS23-1 N/A 30,000,000
UNC/NCS23-2 N/A 80,000,000
UNC/NCS23-3 N/A 63,000,000
UNC/NCS23-4 N/A 120,000,000
UNC/NCS23-5 N/A 200,000,000
UNC/NCS23-6 N/A 3,000,000
UNC/NCS23-7 N/A 4,500,000
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 123

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
UNC/NCS25-8 N/A 180,000,000
UNC/SSM23-1 N/A 12,000,000
UNC/SSM23-2 N/A 28,988,042
UNC/SSM23-4 N/A 10,000,000
UNC/AVL23-1 N/A 26,150,000
UNC/AVL23-2 N/A 5,000,000
UNC/AVL23-3 N/A 1,000,000
UNC/AVL23-4 N/A 4,000,000
UNC/GBO23-1 N/A 24,200,000
UNC/PEM23-1 N/A 61,000,000
UNC/SA23-1 N/A 51,000,000
UNC/SA23-2 N/A 24,500,000
UNC/WIL23-1 N/A 40,050,000
UNC/WIL23-2 N/A 21,600,000
UNC/WIL23-3 N/A 12,150,000
UNC/WIL23-4 N/A 8,000,000
UNC/WCU23-1 N/A 95,300,000
UNC/WSS23-1 N/A 10,800,000
UNC/WSS23-2 N/A 16,000,000
UNC/WSS23-3 N/A 4,000,000
UNC/WSS25-4 N/A 25,000,000
UNC/WSS25-5 N/A 14,000,000
UNC/WSS25-6 N/A 25,000,000
UNC/BOG21-1 15,000,000 18,750,000
UNC/BOG23-1 N/A 210,000,000
UNC/BOG23-2 N/A 150,000,000
UNC/BOG23-3 N/A 319,746,392
UNC/PBS23-1 N/A 49,500,000
FLEX21 100,000,000 175,000,000
WRC/23-1 N/A 20,000,000
…"

SIX-YEAR INTENDED PROJECT ALLOCATION SCHEDULE
SECTION 40.4. Section 40.2 of S.L. 2023-134 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 40.2. It is the intent of the General Assembly to fund capital improvement
projects on a cash flow basis and to plan for future project funding based upon projected
availability in the State Capital and Infrastructure Fund. Nothing in this section shall be construed
(i) to appropriate funds or (ii) as an obligation by the General Assembly to appropriate funds for
the projects listed in future years. The following schedule lists capital improvement projects that
will begin or be completed in fiscal years outside of the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium and estimated
amounts (in thousands) needed for completion of those projects:

Project Code FY23-24 FY24-25 FY25-26 FY26-27 FY27-28 FY28-29

UNC/R&R21 280,503 250,000200,000210,000 200,000 200,000 200,000
R&R21 200,000 200,000200,000210,000 200,000 200,000 200,000
DACS21-2 N/A 2,000 1,500 N/A N/A N/A
DACS21-4 750 1,850 1,500 N/A N/A N/A
DACS23-3 N/A 3,000 2,000 4,000 4,000 N/A
DACS23-7 N/A N/A 4,000 N/A N/A N/A
DACS23-8 N/A N/A 2,000 1,000 1,000 1,000
Page 124 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
DACS23-9 N/A N/A 750 N/A N/A N/A
DACS23-10 N/A N/A 2,000 2,000 2,200 N/A
DACS23-11 N/A N/A N/A 1,500 1,500 N/A
DACS23-12 N/A N/A N/A 4,000 N/A N/A
DACS23-13 N/A N/A N/A 5,000 N/A N/A
DACS25-15 N/A N/A 1,500 N/A N/A N/A
DACS25-16 N/A N/A 2,000 N/A N/A N/A
DACS25-17 N/A N/A 1,000 1,250 N/A N/A
DACS25-18 N/A N/A 2,000 6,000 2,000 N/A
DACS25-19 N/A N/A N/A 750 2,750 N/A
DEQ21-1 3,325 28,650 17,075 N/A N/A N/A
DEQ25-2 N/A N/A 5,000 15,000 15,000 13,000
DEQ25-3 N/A N/A 4,000 4,000 N/A N/A
DEQ25-4 N/A N/A N/A 3,070.25 N/A N/A
DEQ25-5 N/A N/A N/A 2,878.615 N/A N/A
DEQ25-6 N/A N/A N/A 1,889.462 N/A N/A
DEQ25-7 N/A N/A N/A 1,976.154 N/A N/A
DEQ25-8 N/A N/A 437.994 N/A N/A N/A
DEQ25-9 N/A N/A N/A 125 N/A N/A
DEQ25-10 N/A N/A N/A 400 N/A N/A
DHHS25-5 N/A N/A 10,000 10,000 N/A N/A
DHHS25-6 N/A N/A 4,668.701 N/A N/A N/A
DHHS25-7 N/A N/A 17,630.46 17,630.46 N/A N/A
DNCR21-13 15,000 24,250 86,800 30,950 N/A N/A
DNCR23-1 3,000 3,000 30,000 24,000 N/A N/A
DNCR23-7 2,000 7,721.24 7,000 N/A N/A N/A
DNCR25-17 N/A N/A 20,000 N/A N/A N/A
DNCR25-18 N/A N/A N/A 10,662 N/A N/A
DNCR25-19 N/A N/A 1,650 7,500 N/A N/A
DNCR25-20 N/A N/A 4,400 N/A N/A N/A
DNCR25-21 N/A N/A 1,000 4,800 N/A N/A
DNCR25-22 N/A N/A 5,000 N/A N/A N/A
DNCR25-23 N/A N/A 2,630 N/A N/A N/A
DNCR25-24 N/A N/A 1,600 6,000 N/A N/A
DOA22-1 N/A N/A 8,800 22,000 35,200 22,000
DOA22-3 N/A N/A N/A N/A 21,000 N/A
DOA23-1 500 N/A N/A1,500 N/A16,1221,00015,622 20,244N/A
DOA23-2 2,900 800 800 N/A N/A N/A
DOA23-3 N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A 11,000
DOA23-4 N/A N/A 15,000 N/A N/A N/A
DOA23-5 2,000 3,000 40,000 N/A N/A N/A
DOA25-7 N/A N/A 12,000 30,000 30,000 20,000
DOA25-8 N/A N/A 8,746.96 N/A N/A N/A
DOA25-9 N/A N/A 1,000 N/A N/A N/A
DOA25-10 N/A N/A 1,400 N/A N/A N/A
DOI21-1 5,500 13,750 22,000 13,750 N/A N/A
DOI25-2 N/A N/A 7,500 N/A N/A N/A
DAC23-1 4,776.39 9,607.8 9,607.8 N/A N/A N/A
DAC23-6 N/A 449 2,439 600 N/A N/A
DAC25-7 N/A N/A 5,000 5,000 5,000 5,000
DAC25-8 N/A N/A 5,000 5,000 5,000 5,000
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 125

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
DAC25-9 N/A N/A 50,000 N/A N/A N/A
DAC25-10 N/A N/A 12,480 N/A N/A N/A
DPS21-6 N/A 836.88 2,658.75 N/A N/A N/A
DPS21-9 3,268.05 30,000 19,793.24 N/A N/A N/A
DPS23-1 N/A 600 10,000 29,850 N/A N/A
DPS23-3 N/A 4,400 8,500 13,600 8,500 N/A
DPS23-4 N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A 19,000
DPS23-7 2,000 4,333.68 10,834.2 17,334.71 8,834.2 N/A
DPS23-9 1,000 2,024.4 2,024.4 N/A N/A N/A
DPS23-11 2,028.5 5,927.25 5,927.25 N/A N/A N/A
DPS25-1 N/A N/A 27,100 9,120 N/A N/A
DPS25-12 N/A N/A 3,623 10,212.5 10,212.5 N/A
DPS25-13 N/A N/A 1,070 2,984.5 2,984.5 N/A
DPS25-7 N/A N/A 2,802 N/A N/A N/A
NG23-1 4,000 6,000 6,000 N/A N/A N/A
NG23-2 1,500 6,000 5,000 N/A N/A N/A
NG23-4 N/A 2,000 6,500 N/A N/A N/A
NG23-5 N/A N/A 800 4,000 3,200 N/A
NG23-9 N/A 666.7 3,000 N/A N/A N/A
NG25-10 N/A N/A 10,000 N/A N/A N/A
NG25-11 N/A N/A 600 6,000 N/A N/A
TRAN23-1 50,000 125,000 125,000 50,000 N/A N/A
NCGA21-3 N/A N/A 65,250 74,750 N/A N/A
NCGA23-1 6,500 16,250 26,000 16,250 N/A N/A
NCGA25-4 N/A N/A 11,300 N/A N/A N/A
DMVA25-1 N/A N/A 10,000 N/A N/A N/A
WRC23-1 8,000 6,000 6,000 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/ASU21-1 N/A 7,500 7,500 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/ASU22-1 N/A 4,100 12,300 14,350 10,250 N/A
UNC/ASU23-1 N/A 1,800 6,300 9,900 N/A N/A
UNC/CLT23-1 N/A 3,600 N/A 12,600 19,800 N/A
UNC/CLT23-2 N/A N/A N/A N/A 4,500 N/A
UNC/CH20-2 N/A 15,756.95 17,693.05 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/CH23-1 N/A N/A N/A N/A 2,500 10,000
UNC/CH25-3 N/A N/A N/A 2,000 N/A N/A
UNC/CH25-4 N/A N/A N/A 4,000 N/A N/A
UNC/ECS21-4 N/A 30,827.27 9,172.73 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/ECS23-1 N/A 2,000 8,000 10,000 N/A N/A
UNC/ECS23-2 N/A N/A N/A N/A 1,250 N/A
UNC/ECS25-5 N/A N/A N/A 5,000 N/A N/A
UNC/ECU21-1 N/A 20,000 84,007.3 85,742.72 N/A N/A
UNC/ECU23-1 N/A 4,600 13,800 16,100 11,500 N/A
UNC/ECU23-2 N/A N/A N/A N/A 1,890 N/A
UNC/ECU23-3 8,750 17,500 8,750 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/ECU25-6 N/A N/A 1,250 8,750 N/A N/A
UNC/ECU25-7 N/A N/A 1,500 N/A 5,102.8 8,397.2
UNC/FSU21-2 N/A 36,376.1 6,573.9 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/FSU23-1 N/A N/A N/A N/A 2,075 N/A
UNC/FSU23-2 1,000 3,500 5,500 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/A&T23-1 970 3,395 5,335 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/A&T23-2 N/A N/A N/A N/A 2,000 18,825
Page 126 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
UNC/NCC23-1 1,207.4 N/A 4,829.5 6,036.9 N/A N/A
UNC/NCC23-2 N/A 1,299.94 N/A 4,549.8 7,149.68 N/A
UNC/NCC23-3 N/A 850 N/A 2,975 4,675 N/A
UNC/NCS20-1 N/A 6,025.2 22,224.8 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/NCS23-1 N/A 3,000 27,000 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/NCS23-2 N/A 8,000 24,000 28,000 20,000 N/A
UNC/NCS23-3 N/A 6,300 18,900 22,050 15,750 N/A
UNC/NCS23-4 N/A N/A 35,000 35,000 N/A N/A
UNC/NCS23-5 N/A N/A N/A 20,000 60,000 60,000
UNC/NCS25-8 N/A N/A 25,048.753 74,957.88 79,993.367 N/A
UNC/SSM23-2 N/A 12,750 3,500 N/A 12,738.42 N/A
UNC/SSM23-4 N/A N/A N/A N/A 1,000 N/A
UNC/AVL23-1 2,615 6,537.5 11,767.5 5,230 N/A N/A
UNC/GBO23-1 N/A 2,420 N/A 8,470 13,310 N/A
UNC/PEM21-1 N/A N/A N/A N/A 36,400 22,750
UNC/PEM23-1 N/A 6,100 24,400 30,500 N/A N/A
UNC/SA23-1 5,100 12,750 22,950 10,200 N/A N/A
UNC/SA23-2 N/A N/A N/A N/A 2,450 8,575
UNC/WIL23-1 N/A 4,005 10,012.5 16,020 10,012.5 N/A
UNC/WIL23-2 N/A 2,160 5,400 8,640 5,400 N/A
UNC/WIL23-3 N/A 1,215 4,860 6,075 N/A N/A
UNC/WCU23-1 N/A 2,000 N/A 9,530 33,355 50,415
UNC/WSS21-1 N/A N/A N/A N/A 22,800 14,250
UNC/WSS23-1 N/A 800 1,080 N/A 3,780 5,140
UNC/WSS23-2 N/A 800 1,600 N/A 5,600 8,000
UNC/WSS25-4 N/A N/A 2,462.965 N/A N/A 15,597.035
UNC/WSS25-5 N/A N/A 1,000 N/A N/A 8,000
UNC/WSS25-6 N/A N/A 1,500 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/BOG21-1 3,750 3,750 3,750 3,750 N/A N/A
UNC/BOG23-1 25,000 80,000 105,000 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/BOG23-3 143,864.4 72,382 103,500 N/A N/A N/A
UNC/PBS23-1 N/A 4,950 N/A 17,325 27,225 N/A
…."

NON-GENERAL FUND/NON-SCIF CAPITAL PROJECT AUTHORIZATIONS
SECTION 40.5. The General Assembly authorizes the following capital projects to
be funded with receipts or from other non-General Fund and non-State Capital and Infrastructure
Fund sources available to the appropriate department:
Amount of Non-General Fund/Non-SCIF
Name of Project Funding Authorized
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027

Department of Natural and Cultural Resources
Jennette's Pier Aquarium- Solar Covered Walkway 450,000 0

Roanoke Island Aquarium- Invertebrate Tank 500,000 0
Pine Knoll Shores Aquarium- Invertebrate Tank 2,000,000
Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services
NC Forest Service Nursery Greenhouse 0 250,000
Department of Public Safety
Alcoholic Beverage Control–
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 127

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
ABC Warehouse Repairs 1,150,000 0
Wildlife Resources Commission
Sykes Depot Greenhouse 331,600 0
D7 Storage Building 400,000 0
Caswell Shooting Range Renovation 3,850,000 0
Coastal Restoration and Resiliency 6,500,000 0
Ransom Road Depot 9,000,000 0
Land Acquisition 5,000,000 5,000,000
WRC Game Land Improvements 0 2,000,000
Butner Lab and Office Building 0 0
McKinney Lake Hatchery Building Replacement 1,300,000 0
Table Rock Hatchery Residence 0 640,000
WRC New Shooting Range 0 2,000,000
New Tillery Office Depot 0 1,500,000
Caswell Depot Expansion 100,000 0

TOTAL AMOUNT OF NON-GENERAL
FUND/NON-SCIF CAPITAL PROJECTS
AUTHORIZED $33,526,600 $13,290,000

PUBLIC SCHOOL BOND ACT OF 2025
SECTION 40.6.(a) Short Title. – This section may be cited as the "Public School
Bond Act of 2025."
SECTION 40.6.(b) Purpose. – It is the intent of the General Assembly by this act to
provide, subject to a vote of the qualified voters of the State, for the issuance of four billion
($4,00,000,000) providing funds, with any other available funds, to invest in the State's public
school facilities, without limitation, for construction, repair, renovation, and furnishing of new
facilities in order to ensure that the people of North Carolina have access to high quality
educational facilities.
SECTION 40.6.(c) Findings – The General Assembly also finds:
(1) There is a documented need of over $13 billion for the construction and
renovation of Public School Facilities.
(2) The State has prudently managed its finances.
(3) The State has achieved the highest credit rating available by independent
credit rating agencies.
(4) The debt proposed by this Act is affordable and preferable to address the needs
of the people of the State.
(5) According to the Debt Affordability Advisory Committee, the State's General
Fund has additional debt capacity of approximately $9.96 billion in the
2025-2026 fiscal year.
(6) With issuance of this bond, debt service would not exceed the 2024-2025
fiscal year level of $466,138,169 until the 2030-2031 fiscal year and then and
decline again beginning in the 2032-2033 fiscal year.
SECTION 40.6.(d) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section
unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Bonds. – Bonds issued under this section.
(2) Cost. – The term includes all of the following:
a. The cost of constructing, reconstructing, renovating, repairing,
enlarging, acquiring, and improving State capital facilities, including
the acquisition of land, rights of way, easements, franchises,
equipment, machinery, furnishings, and other interests in real or
Page 128 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
personal property acquired or used in connection with a State capital
facility.
b. The cost of engineering, architectural, and other consulting services as
may be required.
c. Administrative expenses and charges.
d. The cost of providing personnel to ensure effective project
management.
e. The cost of bond insurance, investment contracts, credit enhancement
and liquidity facilities, interest rate swap agreements or other
derivative products, financial and legal consultants, and related costs
of bond and note issuance, to the extent and as determined by the State
Treasurer.
f. Finance charges, reserves for debt service, and other types of reserves
required pursuant to the terms of any bond or note or related
documents, interest before and during construction or acquisition of a
State capital facility and, if considered advisable by the State
Treasurer, for a period not exceeding two years after the estimated date
of completion of construction or acquisition.
g. The cost of bond insurance, investment contracts, credit enhancement
facilities and liquidity facilities, interest rate swap agreements or other
derivative products, financial and legal consultants, and related costs
of the incurrence or issuance of any bond or note.
h. The cost of reimbursing the State for any payments made for any cost
described in this subdivision.
i. Any other costs and expenses necessary or incidental to the purposes
of this section.
(3) Credit facility. – An agreement entered into by the State Treasurer on behalf
of the State with a bank, savings and loan association, or other banking
institution, an insurance company, reinsurance company, surety company or
other insurance institution, a corporation, investment banking firm, or other
investment institution, or any financial institution or other similar provider of
a credit facility, which provider may be located within or without the United
States, such agreement providing for prompt payment of all or any part of the
principal or purchase price (whether at maturity, presentment or tender for
purchase, redemption, or acceleration), redemption premium, if any, and
interest on any bonds or notes payable on demand or tender by the owner, in
consideration of the State agreeing to repay the provider of the credit facility
in accordance with the terms and provisions of such agreement.
(4) Notes. – Notes issued under this section.
(5) Par formula. – A provision or formula adopted by the State to provide for the
adjustment, from time to time, of the interest rate or rates borne by any bonds
or notes, including the following:
a. A provision providing for such adjustment so that the purchase price
of such bonds or notes in the open market would be as close to par as
possible.
b. A provision providing for such adjustment based upon a percentage or
percentages of a prime rate or base rate, which percentage or
percentages may vary or be applied for different periods of time.
c. Such other provision as the State Treasurer may determine to be
consistent with this act and will not materially and adversely affect the
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 129

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
financial position of the State and the marketing of bonds or notes at a
reasonable interest cost to the State.
(6) State. – The State of North Carolina, including any State agency.
(7) State agency. – Any agency, institution, board, commission, bureau, council,
department, division, officer, or employee of the State. The term does not
include counties, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, local boards
of education, or other local public bodies.
SECTION 40.6.(e) Authorization of Bonds and Notes. – Subject to a favorable vote
of a majority of the qualified voters of the State who vote on the question of issuing public
improvement bonds in the election called and held as provided in this section, the State Treasurer
is hereby authorized, by and with the consent of the Council of State, to issue and sell, at one
time or from time to time, general obligation bonds of the State to be designated "State of North
Carolina Public Improvement Bonds," with any additional designations as may be determined to
indicate the issuance of bonds from time to time, or notes of the State as provided in this section,
in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding four billion dollars ($4,000,000,000) for the
purpose of providing funds, with any other available funds, for the purposes authorized in this
section.
SECTION 40.6.(f) Pursuant to the provisions of part (e) of this section, no more than
four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000) of bonds shall be issued in the 2026-2027 fiscal
year, and no more than eight hundred million dollars ($800,000,000) shall be issued in the
2027-2028 fiscal year to ensure that debt service does not increase above the cost incurred in the
2024-2025 fiscal year.
SECTION 40.6.(g) Use of Public Improvement Bond and Note Proceeds. – (1)
Subject to the provisions of subdivision (2) of this subsection, the proceeds of public
improvement bonds and notes, including premium thereon, if any, shall be used for the projects
in the following general amounts set forth below:

Public Instruction

Public Schools
Capital Assistance Program New Schools, Additions, Renovations $4,000,000,000
Total for Public Instruction $4,000,000,000

(1b) Process for Allocating Funds from the Unforeseen Costs Reserve. – The
Office of State Budget and Management (OSBM) shall set out the process for
applying for funds from the Unforeseen Costs Reserve, together with the
criteria for assessing such applications, in a Budget Memo. OSBM may
allocate funds from the Unforeseen Costs Reserve only when it is satisfied
that the conditions set out under these criteria have been met. Once agreed,
funds may only be drawn down as needed, in line with project cashflow
requirements.
(2) Special Allocation Provisions. – In determining the use of the proceeds of
public improvement bonds and notes, including premium thereon, if any, set
forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection, the following special allocation
provisions apply:
a. The proceeds of public improvement bonds and notes, including
premium thereon, if any, for public instruction for public schools
capital assistance, as provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection,
shall be allocated as follows:
1. One billion one hundred and fifty million ($1,150,000,000) of
such proceeds shall be allocated equally to each local education
Page 130 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
agency (LEA). Each LEA shall receive a base payment of five
million dollars ($10,000,000).
2. Two billion eight hundred fifty million ($2,850,000,000) of
such proceeds shall be allocated among local school
administrative units on the basis of average daily membership
for the 2024-2025 fiscal year where the numerator is average
daily membership for the local administrative unit and the
denominator is the total average daily membership for the state
for the 2024-2025 fiscal year.
3. Any county receiving bond proceeds allocated shall provide
local matching funds from county funds, other non-State funds,
or a combination of these sources for such proceeds, unless
they are a county designated as a development tier one area.
The amount of matching funds shall be (i) one dollar ($1.00)
of local matching funds for every two dollars ($2.00) of such
proceeds for a local school administrative unit located in a
county that is a development tier two area, as defined in
G.S. 143B-437.08, and (iii) one dollar ($1.00) of local
matching funds for every one dollar ($1.00) of such proceeds
for a local school administrative unit located in a county that is
a development tier three area, as defined in G.S. 143B-437.08.
The match requirement may be satisfied by non-State
expenditures for public school facilities made on or after
January 1, 2021. If a debt has been incurred since January 1,
2021, for the general purpose of public school facilities, then
the face amount of the debt shall be considered as a non-State
expenditure for public school facilities for the purpose of the
match. No other expenditures made or debts incurred before
January 1, 2022, may be used to satisfy the match requirement.
As counties satisfy the match requirements of this subsection,
they shall document the extent to which they have done so in
periodic reports to the State Board of Education. These reports
shall include any information and documentation required by
the State Board of Education. The State Board of Education
shall certify to the State Treasurer from time to time the extent
to which the match requirements of this subsection have been
met with respect to each county. Bond proceeds shall be
distributed for expenditure only as, and to the extent, the
matching requirement of this section are satisfied, as certified
by the State Board of Education. The State Board of Education
shall also require counties to report annually on the impact of
funds provided under this act on the property tax rate for that
year. These reports shall be public documents and shall be
furnished to any citizen upon request. If the State Board of
Education determines that a county has not met the matching
requirement set forth in this subdivision by January 1, 2031,
the State Board of Education shall certify that fact to the State
Treasurer by March 1, 2031. The State Board of Education
shall reallocate unmatched funds in the following manner:
(i) Proceeds allocated under subdivision (1) shall be
reallocated to local administrative units receiving funds
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 131

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
under subdivision (1) for which the State Board of
Educated has certified matching funds.
(ii) Proceeds allocated under subdivision (2) shall be
reallocated to local administrative units receiving funds
under subdivision (2) for which the State Board of
Educated has certified matching funds.
4. A local school administrative unit that receives proceeds under
this section shall ensure that such proceeds are used:
(i) For acquisition of real property and construction,
acquisition, reconstruction, enlargement, renovation,
or replacement of buildings and other structures, and
(ii) To supplement local funds for public school capital
outlay projects and shall not decrease local funds for
those projects from one fiscal year to the next fiscal
year, as measured by the most recent five-year annual
average capital outlay expenditure.
SECTION 40.6.(h) Allocation and Tracking of Proceeds. –
(1) Public improvement bonds. – The proceeds of public improvement bonds and
notes, including premium thereon, if any, except the proceeds of bonds the
issuance of which has been anticipated by bond anticipation notes or the
proceeds of refunding bonds or notes, shall be placed by the State Treasurer
in a special fund to be designated "Public Improvement Bonds Fund," which
may include such appropriate special accounts therein as may be determined
by the State Treasurer and shall be disbursed as provided in this section.
Monies in the Public Improvement Bonds Fund shall be allocated and
expended as provided in this section.
Any additional monies that may be received by means of a grant or grants
from the United States of America or any agency or department thereof or
from any other source for deposit to the Public Improvement Bonds Fund may
be placed in the Public Improvement Bonds Fund or in a separate account or
fund and shall be disbursed, to the extent permitted by the terms of the grant
or grants, without regard to any limitations imposed by this section.
Monies in the Public Improvement Bonds Fund or any separate account
established under this section may be invested from time to time by the State
Treasurer in the same manner permitted for investment of monies belonging
to the State or held in the State treasury, except with respect to grant money
to the extent otherwise directed by the terms of the grant. Investment earnings,
except investment earnings with respect to grant monies to the extent
otherwise directed or restricted by the terms of the grant, may be (i) credited
to the Public Improvement Bonds Fund, (ii) used to pay debt service on the
bonds authorized by this section, (iii) used to satisfy compliance with
applicable requirements of the federal tax law, or (iv) transferred to the
General Fund of the State.
The proceeds of public improvement bonds and notes, including premium
thereon, if any, may be used with any other monies made available by the
General Assembly for funding the projects authorized by this section,
including the proceeds of any other State bond issues, whether heretofore
made available or that may be made available at the session of the General
Assembly at which this section is ratified or any subsequent sessions. The
proceeds of public improvement bonds and notes, including premium thereon,
if any, shall be expended and disbursed under the direction and supervision of
Page 132 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the Director of the Budget. The funds provided by this section shall be
disbursed for the purposes provided in this section upon warrants drawn on
the State Treasurer by the State Controller, which warrants shall not be drawn
until requisition has been approved by the Director of the Budget and which
requisition shall be approved only after full compliance with the State Budget
Act, Chapter 143C of the General Statutes.
(2) Tracking of bond proceeds. – The State Treasurer or the State Treasurer's
designee is hereby authorized and directed to set up a comprehensive system
of tracking the proceeds of the public improvement bonds and notes, including
premium thereon, if any, to the extent necessary to enable the State Treasurer
or the State Treasurer's designee to properly account for the use of such
proceeds for compliance with applicable requirements of the federal tax law
or otherwise. All recipients of such proceeds shall comply with any tracking
system implemented by the State Treasurer or the State Treasurer's designee
for this purpose. The State Treasurer may withhold such proceeds from any
State agency or department not complying with this subdivision.
(3) Costs. – Allocations to the costs of a capital improvement or undertaking in
each case may include allocations to pay the costs set forth in subdivisions c.
through g. of subdivision (2) of subsection (d) of this section in connection
with the issuance of bonds for that capital improvement or undertaking.
SECTION 40.6.(i) Election. – The question of the issuance of the bonds authorized
by this section shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State at a Statewide election to be
held in November of 2025. Any other primary, election, or referendum validly called or
scheduled by law at the time the election on the bond question provided for in this subsection is
held may be held as called or scheduled. Notice of the election shall be given in the manner and
at the times required by G.S. 163-33(8). The election and the registration of voters therefore shall
be held under and in accordance with the general laws of the State.
Ballots, voting systems authorized by Article 14A of Chapter 163 of the General
Statutes, or both may be used in accordance with rules prescribed by the State Board of Elections.
The bond question to be used in the ballots or voting systems shall be in substantially the
following form:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Authorize the issuance of four billion dollars ($4,000,000,000) in public school
bonds, plus interest, to pay the cost of constructing and renovating public school buildings,
secured by a pledge of the faith and credit and taxing power of the State." If a majority of those
voting on the bond question in the election vote in favor of the issuance of the bonds described
in the question, those bonds may be issued as provided in this section. If a majority of those
voting on a bond question in the election do not vote in favor of the issuance of the bonds
described in the question, those bonds shall not be issued. The results of the election shall be
canvassed and declared as provided by law for elections for State officers; the results of the
election shall be certified by the State Board of Elections to the Secretary of State in the manner
and at the time provided by the general election laws of the State."
SECTION 40.6.(j) Issuance of Bonds and Notes. –
(1) Terms and conditions. – Bonds or notes may bear a date or dates, may be serial
or term bonds or notes, or any combination thereof, may mature in such
amounts and at such time or times, not exceeding 40 years from their date or
dates, may be payable at such place or places, either within or without the
United States of America, in such coin or currency of the United States of
America as at the time of payment is legal tender for payment of public and
private debts, may bear interest at such rate or rates, which may vary from
time to time, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 133

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the State or otherwise as may be provided by the State, at such price or prices,
including a price less than or greater than the face amount of the bonds or
notes, and under such terms and conditions, all as may be determined by the
State Treasurer, by and with the consent of the Council of State.
(2) Signatures; form and denomination; registration. – Bonds or notes may be
issued in certificated or uncertificated form. If issued in certificated form,
bonds or notes shall be signed on behalf of the State by the Governor or shall
bear the Governor's facsimile signature, shall be signed by the State Treasurer
or shall bear the State Treasurer's facsimile signature, and shall bear the Great
Seal of the State, or a facsimile of the Seal shall be impressed or imprinted
thereon. If bonds or notes bear the facsimile signatures of the Governor and
the State Treasurer, the bonds or notes shall also bear a manual signature
which may be that of a bond registrar, trustee, paying agent, or designated
assistant of the State Treasurer. Should any officer whose signature or
facsimile signature appears on bonds or notes cease to be such officer before
the delivery of the bonds or notes, the signature or facsimile signature shall
nevertheless have the same validity for all purposes as if the officer had
remained in office until delivery. Bonds or notes may bear the facsimile
signatures of persons, who at the actual time of the execution of the bonds or
notes shall be the proper officers to sign any bond or note, although at the date
of the bond or note such persons may not have been such officers. The form
and denomination of bonds or notes, including the provisions with respect to
registration of the bonds or notes and any system for their registration, shall
be as the State Treasurer may determine in conformity with this section.
(3) Manner of sale; expenses. – Subject to the approval by the Council of State as
to the manner in which bonds or notes shall be offered for sale, whether at
public or private sale, whether within or without the United States, and
whether by publishing notices in certain newspapers and financial journals,
mailing notices, inviting bids by correspondence, negotiating contracts of
purchase, or otherwise, the State Treasurer is authorized to sell bonds or notes
at one time or from time to time at any rates of interest, which may vary from
time to time, and at any prices, including a price less than or greater than the
face amount of the bonds or notes, as the State Treasurer may determine. All
expenses incurred in the preparation, sale, and issuance of bonds or notes shall
be paid by the State Treasurer from the proceeds of bonds or notes or other
available moneys.
(4) Notes; repayment. –
a. By and with the consent of the Council of State, the State Treasurer is
hereby authorized to borrow money and to execute and issue notes of
the State for the same, but only in the following circumstances and
under the following conditions:
1. For anticipating the sale of bonds, the issuance of which the
Council of State has approved, if the State Treasurer considers
it advisable to postpone the issuance of the bonds;
2. For the payment of interest on or any installment of principal
of any bonds then outstanding, if there are not sufficient funds
in the State treasury with which to pay the interest or
installment of principal as they respectively become due;
3. For the renewal of any loan evidenced by notes authorized in
this section;
4. For the purposes authorized in this section; and
Page 134 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
5. For refunding bonds or notes as authorized in this section.
b. Funds derived from the sale of bonds or notes may be used in the
payment of any bond anticipation notes issued under this section.
Funds provided by the General Assembly for the payment of interest
on or principal of bonds shall be used in paying the interest on or
principal of any notes and any renewals thereof, the proceeds of which
shall have been used in paying interest on or principal of the bonds.
(5) Refunding bonds and notes. – By and with the consent of the Council of State,
the State Treasurer is authorized to issue and sell refunding bonds and notes
pursuant to the provisions of the State Refunding Bond Act for the purpose of
refunding bonds or notes issued pursuant to this section. The refunding bonds
and notes may be combined with any other issues of State bonds and notes
similarly secured. Refunding bonds or notes may be issued at any time prior
to the final maturity of the debt obligation to be refunded. The proceeds from
the sale of any refunding bonds or notes shall be applied to the immediate
payment and retirement of the bonds or notes being refunded or, if not required
for the immediate payment of the bonds or notes being refunded, the proceeds
shall be deposited in trust to provide for the payment and retirement of the
bonds or notes being refunded and to pay any expenses incurred in connection
with the refunding. Money in a trust fund may be invested in (i) direct
obligations of the United States government, (ii) obligations the principal of
and interest on which are guaranteed by the United States government, (iii)
obligations of any agency or instrumentality of the United States government
if the timely payment of principal and interest on the obligations is
unconditionally guaranteed by the United States government, or (iv)
certificates of deposit issued by a bank or trust company located in the State
if the certificates are secured by a pledge of any of the obligations described
in (i), (ii), or (iii) above having an aggregate market value, exclusive of
accrued interest, equal at least to the principal amount of the certificates so
secured. This section does not limit the duration of any deposit in trust for the
retirement of bonds or notes being refunded but that have not matured and are
not presently redeemable, or if presently redeemable, have not been called for
redemption.
(6) Tax exemption. – Bonds and notes shall at all times be free from taxation by
the State or any political subdivision or any of their agencies, excepting estate,
inheritance, or gift taxes, income taxes on the gain from the transfer of bonds
or notes, and franchise taxes. The interest on bonds or notes is not subject to
taxation as income.
(7) Investment eligibility. – Bonds and notes are securities in which all of the
following may invest, including capital in their control or belonging to them:
public officers, agencies, and public bodies of the State and its political
subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, investment
companies, banks, savings banks, savings and loan associations, credit unions,
pension or retirement funds, other financial institutions engaged in business
in the State, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries. Bonds
and notes are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be
deposited with and received by any officer or agency of the State or political
subdivision of the State for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds, notes,
or obligations of the State or any political subdivision is now or may hereafter
be authorized by law.
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 135

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(8) Faith and credit. – The faith and credit and taxing power of the State are hereby
pledged for the payment of the principal of and the interest on bonds and notes.
The State expressly reserves the right to amend any provision of this section
to the extent it does not impair any contractual right of a bond owner.
(9) Other agreements. – The State Treasurer may authorize, execute, obtain, or
otherwise provide for bond insurance, investment contracts, credit and
liquidity facilities, interstate swap agreements and other derivative products,
and any other related instruments and matters the State Treasurer determines
are desirable in connection with issuance, incurrence, carrying, or securing of
bonds or notes. The State Treasurer is authorized to employ and designate any
financial consultants, underwriters, and bond attorneys to be associated with
any bond or note issue under this section as the State Treasurer considers
necessary.
SECTION 40.6.(k) Variable Rate Demand Bonds and Notes. – In fixing the details
of bonds and notes, the State Treasurer may provide that any of the bonds or notes may:
(1) Be made payable from time to time on demand or tender for purchase by the
owner, if a credit facility supports the bonds or notes, unless the State
Treasurer specifically determines that a credit facility is not required upon a
finding and determination by the State Treasurer that the absence of a credit
facility will not materially and adversely affect the financial position of the
State and the marketing of the bonds or notes at a reasonable interest cost to
the State;
(2) Be additionally supported by a credit facility;
(3) Be made subject to redemption or a mandatory tender for purchase prior to
maturity;
(4) Bear interest at a rate or rates that may vary for any period of time, as may be
provided in the proceedings providing for the issuance of the bonds or notes,
including, without limitation, such variations as may be permitted pursuant to
a par formula; and
(5) Be made the subject of a remarketing agreement whereby an attempt is made
to remarket bonds or notes to new purchasers prior to their presentment for
payment to the provider of the credit facility or to the State.
If the aggregate principal amount payable by the State under a credit facility is in
excess of the aggregate principal amount of bonds or notes secured by the credit facility, whether
as a result of the inclusion in the credit facility of a provision for the payment of interest for a
limited period of time or the payment of a redemption premium or for any other reason, then the
amount of authorized but unissued bonds or notes during the term of such credit facility shall not
be less than the amount of such excess, unless the payment of such excess is otherwise provided
for by agreement of the State executed by the State Treasurer.
SECTION 40.6.(l) Interpretation of Section. –
(1) Additional method. – The foregoing subsections of this section shall be
deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the
things authorized under it and shall be regarded as supplemental and
additional to powers conferred by other laws and shall not be regarded as in
derogation of any powers now existing.
(2) Statutory references. – References in this section to specific sections or
Chapters of the General Statutes or to specific acts are intended to be
references to such sections, Chapters, or acts as they may be amended from
time to time by the General Assembly.
Page 136 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Broad construction. – This section, being necessary for the health and welfare
of the people of the State, shall be broadly construed to effect the purposes
thereof.
(4) Inconsistent provisions. – Insofar as the provisions of this section are
inconsistent with the provisions of any general, special, or local laws, or parts
thereof, the provisions of this section shall be controlling.
(5) Severability. – If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any
person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other
provisions or applications of the section which can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this section
are declared to be severable.
SECTION 40.6.(m) This section is effective when it becomes law.

UNC REPAIR AND RENOVATION PROGRAM
SECTION 40.7. The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall
prioritize funds allocated for project code UNC/R&R21 for repairs and renovations pursuant to
G.S. 143C-8-13 and, notwithstanding G.S. 143C-8-13(a), for projects listed in subsection
40.1.(d) of S.L. 2021-180. The cost for any single repair and renovation project other than those
specifically listed in Section 40.1.(d) of S.L. 2021-180 shall not exceed fifteen million dollars
($15,000,000). The Board of Governors may reallocate funds in accordance with
G.S. 143C-8-13(b) or to projects listed in subsection 40.1.(d) of S.L. 2021-180; provided,
however, reallocation of funds intended for a project located at a particular constituent institution
may only be reallocated for repairs and renovations projects at that particular constituent
institution. The provisions of G.S. 143C-8-13(b)(4), as enacted by Section 40.10(b) of this act,
shall not apply to the projects listed in subsection 40.1.(d) of S.L. 2021-180. The Board of
Governors shall report actions taken under G.S. 143C-8-13(b)(4) to the Joint Legislative
Commission on Governmental Operations and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on
Capital Improvements.

PART XLI. TRANSPORTATION

CASH FLOW HIGHWAY FUND AND HIGHWAY TRUST FUND APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 41.1.(a) Subsections (b) and (c) of Section 41.1 of S.L. 2023-134 are
repealed.
SECTION 41.1.(b) The General Assembly authorizes and certifies anticipated
revenues for the Highway Fund as follows:
For Fiscal Year 2027-2028 $ 3,399 million
For Fiscal Year 2028-2029 $ 3,553 million
For Fiscal Year 2029-2030 $ 3,612 million
For Fiscal Year 2030-2031 $ 3,666 million
For Fiscal Year 2031-2032 $ 3,723 million.
SECTION 41.1.(c) The General Assembly authorizes and certifies anticipated
revenues for the Highway Trust Fund as follows:
For Fiscal Year 2027-2028 $ 2,614 million
For Fiscal Year 2028-2029 $ 2,685 million
For Fiscal Year 2029-2030 $ 2,738 million
For Fiscal Year 2030-2031 $ 2,780 million
For Fiscal Year 2031-2032 $ 2,853 million.
SECTION 41.1.(d) The Department of Transportation, in collaboration with the
Office of State Budget and Management, shall develop a 10-year revenue forecast. The 10-year
revenue forecast developed under this subsection shall be used (i) to develop the five-year cash
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 137

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
flow estimates included in the biennial budgets, (ii) to develop the Strategic Transportation
Improvement Program, and (iii) by the Department of the State Treasurer to compute
transportation debt capacity.

CAPITAL, REPAIRS, AND RENOVATIONS
SECTION 41.2.(a) For the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the funds appropriated in
this act from the Highway Fund to the Department of Transportation for capital, repairs, and
renovations shall be used as follows:

Capital – Highway Fund
FY 2025-26 FY 2026-27
Jones County Maintenance Yard Relocation $3,143,356 $18,541,168
Wake County Maintenance Yard Relocation $3,569,383 $29,252,105

SECTION 41.2.(b) The Governor and General Assembly anticipate appropriating
the following additional funds in the 2027-28 fiscal year to complete the projects set out in
subsection (a) of this section:

Capital – Highway Fund FY 2027-28
Jones County Maintenance Yard $6,650,000;
Wake County Maintenance Yard $14,100,000.


FERRY CAPITAL SPECIAL FUND
SECTION 41.3. G.S. 136.82 reads as rewritten:
"…
(c2) Ferry Capital Special Fund. – The Ferry Capital Special Fund is established as a
special fund separate from the Highway Fund within the Department of Transportation, to fund
ferry vessel replacement projects, ferry facilities and other ferry capital projects.
(d) Use of Toll Proceeds. – The Department of Transportation shall deposit the proceeds
from tolls collected on North Carolina Ferry System routes and route-generated receipts
authorized under subsection (f) of this section to fund codes within the Ferry Capital Special
Fund for each of the Highway Divisions in which system terminals are located and fares are
earned. For the purposes of this subsection, fares are earned based on the terminals from which
a passenger trip originates and terminates. Commuter pass receipts shall be deposited
proportionately to each fund code based on the distribution of trips originating and terminating
in each Highway Division. The proceeds deposited to each fund code shall be used exclusively
for prioritized North Carolina Ferry System ferry passenger vessel replacement projects or
related facilities or buildings in the Division in which the proceeds are earned. Proceeds may be
used to fund ferry passenger vessel replacement projects or supplement funds allocated for ferry
passenger vessel replacement projects approved in the Transportation Improvement Program.
…."

AMEND SAFETY INSPECTION FEE
SECTION 41.4. G.S. 20-183.7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-183.7. Fees for performing an inspection and issuing an electronic inspection
authorization to a vehicle; use of civil penalties.
(a) Fee Amount. – When a fee applies to an inspection of a vehicle or the issuance of an
electronic inspection authorization, the fee must be collected. The following fees apply to an
inspection of a vehicle and the issuance of an electronic inspection authorization:
Type Inspection Authorization
Page 138 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Safety Only $12.75 $ .85$2.00
Emissions and Safety 23.75 6.25.
The fee for performing an inspection of a vehicle applies when an inspection is performed,
regardless of whether the vehicle passes the inspection. The fee for an electronic inspection
authorization applies when an electronic inspection authorization is issued to a vehicle. The fee
for inspecting after-factory tinted windows shall be ten dollars ($10.00), and the fee applies only
to an inspection performed with a light meter after a safety inspection mechanic determined that
the window had after-factory tint. A safety inspection mechanic shall not inspect an after-factory
tinted window of a vehicle for which the Division has issued a medical exception permit pursuant
to G.S. 20-127(f).
A vehicle that is inspected at an inspection station and fails the inspection is entitled to be
reinspected at the same station at any time within 60 days of the failed inspection without paying
another inspection fee.
The inspection fee for an emissions and safety inspection set out in this subsection is the
maximum amount that an inspection station or an inspection mechanic may charge for an
emissions and safety inspection of a vehicle. An inspection station or an inspection mechanic
may charge the maximum amount or any lesser amount for an emissions and safety inspection
of a vehicle. The inspection fee for a safety only inspection set out in this subsection may not be
increased or decreased. The authorization fees set out in this subsection may not be increased or
decreased.
(b) Self-Inspector. – The fee for an inspection does not apply to an inspection performed
by a self-inspector. The fee for issuing an electronic inspection authorization to a vehicle applies
to an inspection performed by a self-inspector.
(c) Fee Distribution. – Fees collected for electronic inspection authorizations are payable
to the Division of Motor Vehicles. The amount of each fee listed in the table below shall be
credited to the Highway Fund, the Volunteer Rescue/EMS Fund established in G.S. 58-87-5, the
Rescue Squad Workers' Relief Fund established in G.S. 58-88-5, and the Division of Air Quality
of the Department of Environmental Quality:
Recipient Safety Only Emissions and
Electronic Safety
Authorization Electronic
Authorization

Highway Fund .551.43 5.30
Volunteer Rescue/EMS Fund .18 .18
Rescue Squad Workers' Relief Fund .12 .12
Division of Air Quality .00 .27 .65
…."

PART XLII. FINANCE PROVISIONS

MAINTAIN PERSONAL INCOME TAX RATE
SECTION 42.1.(a) G.S. 105-153.7(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-153.7. Individual income tax imposed.
(a) Tax. – A tax is imposed for each taxable year on the North Carolina taxable income
of every individual. The tax shall be levied, collected, and paid annually. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (a1) of this section, tThe tax is a percentage of the taxpayer's North
Carolina taxable income computed as follows:
Taxable Years Beginning Tax
In 2022 4.99%
In 2023 4.75%
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 139

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
In 2024 4.5%
In 2025After 2024 4.25%4.25%.
After 2025 3.99%."
SECTION 42.1.(b) G.S. 105-153.7.(a1) is repealed.
SECTION 42.1.(c) This section is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2025."

MAINTAIN COMPETITIVE CORPORATE INCOME TAX RATE
SECTION 42.2.(a) G.S. 105-130.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-130.3. Corporations
A tax is imposed on the State net income of every C Corporation doing business in this State.
An S Corporation is not subject to the tax levied in this section. The tax is a percentage of
theequal to 2.25% the taxpayer's State net income income. computed as follows:
Taxable Years Beginning Tax
In 2025 2.25%
In 2026 2%
In 2028 1%
After 2029 0%."
SECTION 42.2.(b) This section is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2025."

ENACT BACK TO SCHOOL SALES AND USE TAX HOLIDAY
SECTION 42.3(a) Part 3 of Article 5 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 105-164.13G. Educational sales and use tax holiday.
(a) The state and local taxes imposed by this Article do not apply to the following items
of tangible personal property if sold between 12:01 AM on the first Friday of August and the
11:59PM the following Sunday:
(1) Clothing with a sales price of one hundred dollars ($100.00) or less per item.
(2) School supplies with a sales price of one hundred dollars ($100.00) or less per
item.
(3) Computers with a sales price of seven hundred and fifty dollars ($750) or less
per item.
(3a) Computer supplies with a sales price of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) or
less per item.
(b) The exemption allowed by this section does not apply to the following:
(1) Sales of clothing accessories or equipment.
(2) Sales of protective equipment.
(3) Sales of furniture.
(4) Sales of an item for use in a trade or business.
(5) Rentals.
(c) Hold Harmless. – The purpose of this section is to hold county and municipal
governments harmless for the revenue losses resulting from the sales tax holiday established in
this section (a) of this section. The amount each county may receive is determined as follows:
(1) Distribution Amount. – The distribution amount is nine million three hundred
thousand ($9,300,000) for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. For fiscal
years beginning on or after July 1, 2026, the distribution amount is equal to
the amount for the preceding year multiplied by 3.5% and rounded to the
nearest one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
(2) County Allocation. – The Secretary shall, in October of each fiscal year,
allocate to each taxing county the distribution amount on a per capita basis as
Page 140 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
calculated in G.S. 105-486(a). For the purposes of this section, "taxing
county" means a county that levies the first one-half cent (1/2¢) local sales
and use tax under Article 40 of this Chapter."
SECTION 42.3(b) This section is effective for fiscal years beginning on or after July
1, 2025."

ENACT WORKING FAMILIES TAX CREDIT
SECTION 42.4(a) G.S. 105-151.31 is reenacted as it existed immediately before its
expiration and reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-151.31. Earned IncomeWorking Families Tax Credit.
(a) Credit. An individual who claims for the taxable year an earned income tax credit
under section 32 of the Code is allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this Part equal to a
percentage twenty percent (20%) of the amount of credit the individual qualified for under
section 32 of the Code. A nonresident or part-year resident who claims the credit allowed by this
section must reduce the amount of the credit by multiplying it by the fraction calculated under
G.S. 105 134.5(b) or (c), as appropriate. The percentage is as follows:
(1) For taxable year 2013, four and one-half percent (4.5%).
(2) For all other taxable years, five percent (5%).
(b) Credit Refundable. If the credit allowed by this section exceeds the amount of tax
imposed by this Part for the taxable year reduced by the sum of all credits allowable, the Secretary
must refund the excess to the taxpayer. The refundable excess is governed by the provisions
governing a refund of an overpayment by the taxpayer of the tax imposed in this Part. Section
3507 of the Code, Advance Payment of Earned Income Credit, does not apply to the credit
allowed by this section. In computing the amount of tax against which multiple credits are
allowed, nonrefundable credits are subtracted before refundable credits."
SECTION 42.4(b) Section (c) of G.S. 105-151.31 is repealed.
SECTION 42.4(c) This section is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2025."

REPLACE CHILD TAX DEDUCTION WITH A REFUNDABLE CHILD CREDIT
SECTION 42.5(a) Section (a1) of G.S. 105-153.5 is repealed.
SECTION 42.5.(b) G.S. 105-153.10 is reenacted as it existed immediately before its
expiration and reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-153.10. Credit for children.
(a) Credit. – A taxpayer who is allowed a federal child tax credit under section 24 of the
Code for the taxable year is allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this Part for each
dependent child for whom the taxpayer is allowed the federal credit. A taxpayer is allowed a
credit against the tax imposed by this Part for each qualifying child of the taxpayer. A "qualifying
child" is defined by section 152(c) of the Code. The amount of credit allowed under this section
for the taxable year is equal to the amount listed in the table below based on the taxpayer's
adjusted gross income, as calculated under the Code:
Filing Status Agi Credit Amount
Married, filing jointly/ Up to $40,000 $125.00$150
surviving spouse Over $40,000
Up to $60,000 125
Over $60,000
Up to $80,000 100
Over $80,000
Up to $100,000 $100.0075
Over $100,000 0
Up to $120,000 50
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 141

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Over $120,000
Up to $140,000 25
Over $140,000 0
Head of Household Up to $30,000$32,000 $125.00$150
Over $30,000$32,000
Up to $45,000 125
Over $45,000
Up to $60,000 100
Over $60,000
Up to $80,000$75,000 $100.0075
Over $80,000$75,000 0
Up to $90,000 50
Over $90,000
Up to $105,000 25
Over $105,000 0
Single Up to $20,000 $125.00$150
Over $20,000
Up to $30,000 125
Over $30,000
Up to $40,000 100
Over $40,000
Up to $50,000 $100.0075
Over $50,000 0
Up to $60,000 50
Over $60,000
Up to $70,000 25
Over $70,000 0
Married, filing separately Up to $20,000 $125.00$150
Over $20,000
Up to $30,000 125
Over $30,000
Up to $40,000 100
Over $40,000
Up to $50,000 $100.0075
Over $50,000 0
Up to $60,000 50
Over $60,000
Up to $70,000 25
Over $70,000 0.
(b) Limitations. – A nonresident or part-year resident who claims the credit allowed by
this section shall reduce the amount of the credit by multiplying it by the fraction calculated under
G.S. 105-134.5(b) or (c), as appropriate. The credit allowed under this section may not exceed
the amount of tax imposed by this Part for the taxable year reduced by the sum of all credits
allowed, except payments of tax made by or on behalf of the taxpayer.G.S. 105-153.4. Married
individuals qualifying for a credit under this section who file separate returns may not collectively
claim more than the maximum credit allowed under a joint return.
(c) Credit Refundable. – If the credit allowed by this section exceeds the amount of tax
imposed by this Part for the taxable year reduced by the sum of all credits allowable, the Secretary
must refund the excess to the taxpayer. The refundable excess is governed by the provisions
governing a refund of an overpayment by the taxpayer of the tax imposed in this Part. In
Page 142 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
computing the amount of tax against which multiple credits are allowed, nonrefundable credits
1are subtracted before refundable credits."
SECTION 42.5.(c) This section is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2025."

REENACT MODIFIED CHILD AND DEPENDENT CARE TAX CREDIT
SECTION 42.6.(a) G.S. 105-151.11 is reenacted as it existed immediately before its
expiration, is recodified as G.S. 105-153.11, and reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-151.11. Credit for child care and certain employment-related expenses.
(a) Credit. – A person who is allowed a credit against federal income tax for a percentage
of employment-related expenses under section 21 of the Code shall be allowed as a credit against
the tax imposed by this Part an amount equal to the applicable percentage50% of the amount of
the credit provided for in Section 21 of the Code Code, except as reduced by the percentage
reduction in subsection (c), which is claimed and allowed pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code.
To claim the credit allowed by this section, the taxpayer must provide with the tax return the
information required by the Secretary of Revenue.
(a1) Applicable Percentage. - For employment-related expenses that are incurred only with
respect to one or more dependents who are seven years old or older and are not physically or
mentally incapable of caring for themselves, the applicable percentage is the appropriate
percentage in the column labeled "Percentage A" in the table below, based on the taxpayer's
adjusted gross income determined under the Code. For employment-related expenses with
respect to any other qualifying individual, the applicable percentage is the appropriate percentage
in the column labeled "Percentage B" in the table below, based on the taxpayer's adjusted gross
income determined under the Code.
Filing Status Adjusted Gross Income Percentage A Percentage B
Head of Up to $20,000 9% 13%
Household
Over $20,000 8% 11.5%
up to $32,000

Over $32,000 7% 10%

Surviving
Spouse or
Joint Return Up to $25,000 9% 13%

Over $25,000
up to $40,000 8% 11.5%

Over $40,000 7% 10%

Single Up to $15,000 9% 13%

Over $15,000
up to $24,000 8% 11.5%

Over $24,000 7% 10%

Married
Filing
Separately Up to $12,500 9% 13%
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 143

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

Over $12,500
up to $20,000 8% 11.5%

Over $20,000 10%
(b) Employment Related Expenses. – The amount of employment-related expenses for
which a credit may be claimed may not exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000) if the taxpayer's
household includes one qualifying individual, as defined in section 21(b)(1) of the Code, and
may not exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000) if the taxpayer's household includes more than one
qualifying individual. The amount of employment-related expenses for which a credit may be
claimed is reduced by the amount of employer-provided dependent care assistance excluded from
gross income.
(c) Phaseout. – The credit allowed by this section shall be reduced by a percentage listed
below, rounded to the nearest percentage point, based on the taxpayer's adjusted gross income as
calculated under the Code:

Filling Status For AGI Exceeding Percentage Reduction
Married, filing jointly $150,000 The lesser of 100% or
[(Taxpayer's AGI – $150,000) / $50,000]
Head of Household $112,500 The lesser of 100% or
[(Taxpayer's AGI – $112,500) / $37,500]
Single or Married, The lesser of 100% or
Filing Separately $75,000 [(Taxpayer's AGI – $75,000) / $25,000]
(c)(d) Limitations. – A nonresident or part-year resident who claims the credit allowed by
this section shall reduce the amount of the credit by multiplying it by the fraction calculated under
G.S. 105-134.5(b) or (c), G.S. 105-153.4(b) or (c), as appropriate. No credit shall be allowed
under this section for amounts deducted in calculating North Carolina taxable income. The credit
allowed by this section may not exceed the amount of tax imposed by this Part for the taxable
year reduced by the sum of all credits allowable, except for payments of tax made by or on behalf
of the taxpayer.
(e) Credit Refundable. – If the credit allowed by this section exceeds the amount of tax
imposed by this Part for the taxable year reduced by the sum of all credits allowable, the Secretary
must refund the excess to the taxpayer. The refundable excess is governed by the provisions
governing a refund of an overpayment by the taxpayer of the tax imposed in this Part. In
computing the amount of tax against which multiple credits are allowed, nonrefundable credits
are subtracted before refundable credits."
SECTION 42.6.(b) This section is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2025.

PART XLIII. MISCELLANEOUS

STATE BUDGET ACT APPLIES
SECTION 43.1. The provisions of the State Budget Act, Chapter 143C of the
General Statutes, are reenacted and shall remain in full force and effect and are incorporated in
this act by reference.

MOST TEXT APPLIES ONLY TO THE 2025-2027 FISCAL BIENNIUM
SECTION 43.2. Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate
an intention to have effects beyond the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this
act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium.
Page 144 Senate Bill 440-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

EFFECT OF HEADINGS
SECTION 43.3. The headings to the Parts, subparts, and sections of this act are a
convenience to the reader and are for reference only. The headings do not expand, limit, or define
the text of this act, except for effective dates referring to a Part or subpart.

SEVERABILITY CLAUSE
SECTION 43.4. If any section or provision of this act is declared unconstitutional
or invalid by the courts, it does not affect the validity of this act as a whole or any part other than
the part so declared to be unconstitutional or invalid.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 43.5. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1,
2025.
Senate Bill 440-First Edition Page 145